JOHANNESBURG — For a person whose academic achievements donot go as far as high school, Zodwa Wabantu is not shy to admit that the kind of money she has is the envy of many educated people, but she has shared that she doesnot look down on education and wants her son to have the best options..
Taking to Instagram on Wednesday, Zodwa posted a video of herself kneeling down asking her son not to underestimate the value of education based on her lifestyle or anything else..
In the video, Zodwa can be heard advising her young boy to stay in school and get an education because life is hard..
Ngicela ufunde mnta'nam, [I want you to get educated my son], she said..
Zodwa previously told SowetanLIVE sister publication TshisaLIVE that she often gets praised for having the kind of money she has without qualifications.
She.  said even though she has worked hard and continues to do so, she is aware that it was just God that made things work out the way they did.
They also demanded that Mnangagwa should not lead the healing process because he was part of the offending party and called for an independent mediator to convene the hearings..
In an interview with Southern Eye, MDC spokesperson Daniel Molokele and his deputy Luke Tamborinyoka said an apology will be the best foot forward for the President who has indicated he.  wants to tackle the thorny issue..
Mnangagwa continues to portray and sing the rhetoric of reforms.
We have not seen the substance of his rhetoric – from law reform to Gukurahundi, Tamborinyoka told Southern Eye..
Gukurahundi, outside of an outright apology to the people of Zimbabwe in general and the people of Matabeleland and Midlands in particular, Mnangagwa is once again taking everyone up the garden path.
An apology is free and it does not cost money, neither does it require a committee.
All it needs is sincerity..
Molokele said an all-stakeholder approach that is not controlled by government would effectively deal with the Gukurahundi issue..
We need an all-stakeholder approach, a process that will not be partisan.
It is important that Zimbabwe goes through a process of opening up a truth and reconciliation process, a process that would not be controlled by government.
We need something bigger and broader that is not controlled by the political forces at play, he said..
On Mnangagwa's dialogue process, Molokele said it is a futile attempt..
Whatever process the President has come up with, we are not sure of whether it is the right path, so it's not something that we support..
So at the end of the day, we have reservations about this process and it is up to ED (Mnangagwa) to prove himself that he really means business.
At the moment, we will just wait and see, Molokele said..
Mnangagwa is on record saying he will only apologise for Gukurahundi if the National Peace and Reconciliation Commission says he must do so. .
UN Deputy Secretary General Amina Mohammed said the pact was an important step towards reducing the lure of emerging terror groups for the young.  .
The United Nations on Monday hailed a landmark Africa-wide free trade area accord launched at the weekend as a bridge towards peace on the continent..
The long sought-after zone, which African leaders hope will become the world's largest free trade zone by cutting trade tariffs and barriers between 1.2 billion people, was officially launched with much fanfare at an African Union (AU) summit on Sunday..
UN Deputy Secretary General Amina Mohammed said the the African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA) was integral to start building bridges for peace..
We have to find an alternative for the huge cohort of young people that we have the most of, who are the poor, the low-skilled.
We owe them that, she told AFP at the summit in Niger's capital Niamey..
She added that the first continent-wide trade agreement, which was sealed after 17 years of tough negotiations, showed a region on the move..
I think what's really important now is to get that bridge from what we say to what we do, she said..
At the two-day summit, African nations agreed to shared rules of origin, the monitoring and elimination of non-tariff barriers, a unified digital payments system and an African trade observatory dashboard, the AU commission said..
Nations committed to reduce tariffs on 90 percent of good and services, in an agreement that the AU estimates will give a 60-percent boost in intra-African trade by 2022..
African countries currently trade only about 16 percent of their goods and services among one another, compared to 65 percent with European countries..
State trade ministers have agreed the zone should be operational from July 2020..
At the summit, host Niger and its fellow members in the G5-Sahel security pact — Chad, Mali, Burkina Faso and Mauritania — sought support for activating Chapter VII of the UN Charter to address rising threats from terror groups..
The move would help finance the G5-Sahel force, which is currently struggling to cope with jihadists in the region..
They have to keep asking, it's a legitimate request, Mohammed said, adding that it urgent to end insecurity..
She said the trade agreement was also an important step towards reducing the lure of emerging terror groups for the young..
Terrorism is about exclusion, it is about root causes where you have young people who have no hope, where government structures are not working, where economies are not carrying people with them, she said..
Investing in opportunities for young people was a huge task because in many cases the conflicts are moving faster than the investments were making in trying to prevent it..
She said the AU's goal of achieving peace across African by 2020 was attainable, adding that we must work hard to silence the weapons..
It always seems impossible until it's done, she said, quoting Nelson Mandela.
I believe it's more likely to achieve peace today, young people want peace..
More aid funding is needed, Mohammed said, lamenting the delay by countries and private partners to deliver on humanitarian aid pledges..
Yet a broader challenge, was to reverse a trend of humanitarian support at the expense of rebuilding besieged communities..
I look at the percentages of what goes into humanitarian support and what goes into (development) and we need to reverse it, she said..
If we can put that kind of money into development you need less for humanitarian crises, she said..
For more news your way, download The Citizen's app for .
has launched a scathing attack on Theresa May and said the US would no longer deal with the British ambassador to Washington after the diplomat's frank assessments of the president as inept and dysfunctional were leaked to the Mail on Sunday..
In a sign of the damage to the US-UK relationship, Trump hit out at Sir Kim Darroch for a second day in a row, threatening to cut ties over the memos that described him as radiating insecurity..
The US president also said May and her representatives had made a mess over Brexit, contrary to his advice.
Just weeks ago, he praised the prime minister in person on his state visit to the UK, saying she had done a very good job..
Trump launched a tirade against Darroch, saying: I do not know the Ambassador, but he is not liked or well thought of within the U.S. We will no longer deal with him.
The good news for the wonderful United Kingdom is that they will soon have a new Prime Minister.
While I thoroughly enjoyed the magnificent State Visit last month, it was the Queen who I was most impressed with!. ....thought of within the U.S. We will no longer deal with him.
The good news for the wonderful United Kingdom is that they will soon have a new Prime Minister.
While I thoroughly enjoyed the magnificent State Visit last month, it was the Queen who I was most impressed with!.
are a sign that Trump's displeasure with Darroch has intensified since he told reporters on Sunday: We are not big fans of that man and he has not served the UK well … so I can understand it and I can say things about him, but I wonot bother..
His latest statement creates a dilemma for the new prime minister, likely to be Boris Johnson, who will have to decide whether to replace Darroch and risk looking as if he has been bullied into the action by Trump.
However, keeping him in post risks further damage to the UK's diplomatic relations with one of its closest international allies..
Liam Fox, the international trade secretary, was in Washington on Monday to attempt to smooth over relations and was due to apologise for the leak to Ivanka Trump, the president's daughter and adviser..
He told the BBC: This is such a damaging, potentially damaging event that I hope the full force of our internal discipline, or even the law, will come down on whoever actually carried out this particular act..
Jeremy Hunt, the foreign secretary and Johnson's rival for the Tory leadership, also tried to limit the damage by saying he did not agree with all the views expressed by Darroch, and insisted that Britain had the warmest of relationships with the US..
Donald Trump: 'We're not big fans' of UK ambassador to US – video .
However, May's official spokesman also expressed full faith in Darroch and defended his right to make an honest and unvarnished assessment of the White House, saying he should not be sacked from his role, even though May disagreed with his analysis.
It is this qualified defence of Darroch from Downing Street that appears to have further infuriated the president..
Following Trump's outburst, No 10 reiterated that May would not be sacking Darroch in her final two weeks as prime minister..
A government spokesman said: We have made clear to the US how unfortunate this leak is.
The selective extracts leaked do not reflect the closeness of, and the esteem in which we hold, the relationship..
At the same time, we have also underlined the importance of ambassadors being able to provide honest, unvarnished assessments of the politics in their country.
Sir Kim Darroch continues to have the prime minister's full support. .
It is not clear from Trump's tweets whether he personally is withholding cooperation from Darroch, or if he will instruct the entire US administration, including White House staff, the national security adviser and the state department, to cut ties with the ambassador..
If such an explosive move were to take place, it would effectively render Darroch persona non grata in Washington and of no use as an interlocutor between the British and American governments..
The effect would be to increase the pressure on Downing Street to pull Darroch out of Washington earlier than planned.
However, that may be resisted by some Foreign Office officials on the basis that he had done nothing wrong and his departure would be a victory for those who chose to leak his telegrams.
In practice, a government can reject an ambassador, although they cannot choose the identity of the person holding the position..
Alternatively, Darroch may recognise that the doors are shutting in his face and that there is nothing to be gained by staying, which might put strain on the so-called special relationship..
The leak has caused outrage among MPs, who circulated theories in parliament that the culprit could be Russian government hackers or another hostile state..
Isabel Oakeshott, the journalist who received the leak, is close to a number of pro-Brexit politicians and co-wrote an account of the EU referendum with Arron Banks, the leave-supporting donor, who is under investigation by the National Crime Agency over the sources of funding for the Leave.EU campaign..
However, Alan Duncan, a Foreign Office minister, told the Commons it was the government's belief that the leak made its way to Oakeshott from within Whitehall, rather than being handed over by foreign agents.
He said the Cabinet Office had begun its formal hunt for the mole among current senior politicians, aides and civil servants, but did not at this stage think it was right to involve the police..
He said one of the documents was saved from 2017, but three of the memos were produced just eight to 10 days ago, which appeared to point to someone who was still in post..
The cross-government inquiry has already begun examining who had access to the recent memos – which went to potentially hundreds of people – and a highly sensitive letter from 2017 that had a much narrower circulation list..
Tom Tugendhat, the Conservative chairman of the Commons foreign affairs committee, told MPs he had written to the Metropolitan police commissioner, Cressida Dick, to ask that a criminal investigation also be opened into the leak..
Downing Street is resisting demands that the police get involved and insisted it would only call in the Met if the inquiry found evidence of criminality.
A similar investigation into who leaked a National Security Council decision about the Chinese company Huawei led to Gavin Williamson losing his post as defence secretary..
In the diplomatic memos, it was suggested you need to make your points simple, even blunt to communicate with Trump..
Darroch also gave a scathing assessment of the White House, saying: We donot really believe this administration is going to become substantially more normal; less dysfunctional; less unpredictable; less faction-riven; less diplomatically clumsy and inept.
He questioned whether the White House will ever look competent..
Ned Price, who served under Barack Obama as a special assistant to the president for national security affairs, said Trump's tweets only reinforced Darroch's descriptions of him in private..
The UK ambassador didnot write anything that wasnot already patently obvious to an informed observer, Price said.
He spoke of Donald Trump as someone with thin skin, as someone with a delicate ego, as someone who would be receptive to pandering, and just look at Trump's reaction..
He has proved the ambassador right in every respect — by proving he is ego driven, by proving he is thin-skinned, and by proving he will quite literally refuse to deal with people who donot say nice things about him..
There are many Zimbabwe footballers who play at various South African teams.
There are significantly fewer, though, who have made it to teams outside Africa, especially Europe, the area where football is most countries' national sport and where the strongest football teams reside.
So, let's take a look at three of the most successful Zimbabwe internationals who have the occasion to play at European teams..
The English Premier League is the highest-profile and most popular association football league in the world.
It is broadcast all over the globe and always appears among the first picks at bookmakers like .
Making it to a Premier League team would be an honour for anyone..
27-year-old midfielder Tendayi Darikwa was born in Nottingham, the UK to Zimbabwean expat parents in 1997.
He started playing football professionally with the National League team Chesterfield in 2010, then fought his way up on the ladder to the former Premier League – currently EFL League – team Nottingham Forest..
After playing for five years with the Highlanders FC, he was signed by Belgian Pro League team Cercle Brugge K.S.V. in 2007.
After five years with the club, he moved forward to play for Antwerp, after rumours started circulating about him joining the First Division team Anderlecht.
After his stint with Antwerp, he left the club for the team KFC Izegem, from where he retired in 2017..
Knowledge Musona with the creepy nickname The Smiling Assassin joined South Africa's Kaiser Chefs in 2009 after graduating from the Aces Youth Soccer Academy.
During his time there, he won the PSL Club Rookie of the Year award in the 2009-2010 season and Lesley Manyathela Golden Boot in the following one, that sparked the interest of several European clubs in him.
He was courted by several teams, ultimately signing with 1899 Hoffenheim in 2011..
In 2013, he left Germany and moved back to the South African team Kaiser Chefs on a loan deal.
He stood out by scoring several vital goals while there, including an important goal against the Black Leopards that ensured his team's progress in the league.
Again, several European teams started to court him – he moved back to Belgium to play with Oostende in 2015, then he signed a four-year contract with the Belgian First Division club RSC Anderlecht in 2018.
Playing for the Zimbabwe national team, he became a hat-trick legend by scoring three goals against Liberia in 2019 Africa Cup of Nations, Group G qualifier..
The adverse finding, it appears, is stemming from an EFF complaint relating to the unit, which operated during Gordhan's time as SARS commissioner. .
It is a minefield of largely disproved allegations surrounding an investigative unit at SARS that was dubbed 'rogue' in a series of articles in the Sunday Times, which the newspaper later retracted. .
Reports by global auditing firm KPMG were also later retracted.
Mkhwebane is however, heading down a path that has been travelled on numerous occasions. .
Here's how the rogue unit saga unfolded, according to numerous media reports and source interviews..
SARS, in conjunction with the then National Intelligence Agency, agrees to establish a covert enforcement unit (that was to be housed at NIA).
NIA, however, pulls out of the joint project, after SARS had hired members of the unit. .
January to May 2007 .
SARS obtains three legal opinions giving the establishment of its own investigative unit the green light, and the Special Projects Unit is born. .
Mike Peega, a member Special Projects Unit – as the team is known – is arrested in Hartswater while on holiday, on charges relating to rhino poaching..
SARS is officially notified by the SAPS of Peega's arrest.
He is placed at SARS head office, pending the outcome of a disciplinary inquiry. .
Two SARS staff members open a case of extortion against Peega and his lawyer after he threatened to make public allegations surrounding the SPU if SARS did not pay him an unknown sum of money. .
Peega launches arbitration proceedings with the CCMA, which fail.
He is later taken to disciplinary, which finds against him.
He appeals and loses.
He then lodges a grievance against the process SARS followed, which fails.
He is then fired. .
A dossier detailing allegations of illegal and covert actions undertaken by the SPU is leaked to the media.
Peega is later revealed to be behind the dossier, called 'Project Snowman'..
Project Snowman dossier is given to Julius Malema, who falsely claims it is a NIA document.
Malema claims he is a victim of SARS' anti-Zuma agenda. .
NIA, now the State Security Agency (SSA) launches an investigation into the claims in the Project Snowman dossier, and later finds no wrongdoing.
No report is ever handed to SARS. .
SSA again raises concerns about the unit, now known as the High-Risk Investigations Unit.
A meeting is held between SARS Commissioner Oupa Magashula and SSA representatives. .
Magashula writes to the SSA requesting an update on the status of the investigation into the unit.
No response..
Former SARS Commissioner, Oupa Magashula.
The HRIU works closely with the Hawks, SAPS Crime Intelligence and other law enforcement on a series of investigations.
Each year SARS writes to the SSA requesting an update on the status of the investigations.
No response has been received, to date. .
Oupa Magashula resigns and Ivan Pillay is appointed acting commissioner. .
Pillay establishes the Kanyane Panel, following a request by Johann van Loggerenberg, who was in charge of the HRIU, to look into allegations against Van Loggerenberg by SSA and British American Tobacco triple agent, attorney Belinda Walter, who claimed he gave her confidential taxpayer information and had intercepted communications illegally. .
Kanyane does not find Walter's complaint credible.
No mention of covert or rogue unit..
Attorney and alleged triple agent Belinda Walter and a screenshot of the main thrust of findings by the Kanyane Panel, which was tasked to look into her complaint against SARS official and former romantic partner Johann van Loggerenberg. .
SSA minister David Mahlobo announces he has requested the inspector-general of intelligence to investigate the conduct of SSA operatives (namely Walter, and SARS employee and deep cover agent Mandisa Mokwena).
This report is kept under wraps until 2019. .
Former finance minister Nhlanhla Nene instructs Pillay to establish the Sikhakhane Panel to probe comments made about Van Loggerenberg in the Kanyane report..
Tom Moyane is appointed SARS commissioner. .
Sunday Times publishes its first expose on the 'rogue unit' titled 'SARS bugged Zuma'.
This is also the first time the term 'rogue unit' surfaces.
The newspaper continues to publish stories about the unit for two years. .
The Sikhakhane report is leaked to the Sunday Times.
The report reveals in paragraph 57 that the panel's terms of reference were extended [by Moyane] following escalating media reports that a rogue unit existed at SARS and falsely states Walter had complained of a covert unit at SARS.
The report ultimately recommends a judicial commission of inquiry must be established..  to conduct a probe into allegations of a covert unit at SARS..
Moyane appoints Mashiane, Moodley and Monama attorneys, who solicit the services of three advocates, namely Martin Brassey SC, Mike van As and Nadine Fourie, who also conduct an investigation..
Former SARS Commissioner, Tom Moyane.
Nene appoints the Kroon Advisory Board, which has full powers to subpoena witnesses, to conduct a further investigation. .
Van Loggerenberg leaves SARS after being on suspension for months. .
The Kroon Advisory Board releases a media statement, attaching the Sikhakhane report, that states the HRIU, the so-called 'rogue unit', was unlawfully established..
Pillay resigns after winning a Labour Court dispute against SARS. .
Moyane opens a case at Brooklyn SAPS, the now infamous Brooklyn CAS 427/05/2015, alleging a crime had been committed. .
A draft version of KPMG report is leaked to Sunday Times, sparking a Press Ombudsman complaint by Van Loggerenberg, Pillay and Gordhan..
Former finance minister, SARS commissioner and current public enterprises minister, Pravin Gordhan.
The Press Ombudsman hearing with Sunday Times.
Pillay, Gordhan and Van Loggerenberg win the complaint, and Sunday Times is ordered to retract. .
The Hawks send Gordhan the infamous list of 27 questions that cover the establishment of the HRIU and the early pension payout to Pillay..
National prosecutions boss Shaun Abrahams announces Pillay, Gordhan and Magashula will be charged with fraud relating to the early retirement, pension payout and reappointment of Pillay, but charges surrounding the establishment of the unit are not mentioned. .
Abrahams, after discovering a 2009 memo by SARS lawyer Vlok Symington giving the green light on Pillay's early retirement, withdraws charges against Pillay, Gordhan and Magashula..
An anonymous complaint is opened with Public Protector Busisiwe Mkhwebane relating to the early retirement, pension payout and re-appointment of Pillay in 2009, as well as several other issues including the establishment of the SARS unit being unlawful. .
KPMG International announces a withdrawal of its findings and conclusions in its report on the 'rogue' unit..
Pillay, Van Loggerenberg and Andries Janse van Rensburg are charged in relation to the 2007 planting of covert bugs in the NPA offices, now known as 'Project Sunday Evenings'.
The case is ongoing..
Vice-President Yemi Osinbajo on Monday urged Nigerians to have strong belief in the unity of the country and live peacefully with one another..
Osinbajo made the call in Lagos while speaking at a book launch to celebrate the 80th birthday of a former governor of Ogun State, Chief Olusegun Osoba..
The News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) reports the book titled Battlelines: Adventures in Journalism and Politics is a memoir by the former governor..
The Vice-President said unity was an essential ingredient of nation-building and greatness of the country..
He, however, expressed displeasure with the predilection of some unpatriotic citizens to use all sorts of tactics to undermine the unity of the country..
The Vice-President said some members of the political class had always played ethnic and religious cards to pit people against one another, thereby causing disaffection..
Osinbajo urged citizens to resist all divisive antics and tactics, adding that Nigerians should not fall for any agenda that could undermine unity..
He said claims that President Muhammadu Buhari was pursuing an agenda to Islamise the country was false and divisive..
Osinbajo said that the narrative in some quarters that the president was protecting killer herdsmen and Boko Haram members was a desperate ploy to promote ethnic and religious suspicion..
The Vice-President said Boko Haram once made attempts on the president's life, and the incident, which occurred during one of his campaign visits, had betrayed the fact that the claims that he was protecting them were just to cause disunity..
He said the government was committed to the well-being of all Nigerians, and urged citizens to unite against all evils, including religious extremism..
Osinbajo said that Boko Haram, Islamic State West Africa Province (ISWAP) and others were enemies of the nation, urging all citizens to join hands with the governor to root them out..
The likes of Boko Haram, ISIS, Islamic State West Africa Province and many Salafist-Jihadist ideologies are expansionist ideologies that feed purely on hate, hatred of any person or group that does not belong to their particular sect..
They have no redressible grievances so there are no terms of reference for peace.
Fanatics committed to a twisted creed..
They exploit the ignorance of the tenets of Islam, poverty and exclusion, recruit men and women and use children to perpetrate the most heinous atrocities..
They are motivated by a satanic desire to control communities by murder and terror..
Whether it is in Iraq, Borno or Syria their victims are men, women and children, Muslim or Christians so long as they do not share their sick ideology, they target churches, mosques, markets and motor parks where people gather, using children as human bombs to kill randomly, regardless of tribe or faith..
The challenge for us is to recognize this extremism for what it is.
To form alliances across faiths and ethnicities to destroy an evil that confronts us all, he said..
According to him, herder and farmer conflicts, random killings, banditry and kidnapping in different parts of the country are extant challenges that the army has had to intervene in on several occasions..
I want to reassure all Nigerians that these issues are being seriously tackled by the Federal Government, working with the States, through a multi-pronged approach.
Nobody will be allowed to maim, kill or commit other crimes and escape..
It is our duty to apprehend and punish these criminals and we are doing and will continue to do so, he said..
The Vice-President described Osoba as a patriotic Nigerian, saying he had made great impacts in journalism and politics..
Osinbajo said that one of the remarkable attributes of the former governor was his Pan-Nigerianism, as he had been able to build bridges and make friends across all parts of the country..
The Vice-President congratulated him on his 80th birthday, saying he had no doubt that the former governor was still full of energy to contribute more to nation-building..
A former Head of State and Chairman of the occasion, Gen. Abdulsalami Abubakar, also called for unity and peaceful coexistence of all citizens..
He described insecurity as a major issue in the country and urged the government to do its best to address the problem..
The former Head of State commended Osoba for writing the book, saying the piece would help shed light on his contributions to nation-building..
Abubakar said that he had known Osoba since the 60s and the former governor had always exhibited traits of greatness and love for the country..
Osoba is a detribalised Nigerian who has done well both in politics and journalism, he added..
The reviewer of the book, Mr Dapo Olorunyomi, said the book aptly captured the exploits and achievements of Osoba both as a journalist and a former governor .. Olorunyomi, Publisher of Premium Times, said the 341-page book employed the use of lucid expressions which were expected from an outstanding reporter like Osoba..
The book showcases the great media manager that he was at Daily Times, The Daily Sketch and Herald and all he has done in politics, he said..
Speaking, Osoba, flanked by wife, Derinsola, and children, said he decided to write the book to document his experiences both as a politician and journalist..
He said that he wrote the book to reveal what some people might not know about him..
The former governor thanked dignitaries who attended the book launch, saying he felt honoured by their presence..
I particularly thank God to be alive after attempts to kill me by the military failed.
I thank my friends for being part of my story and my family for the support, he said..
NAN reports that Gov.
Dapo Abiodun (Ogun); Gov.
Israel has been rocked for the last week by protests over the shooting death of 19-year-old Solomon Tekah, an Ethiopian Israeli teenager, who was shot in the Haifa suburb of Kiryat Haim on Sunday by an off-duty police officer.
The officer told Internal Affairs that the shooting was an act of self-defense claiming that the suspect was hurling stones at him and his family..
The protests turned violent on Tuesday evening after the funeral of Tekah.
Police reported that in the first day of protests in the aftermath of the shooting, there were 136 arrests and 111 officers wounded across the country..
The first wave of Ethiopian immigration to Israel arrived in 1984, and another followed in 1991.
Since then, many Ethiopian Israelis have struggled to integrate into Israeli society, with leaders accusing police of maintaining racist attitudes toward the community..
Rabbi Levi Sudri, an award-winning Bible expert, believes this recent event is an essential, albeit painful, final step in the Messiah..
When we see these events happening in the streets today, we need to look deeper, to search for their Biblical roots, Rabbi Sudri told Breaking Israel News.
Ethiopians have a strong oral tradition that they are descended from the Tribe of Dan..
Rabbi Sudri noted that this tribal identity has Biblical connotations as well as end-of-days implications..
As the son of Rachel's handmaid Bilhah, Dan always felt mistreated, Rabbi Sudri said.
According to the Midrash (homiletic teachings), Bilhah was dark-skinned.
This is compared to Rachel who was described as being very pale..
Rabbi Sudri noted that the name 'Dan' is derived from the word 'din' (judgment), as seen in Jacob's blessing..
Dan shall govern his people, As one of the tribes of Yisrael.
Dan shall be a serpent by the road, A viper by the path, That bites the horse's heels So that his rider is thrown backward.
Genesis 49:16.
A snake is a creature of explosive anger.
They were given to anger, Rabbi Sudri noted.
Especially towards their own brethren..
A snake is entirely composed of his tail, he added.
In the desert, the tribe of Dan was at the tail end of the procession or tribes.
They saw this as being some form of punishment or insult when in fact it was an honor and compliment.
This aspect of being last does bring with it certain benefits.
It is a power to overcome enemies in a manner that requires forbearance, as seen in the second half of Jacob's blessing to Dan..
They were tasked with the mitzvah (Torah commandment) of returning lost objects that were dropped, Rabbi Sudri said.
In the Book of Joshua, we see the Tribe of Dan becoming upset that they were the last to receive their land..
It is important to note that the symbol of Dan is a 'nachash' (snake) which is equal in gematria (Hebrew numerology) to Moshiach (Messiah).
The Zohar states that the commander in chief of the army of Moshiach will come from the tribe of Dan..
The children of the maidservants all felt that they were second-class tribes, even when that feeling may not have been justified Rabbi Sudri said.
The riots by the Ethiopians are an opportunity for Israel to do a Tikkun (fixing) of this blemish on the relationships between the tribes, between the brothers.
This must be accomplished for the Ethiopians to take their place as leaders in the process leading up to the final redemption.
Judah was the firstborn but Dan followed right behind.
For the Moshiach to take place, we need the aspect of King David, of the Lion of Judah: pride and kingship.
But we also need the aspect of Dan: of humility, submitting yourself for the good of all of Israel, since the Messiah is for all of Israel and for all of the world and doesnot belong to any single tribe or person..
If we can fix the relations between the Ethiopians, the tribe of Dan, the children of Bilhah, with the Tribe of Judah, the children of Rachel, then it makes peace between the two wives in heaven, bringing them together as one.
This must happen for Moshiach to come.
This is true of peace between all the tribes; they must make peace as they come back from the exile.
With the Ethiopians, this is especially true because they were separated from the rest of Israel for so long and because of their skin color the difference is accentuated..
Rabbi Sudri noted that all throughout history, Europe and America have mistreated Africa..
It could be that what is happening in Israel with our brethren from the tribe of Dan will be a catalyst for the world to fix this historic wrong.
In addition, it is known that there are millions of Africans who are descended from Israel.
We need to build a bridge to them via the Ethiopians who are here now..
Regus, a leading supplier of workspaces around the world, has opened the doors to three new facilities across Morocco, part of the company's ongoing plans to invest in African countries and shift its focus away from the European Union..
The three new centers — located in three of Morocco's largest cities: Casablanca, Rabat, and Tangier — are designed to provide the company's current 2.5 million clients with greater access to networking opportunities with Moroccan companies. .
The new centers will also provide workspaces for multinational companies with traveling employees and companies based entirely within Morocco..
With over 3,200 locations in 120 countries, Regus has become globally recognized for its facilitation of networking, with the company facilitating meetings and collaborations between its millions of customers..
In addition, the company provides partners — ranging from multinational corporations like Amazon and IBM, to local start-up companies — with access to flexible workspaces as well as a wide range of other services for businesses..
Regus has conducted business in Morocco since 1997, with the company now operating out of 16 business centers and serving over 2000 local companies throughout the kingdom..
When it comes to Morocco, [Regus] considers it as a hub, as we are the nearest country to Europe, so we are launching a lot of innovation, Yassine Jalil, Regus's Area Manager for the Rabat area, told Morocco World News..
Morocco also has a lot of trade agreements with all African countries and Regus is present in 21 countries in Africa..
Regus already has extensive holdings in Morocco.
The company currently operates more businesses in Morocco than almost any other African country, with the exception being South Africa..
Since 2015, Regus has already more than doubled the number of offices it operates in the country, and has announced plans to further increase with at least 40 sites by 2023..
Our country manager has the aim to open and reach 40 centers by 2023, Jalil told Morocco World News.
It's ambitious but it's definitely realistic..
As Regus continues with its plans to distance itself further from the European Union, Morocco has become the epicenter of the company's plans for further expansion into Africa..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
The City of Johannesburg has launched an investigation into a video circulating on social media of a woman being restrained by a Johannesburg Metropolitan Police Department (JMPD) officer while another person, purported to be a nurse, appears to prepare to draw blood from the resident..
MMC for Public Safety Michael Sun said the City has started an investigation to find out what led to the incident..
The City, on noting this incident, has already commenced an internal investigation into the events leading up to the incident as well as to determine whether the appropriate use of force was used by law enforcement officials.
If anyone is found guilty of any wrongdoing, they will face appropriate and swift disciplinary action, said Sun..
The MMC said the individual had allegedly failed a breathalyzer test necessitating Metro police to arrest and take her to the Douglasdale Police Station, north of Johannesburg for further processing..
Sun said in a statement, It is critical to note that the law does permit a police officer to physically restrain a person who refuses to provide a blood sample for law enforcement purposes..
However, Jean Berdou of Future City Fourways has warned motorists against the danger and legal consequences of drinking and driving. .
The exact circumstances of this case and what led to the testing are being investigated after Future City Fourways (FCF) queried the conduct of officials in this matter with the MMC Michael Sun and SAPS Douglasdale, said Berdou in a Facebook post..
Section 65(9) of the National Road Traffic Act authorises the taking of a blood sample even absent consent but the arrested person can insist that their doctor be present and is entitled to demand that proof be shown of use of a sealed syringe and needle.
Only a district surgeon, or registered nurse or medical practitioner may take a blood sample.
Bail may be set by a station commander..
INFOGRAPHIC: Drinking and driving – Know the law.
Seventeen-year-old Someleze Mjekula is not your average teenager.
Quiet and self assured, he achieved an incredible 100% in physical science in his matric finals last year, overcoming the twin challenges of township living and the woefully underresourced South African education system.
It's enabled him to successfully apply for a place in the University of Cape Town's BSc (Eng) Mechanical and Mechatronic Engineering degree programme..
The Mdantsane teenager's remarkable results are partly down to his own aptitude but it was his mother and the novel after-school extra-tuition programme, Kutlwanong Promaths, that pushed him to achieve full marks.
She was very supportive of my education, he says of his mom, but she battled to understand why I was getting marks in the 90s and not 100%.
She was shouting, she would get angry, I donot know what for because I worked hard, but she didnot care.
She just wanted a 100%..
It was at Umlazi High School in Grade 8 – which he jokingly refers to as a concentration camp, especially over the exam season – that he was introduced to Kutlwanong Promaths.
The extra-tuition township network programme of 15 centres offers Grade 10-12 learners extra lessons in maths and science from Friday to Sunday.
Datatec, the multinational ICT solutions and services group, sponsors the Mdantsane centre of Kutlwanong Promaths. .
Looking back, Someleze believes the competition from fellow learners in the Promaths class forced him to aim for higher marks.
I was averaging between 60% and 80%, but my fellow learners were getting above 90%, which just pushed me to get there.
The centres, which attract learners from various high schools in the communities in which they are situated, have established an all-encompassing model of learner care and development, which includes a good degree of peer-to-peer support, and incentives for top performers (such as a weekend away in Cape Town).
They also foster a sense of responsibility among learners, encouraging them to practise respect and diligence in everything they do, teaching life skills that will benefit not only the students' studies but build character too. .
I would attend Promaths classes on a Friday from 3pm to 5pm, then again on a Saturday from 8am to 3pm and also on a Sunday from 8am to 11am.
Maths was always my strong point, so I was surprised when I got above 90% for science as well – that made me really happy, says Someleze. .
Raised in a single-parent household after his father passed away a day after he was born, he grew up in a modest township home with two elder sisters, where there was just enough income to pay for things like transport to school.
His mother worked hard to provide a stable home life, so it's perhaps not surprising that a Hollywood movie that celebrates the remarkable achievements of black female mathematicians inspired Someleze.
The 2016 American biographic drama Hidden Figures tells the story of the women who worked at NASA during the Space Race, and how one in particular, Katherine Goble, overcame institutional racism and sexism to calculate the trajectories of Apollo 11 and Space Shuttle missions, going on to receive the Presidential Medal of Freedom in 2015..
Although he initially wanted to study aeronautical engineering, his teachers advised him that jobs in that field were scarce, and suggested mechatronics instead.
Mechatronics is an interdisciplinary branch of engineering that combines a fundamental background in mechanical engineering with light-current electrical engineering, and is an excellent basis on which to build valuable engineering roles in modern industry.
With South Africa's dire skills shortages in engineering, Someleze's job prospects, if he qualifies, look good.
A mechatronic degree can open doors to roles such as robotics engineer, automation engineer, electronics design engineer, mechanical design engineer, data scientist or big data analyst, instrumentation engineer and software engineer. .
Promaths runs a university alumni programme too, something Someleze has leaned on as he's adjusted to the challenges and pressures of his first year at university.
The workload is hectic and I've had to change my study techniques but now everything is good, he says.
I have the support of a great set of mentors, both on and off campus, including my Promaths mentors.
The alumni programme offers powerful motivational and peer-to-peer support, with activities including revisiting centres, organising matric career days and network sessions. .
Someleze is enthusiastic about the role Promaths played in enabling him to realise a dream.
Our principal would remind us that Datatec had donated a lot of money to make our futures better, and that we needed to pull up our socks.
Companies should be investing in Promaths, because it helps us a lot..
Thanks to the support of a loving family, the incredible tuition of Promaths and the inspiring story of a Hollywood movie, Someleze's future looks bright..
Willie Obiano of Anambra State on Monday urged the Federal Government to investigate the alleged murder of Mrs Obianuju Ndubuisi-Chukwu's in Johannesburg..
Mr Don Adinuba, Anambra State Commissioner for Information and Public Enlightenment, in a statement advised the Federal Government to prevail on the South African government to act decisively over the murder of the Nigerian, who was the Deputy Director-General of the Chartered Insurance Institute of Nigeria (CIIN)..
Ndubuisi-Chukwu was found dead in her Emperor Palace Hotel room on Thursday, June 13..
She was reported to have died while attending a meeting of the African Insurance Organisation in the South African commercial capital..
Obiano said: It has become necessary to request the SGF to personally wade into the killing..
The police in Johannesburg may be capitalising on the absence of a foreign minister in Nigeria to treat the case with levity..
According to him, there is report on death of 53-year old indigene of Anambra State, which suggest that the South African police are treating this murder as just another Nigerian's death..
It is disheartening that more than three weeks after the dastardly act, the South African police have not deemed it necessary to investigate the heinous crime with the seriousness it deserves..
Ndubuisi-Chukwu was not an ordinary person, but a top corporate executive who was billed to become chief executive of her organisation in 2020..
She was representing Nigeria at the meeting in Johannesburg where she met her untimely death, the governor said..
He said that although the South African Department of Home Affairs had in an autopsy report said that Ndubuisi-Chukwu was strangulated, it was not true..
Nigerian insurance director's death cause unnatural, says South Africa.
He described the autopsy report as contradicting an earlier version of the report that suggested that she might have died in her sleep or committed suicide..
Obiano suggested the South African Police should carryout investigation to unearth the person or persons who entered her room after her attendance at the farewell dinner held on Wednesday, June 12..
The job has been made easier now because Emperor Palace Hotel has agreed to release the CCTV footage to them, he added..
Obiano promised not to relent in quest for justice over Anambra indigenes whose life is wasted in Nigeria or abroad, saying that Ndubuisi-Chukwu's death has become subject of intense media scrutiny..
He, however, commended Prof. Chidi Odinkalu, past Chairman, Nigerian Human Rights Commission, on the effort being made to ensure justice is carried out in memory of Ndubuisi-Chukwu, mother of two boys.
WITHOUT any knocks on the door, no pamphlets, no billboards, no late-night hotlines or viral video campaigns, an unnamed cultural movement, embracing a more afrocentric approach to health, cuisine, hair care, and even spirituality has been growing among black people, locally and in the diaspora..
On Sunday, Morningside's Sutton Park played host to the Black Sundays Afrikan Market, a new initiative organised by Abantu Abansundu..
The organisers say the market is aimed at transforming the fleamarket space and economy in Durban, and to celebrate black excellence in business and culture..
Let's be honest.
All fleamarkets in Durban are lily-white in their ownership and organisation.
In fact, the whole economy is profoundly anti-black.
Let's not be castigated therefore for creating spaces that celebrate African culture and ingenuity.
Of course we invite everybody to attend, but all businesses featured here will be unapologetically 100 per cent black-owned, said Thobekile Mbanda who is part of the organisers..
A yoga session kicked off the morning's activities while fashion, food and home decor stalls added to the ambiance..
Visitors were also treated to poetry, music performances and conversations..
Legendary guitarist, Madala Kunene headlined the music and entertainment acts.
Bafo (brother), as Kunene is affectionately known, took the audience on a musical journey adding entirely new riffs and impromptu adaptations of songs he has already written..
Although we play across the globe, to different crowds I was so happy to be asked to grace this event, that I even brought the guitar I play with internationally, he said..
Exciting plans for Mayville park.
This event comes on the heels of a devastating state of the union address by President Ramaphosa who described the country's economic outlook as extremely bleak..
Centuries of economic plunder and dispossession have continued to produce criminal inequality among blacks and whites in South Africa.
Study after study confirms that post-1994, median incomes between racial groups (not to mention wealth) have remained stubbornly unchanged, said organiser Bash Gxabhashe..
There are many empty references to 'social cohesion' focusing on multiracialism.
Black Sundays promotes better communication, unity, and love between black people.
The essence of this market is love, unity, and support among black people.
We are working on a database and a website to profile excellent black businesses and service providers, she said..
Tamasha Maliti and Yasmin Rajah.
The market was a welcome relief to many..
As black people, we always insert ourselves in other people's spaces and we complain of not being seen or respected.
Yet we spend money on people who donot respect us.
I'm thrilled to participate in this event that is birthing a space for collaboration, co-creation, sharing for our community.
I look forward to this and future events that will create lasting consciousness and activism about black issues.
I'm delighted to be part of designing sustainable solutions for our communities and families, said one of the attendees..
Do you want to receive news alerts on this and many other stories relevant to the Durban area via WhatsApp?
Send us a WhatsApp message (not an sms) with your name and surname to 060 532 5535..
You can also join the conversation on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram..
PLEASE NOTE: If you have signed up for our news alerts you need to save the Berea Mail WhatsApp number as a contact to your phone, otherwise you will not receive our alerts.
Scores of farmers in Kakamega county have benefited from training on the latest technology solutions in mechanised agriculture organised by Agri-franchise Company FMD East Africa.
The sessions dubbed Xtra Care Clinics are designed to support the servicing of Massey Ferguson equipment and implements..
The aftermarket support function saw 26 tractors and implements repaired in the Khayega and Mayoni demonstrations for plough, harrows, chisel plough, sprayers, planters, potato planting, bailing and hay equipment. .
FMD East Africa sales manager Lucy Mukuru says the firm intends to reach 200 farmers within the Western Kenya grain basket region through demonstrations on routine maintenance procedures and free mechanical inspection of tractors. .
To increase food production, we must bring to the farmers the latest appropriate and sustainable methods of soil preparation, planting and harvesting.
Our aim is to help farmers embrace appropriate technology for farm mechanisation and increase crop yields, she said. .
Mukuru said FMD technical support and sales teams is offering advice and expertise on the latest tractors and parts and give farmers a one-on-one opportunity for interactions on problem solving and emerging developments in agriculture..
The clinic held in Kakamega is the fifth to be conducted by the firm over the past five months.
Similar clinics have benefited farmers from Uasin Gishu, Nandi, Nakuru, Kericho and Mau in Narok county this year.
More clinics are expected in Mombasa, Eastern region, Kitale and Kapenguria in West Pokot county. .
FMD Parts manager Humphery Mutange says a lack of qualified personnel compromises the quality of repair work on tractors as well as creating an avenue for contraband spare parts.
We strive to give our clients value for money by tagging along our service and parts departments along the clinics..
Our tractors have a 250-hour clock working before a mandatory service.
We also deal in premium genuine parts, which have a 12-month warrant, which becomes void if the service is done by quacks, he adds..
According to FMD East Africa sales executive Dean Alexander, says:We perform free diagnosis, labour and give up to 30 per cent discounted rates on the service parts.
Tractors and implements are also on display during the demonstrations, he observed..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Prior to 1972, South African teams were racially selected, organised by the whites-only South African Rugby Board.
Australia then supported the international boycott of sporting contacts with South Africa over the issue of apartheid.
The teams did not meet again until 1992, when apartheid was being dismantled and the SARB had merged with the non-racial South African Rugby Union.
Since that time Australia has won just over 50 percent of their games and has won the Mandela Plate nine times in the twelve years since its inception..
In the professional era, extended tours of each country have been replaced by participation in an annual series involving the top teams of the Southern Hemisphere.
From 1996 through 2011, Australia and South Africa competed alongside New Zealand in the Tri Nations series.
Starting in 2012, the three nations competed alongside Argentina in The Rugby Championship.
In the Tri Nations era, the Wallabies and Springboks played two or three encounters each year on a home-and-away basis; the Rugby Championship features two annual encounters, also on a home-and-away basis..
Most notable historic snippets or facts extracted from the book 'On This Day' first published in 1992 by Octopus Publishing Group Ltd, London, as well as additional supplementary information extracted from Wikipedia..
Like the South Coast Herald's  page, follow us on .
To receive our FREE email newsletter, click .
The highest accolade that a Rotarian can receive is the Paul Harris award, which was recently awarded to outgoing president, Neil McDonald.
The award, certificate and badge was flown in from America and presented to him by past president Aneska Dupont on Thursday, 27 June..
Congratulations from all of the club members at Amanzimtoti Rotary and thank you to Neil for all his involvement and dedication towards the well-being and upliftment of the community.
It is noted and greatly appreciated by all, she said..
I was flabbergasted to receive the award.
I have never even given it a thought and I did not have a clue, No one even mentioned it at our meetings, so I was really very surprised and at the same time very humbled to receive this prestigious award, said Neil..
I believe there are not too many people who receive this.
It is because when I do something, it is not about myself, as I think the opportunity to serve is greater than the reward.
Money does not motivate me, but when someone says to me I am better, thank you for the help or donation – money cannot buy that rewarding feeling..
Preparations continue for Jabulani fundraising fete.
At the handover of the award, Neil said it was sad that his children and grandchildren were not present, but he was elated that his wife Pam made it in time to enjoy the moment with him after being stuck in traffic for over two hours..
At the end of his speech, he called Pam up to thank her for standing by him for the year while he undertook being president of Amanzimtoti Rotary Club on top of all the portfolios he currently juggles.
Pam has always supported me in whatever projects I have been involved and has always encouraged me to go for gold.
We have been happily married for 45 years and we are truly blessed..
Neil McDonald, president of the Rotary Club of Amanzimtoti, hands over the reigns over to the President Elec to induct three new Rotarians and club members.
With him is Sarah Stott, Neil Subbiah and his wife, Lerina..
Neil said receiving the award means a lot to him.
It shows me there are people who acknowledge what other people are doing in and for their various communities and that is very encouraging.
You then also get more people involved in the different projects, as people are inspired by seeing that there is some acknowledgement..
He said he enjoyed his term as Rotary president and the year flew by for him.
I met many wonderful people, people with a good heart and great visions.
I had the opportunity to speak to young and old – to be the 'inspiration'.
I remember as a young man, there were wonderful people, men and women, or teachers who I looked up to, that inspired me, that encouraged me, that helped and nurtured me to what I am today..
Fidelity ADT has released a general warning to the public to be wary of a continuing trend where criminals target outdoor detection beams and gate motors. .
According to Charnel Hattingh, Fidelity ADT national marketing and communications manager, criminals appear to be targeting beams and gate motors with the intention of stealing and damaging them..
We believe that in most cases they are being stolen and sold for scrap, said Hattingh..
The company has warned residents to keep their outdoor detection beams armed at all times..
This not only keeps you safe while you are inside your home, but has the added benefit of warning you to anyone attempting to steal your beam, said Hattingh..
While gate motor theft has been an ongoing trend, Fidelity ADT says they have seen a steady increase in the number of reported cases from their customer base over the last couple of months..
In the past, criminals would damage a gate motor in order to gain access to a property, but we are seeing that the trend seems to be shifting towards the gate motor itself being the target..
It is important that the public is aware of the trend and take steps to help minimise the chances of being targeted by opportunistic crime..
Fidelity ADT provides the following advice:.
Ensure that your gate motor cannot be accessed from the road by reaching through, or over your fence.
Consider installing anti-lift rails to your gate, to prevent the gate from being lifted of its tracks.
Activate your alarm at all times, even when you are at home and bypass areas of your property and home that are in use.
Speak to your neighbours, local community policing forum and security company to inform them when you are away for extended periods.
They may be able to do additional patrols and keep an eye on your property..
… People worry about its real intentions.
SAN FRANCISCO, July 8, (THEWILL) – An American firm, Creative Associates International (CAI), involved in the outsourcing of contracts on behalf of the United States Agency for International Development (USAID), is currently covertly involved in the fight against Boko Haram insurgents in the North Eastern part of the country through the digging of trenches in the Boko Haram ravaged parts of Borno and Yobe States..
Subsumed under the name of North-East Regional Initiative (NERI) and it's activities categorized to be under the Nigeria-Lake Chad Basin (NLCB) project, the company recently closed shop abruptly in Adamawa State, where it felt that its covert goal of combating the Islamic State West Africa Province (ISWAP) is not being met..
However, in Borno for instance, it has expended about $358,724 between December 2018 till April 2019 on digging trenches in Monguno, Kareto and Gubio respectively, according to checks by THEWILL..
Although it does not conceal its activities to the Nigerian military, which takes possession of the trenches once built, and the Borno state government, the propriety of its real intention comes under question considering its past activity in Cuba where it tried to instigate the youths of the country against the government..
Under the guise of combating ISWAP, a deliberate policy thrust captured in the USG African Strategy (2018), this act violates the constitutional provisions of the 1999 Nigerian Constitution (as amended)..
The USG foreign policy priorities as regards Nigeria, as captured in the document, is that the latter's 'stability and security directly impacts US national interests' of countering ISIS and violent conflict..
According to NERI Chief of Party, Olivier Girard, at a pre-inaugural private meeting with Borno state governor, Prof. Babagana Umara Zulum, some recent undertakings of the NLCB/NERI programme, include … the trenching work in several towns across Borno state….
The backlash of this undertaking is that ISWAP is irked by this covert operation and is fighting back.
According to an NLCB Bi-weekly report of April 12, 2019, ISWA burnt six road construction caterpillars on their way to Maiduguri from Damaturu..
… This action may be in response to NLCBs trench digging activities to protect civilian population in program locations in Northeastern Nigeria, the document reveals..
Although the manifest intent of CAI may be lofty in its outlook, its antecedent in Cuba, where it attempted for two years to infiltrate and instigate the youths against the government, leaves its record tainted and what is doing now as subject to questions..
The Guardian UK had reported that the Cuban episode is laid out in documents involving Creative Associates International, a Washington contractor paid millions of dollars to undermine the Cuban government.
The thousands of pages include contracts, emails, preserved chats, budgets, expense reports, power points, photographs and passports..
The work included the creation of a Cuban Twitter social network and the dispatch of inexperienced Latin American youth to recruit activists, operations that were the focus of previous revelations, the paper added..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
WITH the increasing number of missing person cases in the Highway area, Hillcrest SAPS has issued a number of hints and tips to help parents ensure their children's safety..
Police discover body of missing Pinetown girl.
Prevention is always better than cure, or so the saying goes.
When it comes to children, safety and how they interact with strangers, it is paramount that as a parent we make these issues are on top of our priority list, said Hillcrest SAPS communications officer, Capt Linzi Smith..
1. Keep a recent photo of your child on you so that they can be easily identifiable if anything were to happen..
2. Teach your children their own names, addresses and your name and telephone number..
3. Show your children where the nearest police station is and as well as the contact number for the station.
Remember to point out key landmarks so that they wonot get lost..
4. Teach your children not to trust strangers and that they should not accept gifts or go anywhere with them..
5. Create a family exclusive password.
Then when you get someone to pick them up it can be used as a security question.
Tell your children that if a stranger doesnot know the password then they should not go with them..
6. Know where your children are at all times, who they are with and what they are wearing..
7. Make an effort to know your children's friends, i.e. names, addresses and numbers..
8. Keep children close to home and teach them the importance of a buddy system – to never go anywhere alone..
9. Teach your children to take the same route to and from places.
If your child goes missing you can start looking on the discussed route..
If you are asked to name things that disturb you, things that disgust you, things that seem most absurd to you, what would come readily to your mind?
What would top your list?
Let me guess.
Would it be the double-dipping of bread in tea?
Would it be the sight of unflushed shit floating happily in a toilet's porcelain white bowl?
Or the news of a child defiled by a pedophile?
All these are valid.
But if you asked me same question, my reply would be this: when a man calls a woman 'cheap' on the basis of how quickly sex happened between them..
This thing that seems most absurd to me – men calling women cheap – might not be one of the issues bothering half of the world's population.
It might not even have occurred to a quarter to be bothered.
I mean, it is not global warming, nuclear war, or some sort of global pandemic.
But it bothers me still: dehumanisation of any sort should bother everybody.
It is as absurd as it is disturbing and disgusting.
And because I matter, this issue too is valid..
Permit me to digress.
I just do not want you to think that by this piece, I am somehow encouraging sexual immorality.
Let us examine this case between Arinze and Shola.
Arinze is a fine, well-educated man, prosperous and knows that he is good looking.
Shola is a beautiful girl and a student in the nearby university.
Shola is resolute and unpretentious.
She knows what she wants and goes for it.
Arinze meets Shola on a sweltering day at an ATM gallery.
Their friendship is instant.
They actually enjoy each other's company.
Hanging out in ritzy restaurants, discussing popular books, politics and the unpredictable weather.
And then sex happens (on Shola's terms, actually, and not as a result of Arinze's coercion) and Arinze, this fine, well-educated and prosperous man, who knows that he is good looking, goes around telling everyone who cares to listen that Shola, resolute and unpretentious Shola, Shola who is very beautiful and a student in the nearby university, is a very cheap girl..
Did you guffaw?
Well, if you did not, it is no fault of mine.
You might be having a mid-life crisis or undergoing a very difficult time.
Desperate Zimbabweans are parting with huge sums of money to pay bribes in order to obtain passports amid reports that applicants are being told to wait until 2022. .
The Registrar General's office is battling an acute shortage of special paper and ink used to make passports, resulting in a huge backlog for travel documents. .
Investigations at the RG's office in Harare showed that emergency passport seekers were being told to wait for a minimum of 18 months to submit applications..
Those seeking ordinary passports were told to return in 2022 to submit their applications. .
Last Thursday morning hundreds of people were already queuing at the passport office by 5am, but only a handful were served. .
An official asked people seeking emergency passports to register their names on a list and return in October 2020 to submit their applications..
A number of people with links to staff at the RG's office are now taking advantage of the crisis to milk passport seekers by facilitating the payment of.  bribes, it emerged. .
I can help you, my brother, just your money and you will get your passport after a week that is if you are serious, one of the men operating from the.  passport office told this reporter. .
Upon further investigations, it was revealed that desperate passport seekers were paying US$4 000 bribes to get emergency passports and US$100 for ordinary.
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Following the 30-day ultimatum given by a group of Northern youths asking governors opposed to the idea of Ruga Settlements to back down or risk Southerners living in the North being asked to leave the region, some prominent Nigerians are calling for deliberate efforts to douse rising ethnic tensions across the country..
The latest to add their voices to this call are Nobel Laureate, Professor Wole Soyinka, and the Ooni of Ife, Oba Adeyeye Ogunwusi.
Both men made their position known after their meeting on July 4, 2019, in Abeokuta, the Ogun State capital where they condemned the line being towed by the Northern group..
In a statement jointly signed by Prof. Soyinka and Oba Ogunwusi, they warned that Nigeria cannot survive another upheaval of the magnitude of the 1966-1970 Civil War and that every effort must be made to prevent another one..
While acknowledging the right of the Northern group to make their demand as allowed by freedom of expression, they in the exercise of the same right called on all Nigerian nationals to defend the sanctity of their ancestral lands, adding that this birthright remains inviolate, even under colonial occupation..
The statement adds, We call on the Nigerian people to recognize that the internal colonization project is ever recurrent, that there are backward, primitive, undeveloped minds that have failed, and continue to fail to overcome delusions in this antiquated belief in sectarian domination as the key to social existence, a belief that despises peaceful cohabitation that is based on mutual respect..
While calling on Nigerians, both on state and community levels, to step up discussions on the future structure of the nation, and take steps to preserve and enhance their distinct cultural identities, Prof. Soyinka and Oba Ogunwusi emphasized the rights of every Nigerian and community or group of human beings as primary and pre-eminent over and above all other parameters of human development or formal associations..
The staff of the branch claims that they work in a difficult environment and that their lives are at risk whenever they are at work..
Marvelous Ndlovu who is the branch secretary of National Education, Health and Allied Workers' Union said that their building is a big issue.
Our toilets are locked with wires and are a health hazard, phones do not work and we are forced to buy and use our own airtime to keep the department running, there is no space in the building and the working environment is unhealthy, and we are short of staff..
Some complained that rats have been exterminated and not taken out, the building smells horrible inside and they are also afraid that the building might collapse on them at any time.
They want to be moved to a safer working environment..
The Gauteng Education Department Johannesburg West District Director Dennis Macuacua addressed the workers and said that he would escalate the issues reported to executive management and would give them feedback after fourteen working days..
Gauteng Department of Education officially postpones online applications.
***As Okowa Calls For Consensus Building Among Nigerian.
President of the Nigerian Senate, Senator Ahmad Lawan and Ekiti State Governor Dr. Kayode Feayemi, have felicitated with Delta State Governor, Senator Dr Ifeanyi Okowa on his 60th birthday, saying that Nigerians should be committed to the affairs of the country..
Speaking with newsmen on 08/07/19, in Asaba, Delta State where Governor Okowa celebrated his birthday with people with disability, Senator Lawan stated that Nigerians should serve the country with the passion with which the governor handles the affairs that concerns the nation..
Governor Okowa is very patriotic, purposeful, dedicated and committed to issues that affect the country, he said, disclosing, I served with him in the Senate and I can tell you that he is always committed to the job he is assigned to do..
While congratulating the governor for clocking 60 years, the Senate President who was accompanied on the felicitation visit by the Chairman of the Nigerian Governors Forum, Dr Kayode Fayemi stated, Governor Okowa is a man who believes in the country despite our different political divide..
Governor Fayemi on behalf of the Governors of the country, congratulated Governor Okowa, stating, we members of the Nigerian Governors Forum are proud of you (Governor Okowa), you are a committed patriot and a bridge builder..
Governor Okowa who was beaming with smile through-out the visit by the Senate President and Dr Fayemi, thanked Nigerians for identifying with him as he celebrates his birthday, stating, your presence have added a lot of colour to the occasion..
He used the event to call for consensus building in the country, saying, it is time to ensure that there is consensus building to make everybody to come to the table and discuss how to take Nigeria to greater heights..
At this point in time in our history, good working relationship between the Chairman of the National Assembly and Chairman of the Governors' Forum is good for our country, Governor Okowa said..
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Telegram (Opens in new window).
Click to share on LinkedIn (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to print (Opens in new window).
Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window).
Behind the talk of Free Senior High School (SHS) and the success story the government keeps selling to us, is the threat to the smooth running of the schools, because of government's indebtedness to the schools..
Until the introduction of the free SHS policy, Public Secondary schools, were allowed to collect some fees, including Parents Teacher Association (PTA) dues..
The expenditure profile of schools can be summarized under the following headings;.
One core mandatory expenses, example include school fees, feeding fees, and boarding fees, these expenses are the reason why in the past government's failure to release funds led to the closure of schools in the Northern region..
Secondly, administrative expenses, these include; payment of laborers, teachers who are engaged on part time etc.  and thirdly, capital expenditure, it also entails buying of photocopiers, printers, toners, building school blocks and dormitories etc.. Lastly, supplementary expenses such as levies and PTA dues..
Some of these expenses were borne by parents and so whiles schools wait for government to fulfill its part, they are able to run smoothly, until the elephant in the room was introduced (Free SHS)..
The policy, like many other policies in this country are well intended, by the implementation, has always been the problem..
This newspaper, is aware of the problems many schools are facing.
Heads of Secondary Schools in the country are afraid of victimization and so have chosen to keep quiet about their problems..
The last time government disbursed monies to the schools was early this year and even that, it was to cover only one term and for the second year students..
There is no gainsaying it that the inability for the government to release funds to meet other pressing needs, such as the procurement of consumables, will defeat the purpose of the free SHS..
Food is not all that is needed for the smooth running of the schools..
As a newspaper we are interested more in the quality of the free education than just free education as the schools that are supposedly free are public schools and they produce sophisticated illiterates..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
LAGOS JULY 8TH (URHOBOTODAY)-No fewer than seven persons were reported to have lost their lives while scores were on injured , when the oven at a local-illegal refining exploded in Urhobo community of Otor-Edo, Ughelli South local government area of Delta State..
Our source who spoke on strict condition of anonymity revealed that the cause of the explosion was yet to be known but disclosed that seven persons have so far been confirmed dead, while several others sustained varies degrees of injuries..
Otor-Edo community and some neighbouring villages in Ughelli South LGA of Delta State was recently in the lime light due to activities of vandals who pitched their tent in the community for illegal refining business..
According to reports, the business thrived for some months in the area until the Nigerian Army and other security agencies overran the area, destroying all illegal tanks and other materials used by vandals..
With the destruction of equipments/tools such as locally constructed tanks, generators, holes, valves, welding machines and others which was said amounts to millions of naira, it was expected that it will put a stop to the business couple with incessant loss of lives due to fire outbreak..
But far from this, the business seems to thrive daily due to huge income.
Those involved benefit from it and as it was alleged to be the only source of livelihood for the youths in the region..
With the recent happenings, it is germane to say the hoodlums have regrouped despite security presence in the area..
Meanwhile, the surveillance unit of the NPDC has been accused of complicity with vandals as they cannot deny knowledge of what is happening in area they claim to be watching.
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window).
Itse Sagay, chairman of the Presidential Advisory Committee Against Corruption (PACAC), has faulted the supreme court for not basing its judgement on the validity of the Osun state governorship rerun election..
Sagay said although, the Supreme court did well to have nullified the decision of the election tribunal, it should have ruled based on whether the decision of the Independent National Electoral Commission was right to declare the poll inconclusive and subsequently held supplementary poll was accurate..
According to Sagay, disenfranchising voters based on electoral violence should be discouraged..
The lesson should be drawn home to everybody that all members of the tribunal or the court should be present before they can take part in a judgment, he said..
See Atiku Reaction To Adeleke's Supreme Court Loss.
When a judge has conducted a case 90 per cent, the judge that takes his place is not allowed to use the records, he has to start all over again.
That is the point the Supreme Cous making here, and I think I support the decision..
If there was violence or something was wrong and you are unable to vote, I donot know why it is something wrong in being allowed, on another day, to vote… I think the Supreme Court should have just completed that so that the issue would not arise again..
Ballot boxes have been carried away.
Even if you voted, your result cannot count and then INEC decides according to its guidelines to repeat election in such a place, what is wrong with that?.
I think the Supreme Court should have pronounced on that so that you donot have a situation where somebody would pre-judge the outcome of election by creating confusion in some areas where he is weak and then insisting that those people there should not have an opportunity to vote and then he wins by only allowing election in areas where he is strong; that is the whole idea of supplementary election so that everybody can have an opportunity.
I think the Supreme Court should have made a pronouncement on that; whether it is right or wrong..
LEARN How A Young Unemployed Graduate Makes 235K Monthly Online Legally, In This Recession Period.
Click Here!.
Zanu PF has, meanwhile, equated Sikhala's strong language to a coup plot, through the use of violence..
Youth league leader Lewis Matutu, said Sikhala's statements show that there is an attempt to effect a coup..
When a person says they want to overthrow a constitutionally-elected President, they are committing an offence and they are threatening a coup, this will not be allowed in this country.
We love our peace and it will be protected, he said..
The statements by Sikhala, a lawyer by profession, come as the MDC national executive meets for the first time this week since the elective congress in May before launching a roadmap to dealing with the political and economic problems bedevilling Zimbabwe..
The meeting is to map a definitive way on how to engage Mnangagwa and the Zanu PF-led government amid growing chorus from within the party for confrontation..
The party's standing committee last week resolved, among other things, to have a retreat for its first national executive to make decisions that will affect the party and the country..
Party spokesperson Daniel Molokele said the party will also put final touches on its transitional blueprint, Reload which details how the party would move the country forward..
The national executive will meet next week where we will make decisions on how to move the country forward, on the course of action that we have to take, we will also have to agree on issues involving our Reload document which we are also preparing to launch by next week, he said..
The MDC is bracing for demonstrations against government over high cost of living and skyrocketing prices..
Mnangagwa is confident, however, that polices put in place by Finance minister Mthuli Ncube have already started bearing fruit, insisting prices have already started falling..
MDC leader Nelson Chamisa, however, yesterday said it was demonic for the government to claim prices are falling at a time the Zimdollar is falling even on the interbank platform..
The government has been possessed by a demon, how can they say prices are going down?
I donot know which stores they are buying from, maybe they are buying from India or South Africa, maybe in Botswana, but here in Zimbabwe, in shops like OK, TM, Choppies, shops that we buy from as the majority, prices are not falling they are actually going up (and) everyone can see this, Chamisa said..
He said families were being torn apart owing to poverty and hunger in homes..
Marriages and families are suffering lack of love caused by these hardships.
Love can only be shared when people are living in peace and comfort.
We have seen high levels of poverty in Zimbabwe, he said..
The MDC leader said its supporters should be ready for action as they wait for a signal from its leadership..
Everyone should be ready for our signal.
They should be on standby.
When we call, you have to stand in your place once we call for action.
For now, we are trying to talk to Mnangagwa.
We are going to get to a point where we will start acting and when we act you will not guess..
We donot need third parties to talk on our behalf; this time (we are) going to make decisions that are very tough that will make our country progress.
We canot allow one person, who is feeding himself, to disturb the whole country, Chamisa said..
Still aggrieved by the July 2018 presidential results outcome, Chamisa said Mnangagwa was the main opposition in the country..
We are not the opposition, we are a party that leads, opposition is Mnangagwa, that's why you see he is the one who opposes people's earnings, their access to basic foodstuffs, their happiness, their peace.
He opposes this with such fierce energy that everyone can see his opposition stance.
We lead, we provide answers, he said..
Speaking at a rally in Glen Norah yesterday MDC deputy president Tendai Biti also said Mnangagwa was the worst leader in the country's history..
We are here at a time the economy is burning, at a time Zimbabwe is going through an unprecedented crisis, a man-made crisis of misgovernance.
He has failed this Emmerson Mnangagwa, in the history of governments that ran this country we have never had a government as worse, as incompetent, as clueless, as cruel as the government of Mnangagwa, he said..
Biti warned that the MDC has not taken to confrontation with the Mnangagwa regime because they were giving peace a chance, hoping that there will be dialogue to resolve the political crisis facing Zimbabwe..
The MDC is giving peace a chance, but we are coming for you and giving peace a chance is not a sign of weakness.
We are giving peace a chance because we donot want our people to be killed by an overzealous trigger happy militia controlled by Mnangagwa.
I use the word militia because I know genuine army, genuine police, genuine intelligence wonot shoot at people, he said..
The opposition has refused to take part in the ongoing political actors dialogue, saying it lacks the ingredients of a proper platform to solve the crisis of legitimacy which they say stems from a stolen election..
Biti said until and unless Mnangagwa agrees to a Sadc, African Union and United Nations underwritten dialogue, the opposition will take to the streets and confront the government..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
The Nigeria Customs Service (NCS), has clarified the story that has gone viral about an Assistant Superintendent of Customs, decked with the rank of a Deputy Comptroller- General (DCG) on Monday..
The man initially identified as Nura Dalhatu in earlier reports was not in the right frame of mind, the NCS spokesman said..
The Public Relations Officer of NCS, Mr Joseph Attah has now identified the officer as Nura Dahiru. .
(Also Read: https://www.pmnewsnigeria.com/2019/07/08/drama-customs-junior-officer-dalhatu-who-tried-to-topple-hameed-ali/).
Attah was reacting to the incident where one of the officers of the service declared himself as Comptroller-General and wanted to takeover on Monday at the Headquarters..
An anonymous source at the Customs headquarters in Abuja said Dahiru walked in on Monday morning wearing the new rank, and went into the office of Hameed Ali, the Comptroller-General, saying he was there to take over from him..
Attah dismissed the report on social media that the officer wanted to assume duty as comptroller-general, adding that there was nothing like attempting to takeover, but rather a case of mental challenge..
Nothing like attempting to takeover office, What happened was that an assistant superintendent of Customs came to the office wearing the rank of a Deputy Comptroller-General..
From questions and answers that followed, it was obvious that he was not in the right frame of mind, so a doctor was immediately invited..
He is presently under going medical examination at the medical unit of the service..
His picture is unfortunately going viral in the social media with a wrong narrative that he came to takeover office from the CGC.
This is not correct as it is just a pure medical case, he said. .
Durban North resident and close friends with the family, Kathryn Singery, has also been coordinating collection efforts for the family.
I'm overwhelmed at the support shown by the North Durban community for Lisa, Aaron and their children.
My phone's battery hasnot gone past 20 per cent because so many people have been contacting me hoping to help in whatever way they can.
Their generosity and kindness shown has been admirable, she said..
Contact Singery on 082 789 1057 if you'd like to help out..
Several collections points have also been set-up for the family including Corfield Logistics, Abrey Eco Park, 5 Abrey Road Kloof and the Pam Golding offices, 2 Swapo Road..
You can also follow us on .
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
The attack on the farm manager happened during an invasion of a 7,500 hectare farm, valued at more than R300 million. .
The Portfolio Committee on Agriculture, Land Reform and Rural Development has called for calm in Mtwalume, a settlement in Ugu District Municipality in KwaZulu-Natal, after a farm manager was hospitalised for injuries sustained during a farm attack in the area..
The attack on the farm manager happened during an invasion of a 7,500 hectare farm, valued at more than R300 million..
The committee said in a statement that alleged divisions within the Mathulini Communal Property Association (CPA) at Mtwalume over claims for the same land had led to the violence in the area..
There are sufficient provisions in the land reform process to deal with disputes and counter claims, chairperson of the committee, Nkosi Zwelivelile Mandela, said..
Such claims still have full recourse to procedural justice and other legal provisions.
We cannot condone acts of criminality as these do not advance the process of land reform or restitution.
Such vile acts are not only uncalled for, but also further diminish the integrity of claims or counter claims..
We appeal for calm and call for a criminal investigation into this incident so that the culprits may face the full might of the law, Mandela said..
While Mandela acknowledged that land restitution was highly emotive and tied to the trauma, pain and suffering arising from historic dispossession, he said that the violence could not be allowed to define the process that was intended to be restorative and healing..
It should engender reconciliation and social cohesion, instead, he said, and warned political parties not to use the conditions on the ground in communities for political mileage..
We appeal to all individuals and communities involved in land claims and restitution processes not to take the law into their own hands, regardless of the circumstances..
We urge for maturity as irresponsible statements and grand standing will only ferment a cycle of acrimony, criminality and violence..
We must do all in our power to stem illegal farm invasions and ensure that such acts of criminality do not derail the legitimate process of restitution, nor cause hardship and suffering to the rightful beneficiaries of such claims, Mandela said..
The committee said that the amendments during the fifth administration to the Communal Property Association Act gave government departments the capacity to intervene in conflicts within CPAs..
The Office of the Registrar of CPAs, envisaged in the amended legislation, will have adequate resources and capacity to make interventions and resolve conflicts which are often the reason for the existence of concerned groups within CPAs, the statement said..
It said that the 2019/20 budget would provide the means for the Department of Rural Development and Land Reform (DRDLR) to ensure that 443 CPAs were assisted to be compliant with the legislation, in terms of accountability, term of office for office bearers and upholding their respective constitutions..
The committee urges the DRDLR to ensure that this CPA – Mathulini CPA is included as a priority matter, and be assisted to resolve their issues..
It said it would follow up with the Minister of Agriculture, Land Reform and Rural Development to ensure that Mathulini CPA and others in a similar position are assisted to ensure their smooth functioning..
African News Agency (ANA).
For more news your way, download The Citizen's app for .
But for Iran's president, Hassan Rouhani, who signaled in May that he would order the country's engineers to cross both thresholds if Europe did not compensate Iran for American sanctions, the breach of the enrichment limit would be a watershed.
He is betting that the United States will back away from crushing sanctions or that he can split European nations from the Trump administration, which the Europeans blame for setting off the crisis..
If he is wrong, the prospect of military confrontation lurks over each escalation..
It is a back-to-the-future moment, said Sanam Vakil, who studies Iran at Chatham House, a research institute in London.
It has revived a vexing question that policymakers have grappled with for more than a decade: Is there a permanent way to stop Iran from developing the capability to build a nuclear weapon?.
In Israel, where Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu has often vowed never to allow Iran to acquire such a weapon, a member of his security cabinet said Tehran's announcement on Sunday means it is brushing off the red lines that were agreed..
It has begun its march, a march that is not simple, toward nuclear weaponry, the cabinet member, Yuval Steinitz, said in a television interview..
Yet paradoxically, some analysts and former officials argue, the experience of that deal falling apart may also increase the challenge of once again thwarting Iran's nuclear progress..
Aided in part by sanctions relief provided under the deal, Tehran has fortified itself.
Its nuclear facilities, especially a centrifuge center at Natanz, are surrounded by antiaircraft guns.
Its missile program has far more reach than it did previously, in part because a side agreement, negotiated at the time of the 2015 deal, weakened the wording on United Nations restrictions on Iran's missile program..
And the country's reach is greater: It has helped allied militias build up and dig in around the region, including in Lebanon, Syria, Iraq and Yemen, and those militias may in turn help Iran retaliate against the United States..
Its cybercorps, built after an American-Israeli cyberattack on the Natanz nuclear enrichment facility in the years before the 2015 accord, is capable of hitting American infrastructure — and has proved it with attacks on American banks..
You are probably going to see a few things go pop in the region over the summer weeks — like oil facilities being targeted, said Ellie Geranmayeh, who studies Iran at the European Council on Foreign Relations.
Iran may try to try to raise the cost not only for the Saudis and Emiratis, but also to try to raise the cost for Trump personally in the run up to his election, she said..
Mr. Trump, often caught between his desire to flex muscles and his aversion to another Middle East war, must now decide whether to negotiate, lower the sanctions pressure or consider military options..
Custom officer promotes himself walks into Hameed Ali's office for take over - PURE ENTERTAINMENT Custom officer promotes himself walks into Hameed Ali's office for take over.
A Nigerian Customs officer identified as Nuru Dahiru reportedly promoted himself from an assistant superintendent of customs, to the rank of deputy comptroller-general of Customs (DCG) and walked into his boss's office for take over..
According to reports, Dahiru walked into Hameed Ali's office on Monday morning to assume the office of Comptroller-General (CG) claiming he was directed by President Muhammadu Buhari..
The Cable siting a source, said; As he came in, officers were saluting him because he was wearing that rank,.
Sometime in May, Dahiru had posted on Facebook that he had been directed by the president to take over from Hameed Ali, and today when we saw him in the new rank, we thought, indeed, he has been promoted and so directed by the president.
He went inside the CG's office, sat in the waiting room, expecting the CG to handover to him..
Labour is poised to declare it will campaign for remain in a second referendum on any deal put to parliament by a Conservative prime minister, after trade union leaders including Unite's  backed a change of policy..
The joint position agreed by the unions on Monday would not commit Labour to an explicitly pro-remain position in all circumstances: unions also agreed Labour should seek to deliver a  deal if the party won an election before the UK left the EU..
That Labour deal would also be put to a public vote, but the party would not commit to campaigning for remain against its own Brexit deal, throwing into doubt what  would offer in any snap election manifesto..
One senior shadow cabinet source described it as a significant win for , despite the potential lack of clarity..
Unions have backed a referendum on any deal this parliament and Labour campaigning for remain – that's a big victory.
What's in a manifesto is a debate for another day, the source said..
Barring any major intervention, the surprise consensus among trade unions including , GMB, Unison, Aslef and Usdaw is likely to force any remaining sceptics to agree to the new position when the shadow cabinet meets on Tuesday..
Several shadow cabinet sources said the policy had the hallmarks of being approved by the Labour leader's office and said it would not be watered down – though some shadow ministers are likely to push for an even stronger position..
Labour's deputy leader, Tom Watson, who has regularly clashed with Jeremy Corbyn over the party's Brexit position, : Remain is who we are.
Our values are remain, our hearts are remain.
Today is a step in the right direction but members and supporters are clear that any kind of Brexit gives us less than we have now and Labour should not support it..
Union leaders had met on Monday to agree a common position on Labour's Brexit policy, in a meeting one source described as fractious but ultimately consensual..
The proposed policy, which will be offered to the Labour leadership as the unanimous view of the unions, will say:.
Labour will campaign for a second referendum in all circumstances and will campaign for remaining in the EU against a Tory prime minister's Brexit deal and in order to stop no deal..
A senior Labour source said Corbyn had not been present at the meeting but suggested it was a helpful outcome.
Jeremy has been working to unite the party and the wider Labour movement around a common position, the source said..
Union sources close to the talks said they did not want the position to be presented as an out-and-out victory for remain campaigners, saying the party would still have a chance to tell leave voters it would honour the result of the 2016 referendum by negotiating a Brexit deal if in government..
Ultimately everybody just wants this to end, one union source said.
It would be an error to let this drag on until conference and have the battle on the conference floor.
But it is right to reserve the position on a Labour-negotiated Brexit deal which could deliver the result of the 2016 referendum.
It would be mad to say we would negotiate a deal and then campaign against it..
One union source said the meeting had been lengthy but amicable and its purpose had been to find a consensus.
We are pleased and confident that everything is on the right road, the source said..
A briefing war has erupted over the past few weeks as some shadow cabinet ministers suggested senior Corbyn aides and union figures such as McCluskey were preventing the party moving to an explicitly pro-remain position or championing the change in party policy..
On Sunday, the shadow chancellor, John McDonnell, denied claims he had been urging Corbyn to sack his two most senior aides, Karie Murphy and Seumas Milne, because they were opposed to Labour committing to backing remain in a second referendum.. shifted its Brexit stance to propose that any Brexit deal passed by parliament should be put to the people in a second referendum, after the party suffered heavy losses to the pro-remain Liberal Democrats at the local and European elections..
Diane Abbott, the shadow home secretary, had previously said publicly she was beginning to worry about party policy not being sufficiently pro-remain..
Labour MPs at a private meeting of parliamentarians on Monday night expressed some caution about the new policy..
It is not exactly the absolute clarity we were hoping for, one MP said.
It sounds like we are reserving the right to campaign for remain against our own Brexit deal – that will just sound ludicrous to voters..
The party came under attack for the policy from both sides of the Brexit divide as the trade union agreement emerged.
The Conservatives called it an attempt to frustrate Brexit and ignore the democratic mandate to deliver it..
The Liberal Democrat Brexit spokesman, Tom Brake, said: Even now, after millions of remainers have deserted them, Labour manage only a fudge..
Iranian athletes will not compete against Israeli athletes in international competition, the head of Iran's national Olympic committee said. .
The statement comes ahead of the Judo World Championships in August.
In May, the International Judo Federation said it had reached an agreement with Iran to end its athletes' boycott of Israelis in competitions. .
Under the agreement, Iran's National Olympic Committee said it would fully respect the Olympic Charter and its non-discrimination principle, though it did not mention Israel by name.
Iranian judokas have forfeited matches against Israelis for decades. .
Get The Times of Israel's Daily Edition by email and never miss our top stories .
Despite the agreement, Syed Reza Salehi Amiri told the Fars News Agency that he told International Judo Federation chairman Marius Vizer that his athletes would not compete with Israeli athletes..
Israel's Sagi Muki celebrates after defeating Belgium's Sami Chouchi to win gold in the men's under 81 kg weight category during the European Judo Championship in the Israeli coastal city of Tel Aviv on April 27, 2018.
The Minority Caucus in the House of Representative has called on the Peoples Democratic Party (PDP) to rescind its decision on the suspension of Minority Principal Officers of the House..
At a news conference on Monday in Abuja, the caucus passed a vote of confidence on the suspended officers as well as Speaker, Mr.
The National Working Committee (NWC) of the PDP had on Thursday, July 4, suspended Rep. (PDP-Delta), who is the Minority Leader of the house..
The party also suspended Rep. (PDP-Enugu), the Deputy Minority Leader; Rep. (PDP-Kaduna), the Minority Whip, Rep. (PDP-Ogun), the Deputy Minority and two ranking members, Rep.  (PDP-Ogun) and Rep..
The PDP had earlier endorsed Rep.  (PDP-Rivers) as the Minority Leader, Rep.  (PDP-Anambra), Deputy Minority Leader, Rep.  (PDP-Kaduna) as Minority Whip and Rep. (PDP-Oyo) as Deputy Minority Whip..
Speaker of the House of Representatives, Hon.
Femi Gbajabiamila [twitter/@FemiGbaja] .
Speaking on behalf of the caucus, Rep. (PDP-Cross River) said that the selection of the officers was in conformity with the house rules and Order 7 Rule 8, which derives strength from section 60 of the 1999 Constitution as amended..
Quoting the rules, Idagbo said members of the minority parties in the house shall nominate from among themselves, the Minority Leader, Minority Whip, Deputy Minority Leader and Deputy Minority Whip..
Idagbo said that members of the minority parties adhered to the provisions of the rules in selecting Rep.
Ndudi Elumelu, as Minority Leader..
He said that the rule was also applied in selecting Rep.
Toby Okechukwu as Deputy Minority Leader, Rep.
Gideon Gwani as Minority Whip and Rep.
Adesegun Adekoya as Deputy Minority Whip..
He said that the Speaker, Mr Femi Gbajabiamila (APC-Lagos) was communicated by majority members of minority parties on July 2 and the decision which was announced on July 3, 2019..
Idagbo said that the parliament since 1999 had remained an independent body as it has not been coerced into accepting any leadership imposed by external influence..
We would like to appeal to our party chairman and the NWC of our great party, who we know are seasoned and experienced politicians that understand this dynamics to rescind their earlier decision to suspend our leaders..
Through no fault of theirs were nominated and elected by majority of members of the minority parties; were an offense to had been committed in this process, the perpetrators would be all 111 of us not six members as were suspended by our great party..
We use this opportunity to sue for peace and to state that we are available for further discussions with the NWC of our great party on how to resolve these issues and move our party forward,.
The caucus called on well meaning party leaders, particularly those with legislative experience to intervene in order to salvage the situation..
The lawmakers commended the National Chairman of the PDP, Mr  for the great job of piloting the affairs of the party that had seen its fortune increased in the last few years..
The caucus said it remained resolute to work closely with the national chairman and the party in ensuring that it returns to power in 2023. .
Share this on WhatsAppAll Progressives Congress (APC) governorship aspirant, Vice Admiral Jibrin Usman (rtd), has been postulating covertly and overly to some people about high powers backing his quest to become the next governor of Kogi State..
The narrative is that political juggernaut, Asiwaju Ahmed Tinubu has endorsed and adopted him as the candidate to succeed the incumbent, governor Yahaya Bello and this was facilitated by Abiodun Faleke..
We were however taken aback by what we saw earlier today when governorship aspirants that are ill-disposed to indirect primaries gathered at the APC National Secretariat for a protest.
Jibrin Usman was seen at the forefront of the protest, a scenario which is most baffling. .
The question now is: If Usman Jibrin has been anointed by Tinubu and Oshiomhole, and same has been impressed upon the APC in Kogi state, why is the erstwhile Naval Chief restless and protesting against the indirect primaries misadventure by the NWC?
Why is the Tinubu and Oshiomhole's 'anointed' candidate protecting, running from pillar to post on the guber ticket matter?.
If Admiral Usman Jibrin has been anointed to be Kogi's next governor and have been blessed by Tinubu and chosen by the powers that be in the APC, why is he on the streets of Abuja protesting?
Shouldnot he be rest assured of victory and unperturbed about the gimmicks of Yahaya Bello?.
It has become evident that the retired Admiral typifies hypocrisy, a very terrible disposition that will make him a worst governor than the incumbent if given the chance. .
Moreover, the retired Admiral is a very cheap propaganda merchant and dreaded traducer who has no truth as mendacity is his second nature and natural habitat.
We cannot be deceived anymore.
This self-acclaimed Tinubu and Oshiomhole's anointed candidate should leave the political scene and allow those who have better things to offer to continue..  a public affairs analyst, writes from Lokoja, Kogi State. .
Share this on WhatsApp.
L.G Workers Barricade Roads in Kogi Over Unpaid Salaries.
L.G Workers Barricade Roads in Kogi Over Unpaid Salaries.
Muhammad Gulani's response to my article, Osinbajo: Serial Liar, Buhari's Brain, Propagandist, Interpreter Of Buhari's Maladies published July 4, 2019, by SaharaReporters, is a figment of imagination as useless as dried-up springs or as mist blown away by the wind..
Gulani's defence of Pastor 'RUGA' Osinbajo portrays Gulani as a lying sicko full of empty rant with an appeal to twisted morbid reasoning..
I will not dignify the cow dung from Gulani by responding to every phantom of lies, probabilities, impossibilities, and pipe dreams dressed up as achievements of Vice-President Yemi Osinbajo.
However, one or two comments will suffice. .
Gulani's voice of mysterious import begins by saying, To think of the Vice-President as a liar and propagandist is to do a grave injustice to the truth itself, and to vex the millions of Nigerians that have benefited through the many ways his office has helped elevate people from poverty and unemployment….
He has chaired so well the National Economic Council: leading the team whose efforts took us out of a recession, brought upon the country from many years of mismanagement..
With deliberate deceit, Gulani conveniently tap-danced around lies oozed out by Osinbajo about endless kidnappings in Nigeria at a town hall meeting in New York.
Instead, Gulani cherry picked the case of a man who faked his kidnap in Nassarawa State.  .
Salivating and fully inebriated with concoction of lies, Gulani says: The administration has put in place the National Livestock Transformation Plan.
It is one of the most comprehensive plans that aim at ending the several decades long conflict, while looking at the economic benefits of the livestock rearing, and ensuring that there is proper conflict management and justice. .
Touting false, invisible paper achievements of Buhari-Osinbajo government, Gulani asked: Are the 500,000 N-Power beneficiaries not real people?
Or the over 2 million beneficiaries of the Trader Moni?
Or the 2nd Niger Bridge whose construction is evident for everyone to see despite the naysayers saying it wasnot real? .
I am a radical truth-teller in my writings.
Whenever  I sit at my desk to build another cathedral of paragraphs to stubbornly repudiate lies, half-truths, corruption, incompetence, impotence, of Buhari-Osinbajo administration, I do it with the zeal of an evangelist..
I'm not subjected to the whims and caprices of contemptuous Gulanis of the world who are against government of the people by the people and for the people. .
The few Nigerians who still retain their senses are no longer surprised by the mendacity of Buhari-Osinbajo sickening fabrications..
To put it mildly, Gulani's defence of the indefensible is an ugly self-flagellation.
Osinbajo has told Nigerians some memorable lies that have been spectacularly false and wrought grave harm.
Some of these lies have caused untold damage.
Indeed, such lies are responsible for unspeakable suffering, hardship, and even deaths of many Nigerians..
Because Nigerians have short memories, they have overlooked very many evil fabrications of the Buhari-Osinbajo regime. .
Consider the following: Osinbajo lied that APC didnot promise Nigerians restructuring.
He lied about the number of Nigerians in poverty during Jonathan's presidency.
He said 112.7 million Nigerians were in poverty under Jonathan. .
Whereas, United Nations and World Poverty Clock contradict Osinbajo. .
According to the two bodies,  87 million Nigerians are in poverty in 2018 under Buhari.
In addition, under Buhari, Nigeria has been declared the world poverty capital.
Another world body characterized Nigerians as the saddest people in the world. .
Osinbajo lied during the presidential town hall meeting.
He said the legislature did not send the Disability bill, Discrimination Against Persons with Disabilities (Prohibition) Bill, 2018 to the executive arm of government. .
The bill was sent to the president December 18, 2018. .
While speaking to the Arewa Consultative Forum (ACF) Osinbajo lied that the greatness of Nigeria is its diversity.
The opposite is true.
We all know for 58 years, the diversity of Nigeria has not translated into peace, progress, and prosperity..
How many jobs have been created by the office of Osinbajo?
Who are the faceless millions of Nigerians that were lifted from poverty?
It's amusing that Gulani as a researcher and political scientist doesnot know how to dig up the number of jobs that have been created by Osinbajo or Buhari..
Gulani must be talking about millions of young graduates who work as Okada commercial cyclists.
Or millions of poverty-stricken Nigerians trying to flee the country for better opportunities overseas. .
Gulani doesnot know when a country is in recession or out of recession.
A recession is when an economy declines significantly for at least six months with a drop in the following six economic indicators: real gross domestic product, housing, income, employment, manufacturing, and retail sales.
Going by these indicators, Nigeria has been in perpetual  recession.
And we're still in the doldrums! .
Talking about the National Economic Council (NEC), the NEC is as good as dead.
It has failed woefully to jumpstart the economy.
The impact of NEC on poor Nigerians is nil..
By the way, what is National Livestock Transformation Plan (NLTP)?
When was NLTP started?
How many Nigerians know what NLTP is about?
If NLTP was in place, why is Osinbajo and the spectator President Buhari trying to force RUGA down our throats?
Like all other  programs of Osinbajo-Buhari regime, NLTP is a fraud.
It's a scam.
Its nonsense!.
Gulani's rebuttal is a foolish distraction.
It's a depraved and convoluted piece.
It reads like narrative of madmen without specialists (apology to Wole Soyinka)..
No doubt, evil days are here: hunger, unemployment, homelessness, sickness, fear, insecurity, crisis, chaos, violence, killings, kidnappings, lawlessness have taken over the land.
Young ones are written off as lost generations. .
The country is growing apart and falling apart.
We should avoid the Gulanis of the world like a dissident stream in order to rebuild this lawless, hopeless, and God forsaken nation..
Senator Barnabas Gemade, immediate past Senator representing Benue North East, has said going to the Elections Petitions Tribunal to challenge the elections that brought in the immediate past governor of the state, Gabriel Suswam is one frivolity he does not wish to engage in..
Gemade, a former National Chairman of the Peoples Democratic Party (PDP) also said, considering his age, he cannot see himself going to court against persons much younger than him over an election at his level of service..
Speaking with newsmen in Makurdi on Monday, during a homecoming organised for him, said, I donot think it's my homecoming that should put a seal on my decision not to go to the tribunal.
I think you have a least 14 days to file your own petition at the tribunal if you are going there..
Since that time expired everyone should have known that I'm not one of those contestants going to the tribunal..
And the reason why I didnot go to the tribunal is that I do not need the law courts to compel my people to accept me as their representative; if there are other means by which people become representative of their people and it is acceptable to them let them have it..
Even if the election was rigged or even if it were by robbery that the election was taken, that is what God has allowed to happen at that material time and there is no reason why I should waste my time to challenge such an action; not because challenging it would lead to nothing; challenging it would lead to a lot, but, at this level of service and at my age, I donot think I should engage in these kinds of frivolities, especially with people who are much younger than me..
Citing an example in normal day life he said, Even those who do not do politics, in simple life, they say that a polygamist knows better who is the best wife; if you marry just one, you're stuck with her but if you marry more, then you know the difference..
Let them (electorate) have more senators so they can know the difference.
Maybe even the ones they had before me did not teach them enough on how a senator should be and they keep searching, so let them keep searching and maybe they will find a senator that is acceptable to them, to represent them at an appropriate time..
Download Daily Post App.
Subscribe to Daily Post Newsletter.
Send us enquiries, press releases..
The hitting driver fled the scene but was arrested along with his father when he arrived in a check point run by a reserve team later that night..
Initial interrogation shows the father of the driver wasnot in the car with him during the attack. .
Rescue forces received a phone call at 10:57pm Saturday saying that several people were wounded in a car-ramming attack. .
Magen David Adom paramedics said they arrived at the scene and treated one man in moderate condition, a 20-year-old woman in moderate condition and two 20-year-old men who were lightly wounded. .
Earlier Saturday night a Palestinian driver tried to run over a policeman near Hazofim Square in the Samaria region in the west Bank; no one was hurt, and the driver fled the scene.
Security forces initiated a search for the suspect but wasnot yet found. .
Slain JDF soldier was shot eight times at his birthnight party – Bes 100 FM Radio | Simply Da Bes!
Slain JDF soldier was shot eight times at his birthnight party.
The Jamaica Defence Force (JDF) soldier who was shot and killed by unknown assailants on Sunday morning in Clarendon, reportedly sustained eight gunshots in an attack that came at the end of his birthday celebrations with friends..
It was the second fatal shooting of a JDF soldier within recent weeks in the parish that has been under criminal siege for months..
Forty-seven-year-old Private Paul Lindsay was attacked at a sports bar in the Clarendon Park/Toll Gate area of the parish..
Reports are that a lone gunman entered the bar and fired multiple shots, eight of which caught Lindsay between the torso and knees..
He was later pronounced dead at the May Pen Hospital..
The soldier's licensed firearm was reportedly taken from his body by the attacker after the shooting..
Another JDF Private, Allan Oswald was shot dead, and two other persons injured in an attack on June 23 at Woodside in Clarendon, where the army man had reportedly gone to have repairs done to a motorcar..
BRUSSELS (Reuters)
- The European Union on Sunday strongly urged Iran to stop actions that would undermine a landmark 2015 nuclear deal, saying it was in touch with other parties to the deal and may set up a joint commission to look into the issue. .
We are extremely concerned at Iran's announcement that it has started uranium enrichment above the limit of 3.67%, spokeswoman Maja Kocijancic for EU foreign policy chief Federica Mogherini said in a statement.  .
We strongly urge Iran to stop and reverse all activities inconsistent with its commitments ...
We are in contact with the other JCPoA (Joint Comprehensive Plan of Action) participants regarding the next steps under the terms of the JCPoA, including a Joint Commission, she said. .
The JCPoA is the deal between Iran and the six powers. .
Reporting by Foo Yun Chee; Editing by Alexandra Hudson.
ATHENS, Greece (AP) — Conservative opposition leader Kyriakos Mitsotakis comfortably won Greece's parliamentary elections Sunday, delivering a stinging blow to leftist Prime Minister Alexis Tsipras after a tumultuous four years in office as the country struggled through a crippling financial crisis..
With more than 90% of votes counted, Mitsotakis' New Democracy party had 39.8% of the votes, compared to 31.5% for Tsipras' left-wing Syriza party..
The extreme right-wing  party, founded by neo-Nazi supporters, narrowly failed to make the 3% threshold needed to enter parliament — a huge fall of support for a party that had become the third-largest in the Greek legislature during the country's financial crisis..
The results indicated Greek voters bucked a recent trend in Europe of citizens rejecting the political mainstream and turning to populist and euroskeptic parties..
I asked for a strong mandate to change Greece.
You offered it generously, Mitsotakis said in his victory speech.
From today, a difficult but beautiful fight begins..
Trade within Africa has enormous potential.
Whether a new free trade zone on the continent will realize that potential is up to the more than 50 nations participating in it, writes DW's Claus Stäcker..
A friend of mine from Zimbabwe recently bought a used car.
After saving up enough money, he took advantage of a window of stable internet to browse and compare different models online.
He checked mileage, trunk size and fuel efficiency, then he finally placed an order — but not in Zimbabwe, nor even in neighboring South Africa, which has an established auto industry and a large used car market.
His dream car was in Japan, and the dealer in Yokohama quickly prepared the freight paperwork..
Soon to be the world's largest free trade zone.
A broker made sure the car landed in South Africa's largest port, Durban, a few weeks later.
To save on further shipping costs, my friend took a two-day bus to Durban.
After picking up the car, he drove the 1,700 kilometers (1,000 miles) back home.
He had to pay a few extra dollars to get the car's paperwork processed, because it was all in Japanese.
He also had to navigate his way through several road checkpoints.
Ultimately, he made it home — satisfied that, despite a few hiccups and extra red tape, he had still saved $800 (€713).
This is what doing business is like in the South African Development Community (SADC) trade zone..
Claus Stäcker heads DW's Africa section.
The SADC is one of five subregions that will form the new African Free Trade Area, known by the cumbersome acronym AfCFTA.
The African Union hailed the new trade zone as an historic achievement during an event in Niger on Sunday marking its launch.
The bloc was given a boost after Nigeria, which boasts Africa's largest economy, agreed to sign on..
The AfCFTA, which the African Union says will be the world's largest free trade area, has now been created — at least on paper.
Eritrea is the only country in Africa not participating..
Everyone wants to make rapid social and economic progress in Africa a reality, particularly as refugees leaving the continent continue to endure tragedy in the Sahara and on the Mediterranean Sea.
But it remains to be seen whether the AfCFTA can help make that dream a reality..
African trade dreams arenot new: As early as 1980, the African Union's predecessor, the Organization for African Unity, agreed on a plan for greater economic integration on the continent.
The Lagos Plan of Action, as it was known, not only provided for free trade, but even a .
Under Agenda 2063, the African Union's master plan to speed up development and economic growth, 14 major initiatives have been agreed in addition to free trade — including linking the continent's 54 national capitals by express trains.
But at the moment, many places in Africa lack adequate energy, transportation and telecommunications infrastructure.
At the borders, trucks line up for days on end.
It is easier to get from Africa to Europe by plane than between many countries on the continent.
Meanwhile, governments in Africa mistrust each other so much that they donot even recognize the African standard passport..
Domestic African trade negligible.
At just shy of 2.5%, Africa's share of world trade has remained unchanged for the past 20 years.
Its continental economic power is less than half the size of Japan's.
Economic growth has recently shrunk to 3% and is still primarily based on foreign trade in oil, gold, diamonds, precious metals and cocoa.
Intra-African trade in goods accounts for just 12% of trade volume.
This is where the greatest potential lies, because many products would be much more competitive within Africa than on the global trade market.
According to the Economic Commission for Africa, however, transport costs on the continent are the highest in the world.
Moving a freight container from Tokyo to the Ivorian capital of Abidjan costs roughly €1,300, while intra-African transport from Addis Ababa in Ethiopia to Abidjan costs €4,500 — more than three times as much..
The fact that a Zimbabwean would rather order a used car in Japan than buy a VW, Nissan or BMW built in Africa is proof of the current predicament.
African leaders may have celebrated their agreement in Niger, but its the concrete political steps they take that will show whether the AfCFTA is truly historic..
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
The Department of Petroleum Resources (DPR) in Ibadan said on Monday that it closed down 17 illegal LPG outlets in Ibadan and issued warning to nine filling plants in the second quarter of 2019..
Oluyemi Olaonipekun, the Operations Controller of Ibadan Field Office of DPR, disclosed this in Ibadan on Monday while speaking with newsmen..
Olaonipekun said the DPR carried out its operations effectively in monitoring the operations of Retail Oil Marketers (ROM), Liquefied Petroleum Gas (LPG) retailers and depot operators..
He said: The exercise is continous and we will continue to improve as well as carry out the necessary assignments as stipulated by the regulations and oil guidelines..
In the other two areas, LPG and filling stations, we have been able to curtail people selling at forecourt below the required volume being paid for by the motorists and other buyers to a greater extent in Oyo State..
To this end, we have not been able to close down any filling station due to unnecessary under-dispensing of the pumps..
The only area we had closed down filling station is where they have installed skid without our approval..
In the last three months, we have been able to stop illegal installation of LPG skid and closed down 17 illegally installed skid from operating within our area of operations, that is Oyo State..
To forestall future occurrence during our routine visit and surveillance, we have gathered data of illegal outfits and their gas suppliers..
We believe that if they had not been supplied gas they will not be able to sell or have the products..
We now have the data of the licenced legal operators who are supplying the illegal operators..
We have thereafter written warning letters to nine major LPG retailer plant owners; if they further supply any unlicensed, unapproved LPG site we will close down their own plants too..
The law gives us the power to do that based on the conditions in which they got their licences..
They have some responsibilities and duties to perform and if they fail, we have the power to suspend or revoke their licences..
He, however, disclosed that DPR was planning to meet with LPG plant owners and stakeholders..
The meeting, he said, would seek ways to curb unnecessary supply of products to unlicensed and unapproved sites..
We will also go out on a road show to sensitise people on how to safely handle and use LPG..
LPG is friendly if it is handled carefully, he said..
A prosecution witness, Afeez Bello, on Monday narrated how his father was killed by stray bullet, allegedly fired by a policeman, Emmanuel Uyanweke..
Uyanweke, a sergeant, is standing trial for killing a pedestrian with an AK47 rifle..
The policeman was arraigned by the Lagos State Government on Feb. 14 last year before an Igbosere High Court in Lagos on a charge of manslaughter..
On July 3, Bello, the first prosecution witness was led in evidence by the Prosecuting Counsel, Babatunde Sumonu..
Bello told the court that his father was on his way to see a friend when a stray bullet fired by Uyanweke killed him, noting that his father was shot opposite Southbound Hotel at Okokomiko in Ojo, near Lagos..
He said there was a fight at the hotel at the time the Uyanweke fired the shot which hit his father, who was passing by the hotel..
The witness said that his father died instantly, adding that his sister called him on phone and informed him about the incident..
He stated: When I got there, I found my father in a pool of blood..
At the resumed hearing, Bello who was cross-examined by the Defence Counsel, Pamela Okoro-Igwe, said he was not present when the police officer killed his father..
He said: But I was informed by my father's sister, Aminat Bello..
The witness said that his father was taken to a hospital at Okokomiko, where he was confirmed dead..
After listening to the evidence of the witness, Justice Adedayo Akintoye, adjourned the case until Oct. 16 for continuation of trial..
The prosecution had said that the defendant committed the offence on Aug.18, 2016 at 8.00 p.m. along White Street in Okokomiko..
The Lagos State Government had said that the defendant unlawfully killed one Adams Bello by shooting him in the chest with an AK47 rifle with registration No. 5070..
The offence contravened Section 227 of the Criminal Law of Lagos State, 2011..
Uyanweke, however, pleaded not guilty to the charge..
Among other aspects, they will receive information on how the Year´s Plan is going and the implementation of the budget, the actions to be taken and the to increase exports and monitor the collection of these, how the implementation of the new regulations for the self-employment work are taking place and will also learn about import substitution..
MEPs will debate the situation of public transport, the quality of the services in the tourism, the control and audit of the food basket and the state of e-commerce and e-government..
An issue as sensitive as the accidents on the road, the confrontation with those who drive under the ingestion of alcoholic beverages, will be addressed by the Legal Affairs commission, as well as related matters like compliance with tax law, and measures for those who do not pay on time and form their obligations to ONAT..
An update on policies to address demographic dynamics, and an analysis of the results of the controls and supervision carried out on the programs of Care for Infertile Couples and Cervical-Uterine Cancer, will be on the agenda of these parliamentary groups..
They will learn about the activities of the sports movement during the summer plan in the territories and what Cuba's performance is expected to be at the Pan American Games in Lima, Peru..
The Education, Culture, Science, Technology and Environment Commission will analyze the Task Life, that is, the program of the Cuban State and Government to face climate change, and the fulfillment of the Cultural Policy in the programming of radio and television, among other topics..
The program of this Third regular session corresponding to the 9th legislature includes work in committees until Wednesday 10, the accounts of the Ministries of Tourism and Industry will be on Thursday 11 and Friday 12, and the approval of the opinions of three legislative projects: the Electoral Law, the Law of Homeland Symbols and the law of Fishing..
The PIJ runs two kinds of camps - one purely military and another that encompasses a range of activities - each lasting around two weeks.
The organisation encourages media coverage..
A camp counsellor quoted by researchers said the purpose was to train a generation to fight the 'Zionist enemy' and a generation faithful to the Qur'an, in line with the teachings of PIJ founder Fathi Shaqaqi..
Drills at the military camp include how to raid an Israeli military outpost and capture one of its soldiers, and how to use machine-guns and other weapons, according to pro-Israel .
Other camps sponsored by PIJ offer cultural activities, entertainment, security lessons, marksmanship, and 'advice on the dangers of social networking sites and drug use', according to the magazine..
Tens of thousands of youngsters take part in the camps each year.
Activities include target practice, raiding Israeli outposts and how to operate machine guns.
As you can imagine, more people are reading The Jerusalem Post than ever before.
Nevertheless, traditional business models are no longer sustainable and high-quality publications, like ours, are being forced to look for new ways to keep going.
Unlike many other news organizations, we have not put up a paywall.
We want to keep our journalism open and accessible and be able to keep providing you with news and analysis from the frontlines of Israel, the Middle East and the Jewish World. .
As one of our loyal readers, we ask you to be our partner..
For $5 a month you will receive access to the following:.
A user experience almost completely free of ads.
Access to our Premium Section.
Content from the award-winning Jerusalem Report and our monthly magazine to learn Hebrew - Ivrit.
A brand new ePaper featuring the daily newspaper as it appears in print in Israel.
Customs Officer promotes self to Comptroller-General, asks Hameed Ali to hand over.
An Assistant Superintendent of Customs, Nura Dahiru, on Monday promoted himself to the rank of Deputy Comptroller-General of Customs (DCG), claiming he was directed by President Muhammadu Buhari to assume the office of Comptroller-General (CG)..
Sources at the Customs headquarters in Abuja disclosed that Dahiru walked in Monday morning wearing the new rank, and went into the office of Hameed Ali, the comptroller general..
As he came in, officers were saluting him because he was wearing that rank, one of the sources said..
Sometime in May, he had posted on Facebook that he had been directed by the president to take over from Hameed Ali, and today when we saw him in the new rank, we thought, indeed, he has been promoted and so directed by the president.
He went inside the CG's office, sat in the waiting room, expecting the CG to handover to him..
Spokesman of Customs, Joseph Attah, said Dahiru was not in the right frame of mind when he took the action..
What happened was that, an assistant superintendent of Customs came to the office wearing the rank of a Deputy Comptroller General, he said..
From questions and answers that followed, it was obvious that he was not in the right frame of mind, so a doctor was immediately invited.
He is presently undergoing medical examination at the medical unit of the service..
Dahiru should be promoted at least nine times to rise to the height of comptroller-general.
YAHOO YAHOO COMMENT: Your region produced 'biggest thief in world history', Omokri replies El-Rufai.
YAHOO YAHOO COMMENT: Your region produced 'biggest thief in world history', Omokri replies El-Rufai.
Following a comment credited to Kaduna State Governor, Nasir El-Rufai, where he said northerners should be proud for not being known for being convicted for 419 or being a Yahoo boy (internet fraudster), a former aide to former president Goodluck Jonathan, Reno Omokri has fired back, saying his (El-rufai's) region produced late Sani Abacha whom he claims is the biggest thief in the world..
Recall that El-rufai while speaking at the Northern Youth summit organized by Northern Hibiscus Initiative in Kaduna last Saturday, had said, We still have a lot to be proud of..
We should be proud of our culture and tradition, as well as unity.
You hardly can find someone from northern Nigeria convicted of 419 or being a Yahoo boy.
That is something we should be proud of..
We are generally considered to be more honest and less corrupt than other Nigerians.
That is something we should be proud of..
But in a swift response, Omokri told the governor to cover his face in shame, especially as his region leads the world record in looting, stealing and other crimes that were perpetrated by late Gen. Sani Abacha..
He also reminded El-rufai that the northern region also produced the biggest thief emanating from civil service..
His words: In response to the above comments, I say to Nasir El-Rufai that before you label Southerners as Yahoo Yahoo people and fraudsters, do note that the biggest thief in world history is Sani Abacha.
Yet, a stadium is proudly named after him in Kano..
Two PDP govs have concluded plans to hand over S'East land to herdsmen.
This is a man who stole in excess of $5 billion.
21 years after his death, Abacha is still sending credit alert to Nigeria, though General Buhari said 'Abacha never stole'..
Furthermore, the biggest thief in Nigeria's civil service history is Abdulrasheed Maina, whom General Buhari secretly recalled, reinstated and double promoted..
Finally, let me conclude by saying before you label Southerners as corrupt and fraudulent people, note that both you and General Buhari campaigned for the re-election of a man shown on video stuffing bribes in his babanriga..
You, Nasir El-Rufai, not Southerners, deserve the label of dishonesty that you tried to pin on us.
Thieves do not have a particular tribe or religion.
8 years ago, I said 'The difference between Nigerians is not North and South.
The difference between Nigerians is between the good and the bad'..
It is left to Nigerians to decide in which category you, Nasir El-Rufai, a man who paid herdsmen after they killed his people, fall..
I know that you are still smarting from the RUGA rejection , but that please, do not take out your anger on the long suffering people of Nigeria..
Arrival of S-400s is in preparation process: Erdoğan.
Preparations for the arrival of Russia's S-400 air defense systems are proceeding on schedule, Turkish President Recep Tayyip  said on July 8, without elaborating on definite arrival date..
Right now, the preparations for the arrival continue.
It would be right if you do not push us on a precise date.
The shipping is still proceeding.
There are also certain dates [on which] we came to terms with [Russia],  said ahead of his visit to Bosnia Herzegovina, where he will attend the two-day South-East European Cooperation Process (SEECP) summit..
's Defense Ministry and the General Staff are in charge of planning the settlement, location and deployment of the S-400s, the president stated.. [The Defense Ministry and the General Staff] are making the plans right now to present us, he said..
Following the final planning of the authorities, all of the S-400s will be deployed to the determined location and will arrive in .
We hope for this to be beneficial to our country, our region and the world, he said..  on June 8 said that  and Russian President Vladimir Putin discussed the delivery of S-400s by phone on July 6, conveying that the deal process is in its implementation phase..
When asked for details of the process,  spokesperson Dmitry Peskov said he could not share that information..
It is in the phase it needs to be.
It is not possible for me to convey more detailed information, Peskov said..
Tensions between the United States and  have reached a fever pitch in recent months with Ankara set to begin receiving the advanced surface-to-air missile system this month..
In response to the deal, the United States has already suspended deliveries of parts and services related to 's purchase of multi-million dollar F-35 fighter jets..
Following protracted efforts to purchase an air defense system from the United States with no success, Ankara decided in 2017 to purchase Russia's system..
U.S. officials later asked  to buy the U.S. Patriot missile system rather than the S-400 system, arguing that the Russian-made system would be incompatible with NATO systems and expose the F-35 to possible Russian subterfuge..  has emphasized that the S-400 would not be integrated into NATO operability and would not pose a threat to the alliance..
Ankara said that it was Washington's initial refusal to sell the Patriot missile system that led it to seek other offers, adding that Russia offered a better deal that included technology transfers..
The police on Monday arraigned a senator, Elisha Abbo in a Zuba Chief Magistrates' Court, Abuja, for allegedly assaulting a nursing mother..
INEC Chairman Vows To Open Up Over Server Controversy.
The Chairman of the Independent National Electoral Commission (INEC), Prof. Mahmood Yakubu, has said he will address the server controversy that trailed the 2019 general elections, after the Presidential Elections Tribunal..
Atiku Abubakar, who contested on the platform of the Peoples Democratic Party), had dragged the winner and incumbent president, All Progressives Congress) before the tribunal..
According to Atiku, INEC's server shows he defeated Buhari in the polls..
Yakubu has now advised interested Nigerians to go and read the statements on oath by the petitioners and the defendants, to have a full grasp of the issues surrounding the controversial server..
The INEC chief spoke at the conclusion of a session on the review of the 2019 General Elections with the media in  during the weekend..
Responding to a question, he said:.
In our jurisprudence, you cannot comment on a live matter in court.
The matter is subjudice but after the judgment, I will speak on the server issue..
There are a lot of documents you have not got.
There are statements on oath by the petitioners and the defendants.
Go and read these statements on oath.
It is actually prudent to go back and read the statements..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
If we distribute an alert to a very wide area, we create a number of problems.
We'd lose public confidence.
If every time a rocket is fired at Sderot I'd alert the whole of the Negev, or the entire Gaza border region, people would eventually lose confidence in the system, stated Maman.
They'd give up and stop listening to the alerts.
They'd conclude that it's not relevant to them, and they'd start to become complacent..
By being more accurate, the new targeted alerts not only ensure more willingness by civilians to heed the message and take cover, they also allow for many areas of the country not under threat to pursue routine activities, even during national emergencies..
Under the Home Front Command's regulations, civilians must remain in secure zones for 10 minutes after an alert, due to the threat of shrapnel that can fall long after an initial rocket impact.
This is particularly true in cases of interceptions of incoming projectiles by the Iron Dome air-defense system..
If large parts of the country, including hospitals, military industries and military bases, have to shut down for 10 minutes again and again, the net result would cause significant harm to the state's ability to function and to national resilience, explained Maman..
Under such a scenario, the country would have to spend most of the time that combat takes place in a protected area.
The opposite scenario would be civilians who, during emergencies, continue to pursue routine activities as much as possible—business, education.
They have a 'contract' with the state—when they are in danger, we will alert them, he said..
An Iron Dome anti-missile battery near the northern Israeli town of Haifa.
Photo by Avishag Shaar Yashuv/ Flash90..
'We only activate the relevant areas'.
The expansion of alert areas to 1,700 marks a milestone from 1991, when the whole of Israel formed a single alert area.
Sirens nationwide went off every time Iraq fired Scud missiles at Israel.
Iraq fired 39 missiles at Israel during the 1991 Gulf War..
The Home Front Command soon concluded that it needed to divide the country into more specific alert areas.
One area turned into 10, and then, by 2006, 25.
When the Second Lebanon War broke out that year, every rocket flying from Lebanon flying to the Galilee resulted in an alert to the whole of the Galilee.
Looking back, this reality was incomprehensible.
Hence, we continued to divide new areas until we got to 255 in 2015, recalled Maman..
Yet that number still meant that too many areas that were not under imminent rocket threat faced disruption, as was the case during the 50-day conflict with Hamas in Gaza in the summer of 2015..
We see that rocket barrages are getting more intense, said Maman.
Three weeks ago, we issued 850 alerts within just two days, he said, referring to the latest escalation with Gazan terrorist factions.
It doesnot take a security expert to know that if we throw in an additional front—the north—then this threat increases.
So we saw that 255 areas were not enough.
These areas were still too big..
The breakthrough came when the Home Front Command moved from an analogue system to an IP-based digital system, giving every siren its own IP address and separate activation channel..
Now we only activate the relevant areas.
This is how we upgraded the number of alerts to an almost unlimited number, he added..
A city like Rishon Letzion, with more than 240,000 inhabitants, has now been divided up into central neighborhoods, meaning that most of the city could continue as normal even if a rocket was heading towards it..
We could divide cities into even more alert areas.
But we did not want too many areas to avoid making the alerts too precise and informing the enemy about their firing, said Maman..
In addition, the Home Front Command simplified its messaging, giving the alert areas clear names when it sends out messages through media, rather than the older and more confusing system that used numbers..
On June 10, hours after the new system went into effect, Palestinian terrorists fired projectiles at Israeli communities near Gaza in the late hours of the night.
The result was that one kibbutz, Nirim, received an alert, while the adjacent Kibbutz Ein Hashlosha slept through the incident as if nothing happened, even though the community next to them was in danger, said Maman..
The IDF Home Front Command and Ichilov Hospital workers participate in a drill of evacuating and treating wounded in an earthquake scenario, outside the Ichilov Hospital in Tel Aviv, on Nov. 9, 2017.
Photo by Hadas Parush/Flash90..
Preparing for earthquake emergencies as well.
The Home Front Command is also preparing for other threats, such as earthquakes, in which civilians should do the opposite of what they do in rocket attacks and run outside..
Working with the Geophysical Institute of Israel, the Home Front Command is creating a network of 120 seismic sensors around the Syrian-African Fault Line that runs down the Jordan Valley.
As soon as they detect an earthquake, they can compute where it will cause an impact, and the Home Front Command hopes to distribute alerts accordingly, said Maman..
The alerts will not be as selective as projectile attacks since an earthquake can influence half a country.
The Home Front Command is creating a separate earthquake alert, in which speakers will omit a verbal earthquake announcement, rather than sounding the well-known rising and falling siren..
Depending on where they live, civilians could have between five to 15 seconds to vacate buildings, in a situation in which every second counts.
That could still save hundreds or thousands of lives..
Fifteen seconds is a time period that should be familiar to civilians living near the Gaza border, as this is how long they  have to take action when the rocket alert sounds.
As Maman stated, when people are trained, it saves lives..
Going by numerous recent news reports, we have good reason to be worried about the state of food safety in the country.
One would think it's a miracle that a full-blown public health crisis hasnot broken out yet, especially since even staple foods are clearly not safe.
Lead and pesticides have been found in milk, and poultry feed has been found to be laced with antibiotics, among a host of contaminated food products being sold in the market.
What is so concerning is that the problem seems to have ballooned to biblical proportions and it is hard to even wrap one's head around the entire debacle..
One thing, however, is clear: our right to safe food is among a long list of casualties in the absence of the rule of law.
But here's the thing: unlike many other rights violations and malpractices that we regularly turn a blind eye to and simply wish away, food adulteration isnot something that we can easily ignore without risking our health and wellbeing.
Nothing can be a greater danger to public health than the presence of adulterants, potentially at a mass scale, in the food we eat.
And the fact of the matter is that we continue to be in the dark about the extent to which the food we are routinely consuming is contaminated..
Since the beginning of this year, hordes of news reports have emerged that once again reflect the sorry state of food safety in Bangladesh.
Take poultry for example.
A report in January claimed that the government banned the import and sale of meat and bone meal (MBM), a kind of poultry feed, which can cause anthrax, antibiotic resistance and cancer.
MBM was banned in many countries including India, which banned it in 2001, and the EU in 1994.
Apart from MBM, various types of antibiotics in almost 50 percent poultry feed samples of 14 brands collected from four districts were also found by a government study.
This is beyond concerning because we derive a large part of our protein intake—36 percent, according to the fisheries and livestock ministry—from poultry.
It goes without saying that the presence of MBM and antibiotics in poultry feed samples could spell disaster for public health in ways beyond our imagination..
The government must have figured out by now that mere bans on paper do not work.
After all, the use of antibiotics in poultry feed is banned and even import of MBM containing harmful elements is illegal.
But traders have been quite successful in importing both antibiotics and MBM in large quantities, intended for use in poultry feed, under the nose of the very same customs authorities that are now somehow expected to enforce the ban.
There is, of course, no guarantee that will ever happen..
Most of the country's institutions and sectors have already been done irreparable damage due to the immoral actions of a handful of people driven by the sole motive of profit.
The food sector is no different.
The routine use of harmful substances such as MBM and antibiotics in poultry feed, for example, is due to their cheapness and because they help ensure low mortality and good growth of chickens, which basically translates to lower production costs for traders.
And who's going to stop them?
The poultry industry is, after all, very lucrative and is a source of livelihood for millions.
According to a United States Department of Agriculture report, one million entrepreneurs and eight million people are involved in Bangladesh's poultry sector and commercially produce 10.22 billion eggs and 1.46 million tonnes of poultry meat annually..
If the poultry industry is a microcosm of the state of food safety in the country, the picture couldnot get any scarier.
It seems like no food product in the market is immune to contamination.
A Dhaka University study found detergent (yes, you read that right) and antibiotics for humans in packaged milk in kitchen markets and grocery shops.
Some of the most trusted brands—which regularly bombard us with advertisements that bank on their top quality—are also guilty of playing havoc with food safety.
The same DU study found nine other food items manufactured by some of the top brands miserably failing the Bangladesh Standards and Testing Institution (BSTI) standards.
These products include everyday essentials such as , turmeric powder, dry chilli powder, and palm oil..
All this makes you wonder: what have the regulatory bodies been doing all this time?
What is to explain the utter failure of the BSTI, Bangladesh Food Safety Authority (BFSA), and relevant ministries (food, agriculture, livestock and fisheries, industries) in putting a halt to food adulteration all these years—a problem which has now mushroomed beyond control?.
The shortage of skilled manpower and equipment is a major problem.
BFSA Chairman Mohammad Mahfuzul Hoque, in an interview published in this daily last year, said: Some of them [laboratories for food tests] have equipment but not skilled manpower, while some have manpower but not good equipment.
The lack of accredited laboratories is also one of a long list of issues in the process of identifying adulterated food products and taking action against manufacturers; this essentially means that tests done by unaccredited laboratories are dismissed out of hand by businesses.
Clearly, many of these institutions that we depend on for oversight of the food industry are far from well-equipped or well-staffed.
For proper food safety management, what's required is a large pool of highly skilled manpower which Bangladesh has consistently been facing a shortage of in many important sectors, including RMG.
Shortage of manpower also means that it is extremely hard, if not impossible, to maintain constant monitoring which is essential in a country like Bangladesh, where many companies, after receiving the BSTI certificate, carry out operations violating every word in the rulebook.
BSTI certificates, therefore, do not necessarily mean that the product(s) the company is manufacturing is safe..
Lack of capacity aside, some recent, very curious developments should make us sit back and think deeply.
In May, a High Court order asked the BSTI, BFSA, and the Directorate of National Consumer Rights Protection (DNCRP) to recall 52 adulterated food products from the market (as revealed by a BSTI report).
Even a HC order, however, couldnot prompt all of them into action.
In the same month, the HC summoned the BFSA chairman for failing to recall the 52 products.
(It is to be noted though that the court, however, expressed satisfaction with the compliance report submitted by DNCRP which said it had conducted drives at markets almost all over the country and confiscated substandard and adulterated food items, and BSTI cancelled licences of seven food companies that featured on the list of the 52 products.)
What is so disappointing is that this is not the first time the authorities have been unable to recall bad products.
But here's the real shocker: the BSTI, a month after it released the report outlining the substandard products, magically found most of the 52 products to pass the standards in a retest..
This fiasco only goes to show that we need, more than ever, independent researchers to step up and carry out tests on food samples in the market and disseminate the results in a transparent manner.
Because right now, as the above incidents show, there is a dearth of reliability and confidence in tests being carried out by government bodies whose results are only creating confusion and chaos..
For years now, countless surveys and studies have been exposing the levels of contamination in the food we eat.
And for years, we have seen little to no progress in reining in businesses and traders who have been making a mockery of food safety and people's health and wellbeing.
In the midst of this miserable state of affairs is the lack of consumer rights and awareness, which means that there is very little likelihood of the consumers protesting the harmful products flooding the market..
It is a travesty that our right to safe food, a basic right, is being trampled upon despite the consumers picking up the tab for higher food prices year after year with no guarantee of improved quality.
As food producers remain determined about safety practices not cutting into their profit margins and as weak regulatory bodies remain helpless and powerless in the face of malpractices in the sector, we, the consumers, will eventually end up paying the steepest price when all this comes to a head..
Nahela Nowshin is a member of the editorial team at .
Farmers in Asa local government of Kwara state under the National Fadama Development Project have lauded the Kwara State Governor, Abdulrahman Abdulrasaq for the payment of counterpart fund for FADAMA projects in Kwara state..
In a statement issued Monday by the Chairman of FADAMA farmers in Asa, Alhaji Isiaka Salala and the Secretary, Alhaji Raheem Atanda, the local farmers described the gesture as a step in the right direction and an astute move by the present administration to promote agriculture in Kwara state..
While explaining that past administrations have paid lip service to agricultural development in Kwara, farmers in Asa local government said Governor Abdulrasaq's move has proved his readiness to grow the sector as being demanded by the farmers..
Commending him for the gesture and assuring him of the farmers support always..
They also expressed hope of an equitable and beneficent return as well as other efforts targeted at making Kwara an agricultural hub in Nigeria..
Governor Abdulrasaq had last week approved immediate payment of about fifty million naira as counterpart funds for FADAMA project in Kwara..
An initiative of the World Bank, FADAMA is a project that seeks to empower local farmers with some funds to boost their production of staple foods like rice, cassava and sorghum in irrigable land area..
Join our twitter community : .
Follow @royaltimesng.
The government is too self-centred to worry about anything outside of their doors. .
If it is going to cost them money, they donot care.
They have no interest in children at all..
Norman's grandson Joshua, 13, says there is huge pressure to fit in and have the latest technology..
If you donot have a phone or electronics, you get called poor, he says..
I have a phone - but if people see me with it, everybody says it is terrible and that I need a new one..
He also says watching the news is never lovely and admits he worries about adult issues..
Almost every day they talk about warming and the oceans, he says, it's in every assembly. .
It adds that bit of pressure on all of us because we feel like we need to help out but we donot know how..
His stepfather, Edd Williams, says a childhood with access to the internet means there is so much more control over their opinions..
It used to be going to school was the way you introduced your kids to the world - but as soon as they can work a mouse or use the internet, the floodgates are completely opened on them. .
There is no gradual introduction - it's explosive. .
Action for Children's chief executive, Julie Bentley, says the country is sleepwalking into a crisis in childhood..
For the past decade, the government has been asleep on the job when it comes to investing in our children, she says..
The next prime minister must wake up to this growing crisis and put our children first. .
We want to see the establishment of a national childhood strategy, so departments right across government can get a grip on these issues, backed with funding to deliver urgently needed services to keep children safe from harm..
How has the government responded?.
Education Secretary for England Damian Hinds said: Although in many ways this is the best time yet to be young, I certainly recognise the pressures and worries young people feel. .
Growing up has never been easy, but technology and social media can exacerbate the need to fit in and the perception of others' perfect lives, as well as make it harder to leave being bullied behind at the school gates. .
But we are equipping young people for adulthood in a changing world, by identifying mental health problems and providing support in schools, encouraging young people to gain resilience and skills through activities such as sport and music, and teaching young people in school how to navigate the online world safely and constructively..
The government was also giving young people a voice in the issues they care about, he added..
The TEF-UNDP Sahel Youth Entrepreneurship Programme, which is expected to mobilize support for businesses, aims to generate millions of new jobs and contribute at least $10 billion in new annual revenues across Africa..
This was announced today at the 12th Extraordinary Session of the Assembly of the African Union (AU), where TEF Founder, Tony Elumelu and UNDP Regional Director for Africa, Ahunna Eziakonwa joined African Presidents at the African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA) Business Forum, where the agreement was signed.
The President of Niger, H.E Mahamadou Issoufou joined UNDP and TEF to launch the programme..
The partnership will target young Africans in under-served communities, starting with the Sahel, given the region's opportunity as the youngest population in the world with 194 million people under 25 years of age (64.5% of the total population).
The TEF-UNDP Sahel Youth Entrepreneurship Programme will be implemented through TEF's flagship Entrepreneurship Programme, which has already benefited 7,520 local entrepreneurs across 54 African countries in just five years of existence.
Similarly, the programme builds on UNDP's YouthConnekt initiative.
The aim is to increase job creation through dynamic entrepreneurship and create sustainable economic growth that anchors the development of communities and states..
Speaking on the partnership, Ms. Ahunna Eziakonwa, Assistant Secretary-General and UNDP Regional Director for Africa stated that: We see Sahel as a land of many opportunities and investing in the youth is a pre-condition to stabilizing the region.
The youth should be at the heart of any development agenda.
We need to invest in their potential, talent, energy and enthusiasm and create the opportunity for them to fully realize their dreams.
That is why UNDP is co-creating development solutions by investing in entrepreneurship models to promote inclusive growth.
Partnership with the Sahelian youth entrepreneur is a catalyst for transformation and sustainable development.
We call on other private sector entities to join the Tony Elumelu Foundation to support young entrepreneurs..
On her part, CEO of the Tony Elumelu Foundation, Ifeyinwa Ugochukwu said: Our partnership with UNDP is welcome and timely – it will directly assist entrepreneurial success in a number of fragile areas and is a testament to the validated approach to philanthropy we have pioneered.
Africa needs partners that do not only believe in the potential of its private sector to champion economic development, but backs this with commitment.
With this agreement, UNDP has proven to be a true partner to Africa's entrepreneurs and has demonstrated its commitment to work with us to scale up the impact of this initiative and eliminate poverty on the continent..
The TEF-UNDP programme is fully aligned with the 1 Million by 2021 Initiative of the Chairperson of the African Union Commission, His Excellency Moussa Faki Mahamat.
Launched in April at the AU Headquarters in Addis Ababa, the 1 Million by 2021 Initiative aims to concretely reach 1 million African youth from across the continent with opportunities and interventions in the key areas of Education, Entrepreneurship, Employment and Engagement (4Es) to accelerate Africa's socio-economic development..
The Chairperson of the AUC speaking at the launch of the 1 Million by 2021 initiative said: The1 Million by 2021 initiative is an African call to action that aims to ensure that no young persons aged 15-35 is left behind.
The initiative adopts a Pan-African outlook and facilitates strategic partnerships to open up new opportunities for young people on the continent…The AU has the expertise, convening power and continental reach at our disposal but that alone cannot guarantee success.
We need commitment from our public and private sector partners to achieve success.
In the face of our overwhelming task, a collective effort is necessary to stand and succeed.
In Africa, we say, 'Broomsticks bound together are difficult to break.
This is the approach that I implore us to take..
Through the TEF-UNDP partnership, the selected applicants will each receive a maximum of $5,000 non-refundable seed capital, access to mentors, a 12-week business training and networking opportunities.
They will join the previously announced 3,051 beneficiaries of the 2019 cohort of the TEF Entrepreneurship Programme..
The applications will be run on TEFConnect, the largest digital networking platform for African entrepreneurs and forms will be available in any of the branches of the United Bank for Africa (UBA).
Following the end of the application window, an initial longlist of 5,500 applicants will be selected to undergo the 12-week business training.
After the training, the final shortlist of 2,000 applicants will be announced to join the previous 2019 TEF cohort.
###. For media enquiry, please contact:.
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
PORT OF SPAIN, Trinidad, Monday July 8, 2019 – Trinidadian jurist Peter Jamadar will officially sit on the Caribbean Court of Justice (CCJ) bench from July 15 to succeed Justice David Hayton who will be retiring from the Court after 14 years of service..
His appointment was announced by the CCJ last Friday, a day after he was sworn in by Trinidad and Tobago President Paula Mae-Weekes last Thursday..
Justice Jamadar said he was proud and humbled by his appointment. .
For any Caribbean jurist or legal practitioner, one of the pinnacle achievements must be, to sit as a judge of the CCJ.
It is at once an office of great status and of even greater service, he said..
It is with great pride and humility that I take my seat on the CCJ.
It is my hope that I will unwaveringly follow the ethical dictates of my oath, and do justice to all who seek it before this court. .
CCJ President Justice Adrian Saunders, noted during the ceremony that Justice Jamadar's appointment marked the culmination of a competitive process, conducted by the Regional Judicial and Legal Services Commission, the independent body responsible for selecting and appointing staff of the Court. .
He pointed out that the Commission did not only consider the respective qualifications, experience and skill sets of the applicants. .
As mandated by the Agreement Establishing the CCJ, the Commission was also obliged to consider the applicants' moral character, their intellectual and analytical ability, the soundness of their judgment, their integrity, and their understanding of people and society, he said..
The CCJ president welcomed Justice Jamadar to the regional court, noting that his judgments are erudite and well-reasoned.
They demonstrate a high intellect, a deep understanding of Caribbean society, and an abiding sense of fairness.
Unsurprisingly, several of these judgments have been cited with approval by judges of both the CCJ and the Judicial Committee of the Privy Council..
Justice Jamadar previously served as a Judge of the Appeal Court of Trinidad and Tobago.
He is the Vice President (Programming) and a Faculty member of the Commonwealth Judicial Education Institute (CJEI) and Vice-Chairman of the Caribbean Association of Judicial Officers (CAJO).
He is also a certified Transpersonal Psychologist and a certified Mediator.
He has written two books and numerous articles and authored various publications relating to law..
The CCJ was inaugurated on April 16, 2005.
It functions as both a municipal court of last resort (in its appellate jurisdiction) and an international court with compulsory and exclusive jurisdiction in respect of the interpretation and application of the Treaty of Chaguaramas (in its original jurisdiction).
Only Barbados, Belize, Dominica and Guyana have so far signed on to the court's appellate jurisdiction and replaced the Privy Council with the CCJ as their final appeal court..  to receive news via email from Caribbean360.
The British government is hunting for the source of a leak of diplomatic cables that branded President Donald Trump's administration dysfunctional and inept..
UK officials are embarrassed by the publication of unflattering assessments made by Kim Darroch, the country's ambassador in Washington – but more alarmed that sensitive confidential information was leaked, possibly for political ends..
The leaked cables were intended for senior UK ministers and civil servants, and officials said they believe the mole will be found among British politicians or officials, rather than overseas..
I've seen nothing to suggest hostile state actors were involved, said Prime Minister Theresa May's spokesman, James Slack..
The inquiry is being led by civil servants in the Cabinet Office, and Slack said police would only be called in if evidence of criminality is found..
It's possible the leaker could be charged with breaching the Official Secrets Act, which bars public servants from making damaging disclosures of classified material.
Breaching the act carries a maximum sentence of two years in prison, though prosecutions are rare..
Foreign Secretary Jeremy Hunt said there would be very serious consequences if the culprit was caught, adding the ability to communicate frankly was fundamental to diplomacy..
Slack said May had full faith in Darroch, a long-serving diplomat, although she didnot agree with his characterisation of the Trump administration..
He said ambassadors were hired to provide honest, unvarnished assessments of politics in the countries where they serve, which didnot necessarily reflect the views of the British government..
I'm sure the British government expect this sort of candour in diplomatic cables; the British public pays for exactly this sort of candour to inform political judgements, but it is supposed to be secret, said Al Jazeera's Jonah Hull, reporting from London..
Of course, they will hope to try to put a lid on this; it comes at an extremely sensitive time in British politics.
Theresa May is about to leave office and the people vying to be her replacement, Boris Johnson and Jeremy Hunt, will be making Brexit a priority – after which the 'special relationship' with the United States will take on even more significance..
In the leaked cables – published in the Mail on Sunday newspaper – Darroch called the Trump administration's policy towards Iran incoherent, said Trump might be indebted to dodgy Russians, and raised doubts about whether the White House will ever look competent..
We donot really believe this administration is going to become substantially more normal; less dysfunctional; less unpredictable; less faction-riven; less diplomatically clumsy and inept, one missive said.—Al Jazeera..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
In Abiy's Ethiopia, the ethnic brigades in pursuit of further fragmentation along ethnic lines, are working overtime to solidify and entrench themselves while his government is persevering to diffuse the poison of ethnicity and re-orient the country towards an inclusive pan-Ethiopian polity.
The ethnic elites across the country (TPLF, OLF, Sidama LF?) are aligning themselves in overt and covert ways to thwart any attempt by Abiy, his supporters and the Ethiopian people in general to make the country livable and governable.
On the one hand, Abiy with his inclusive politics strives to make the whole of Ethiopia a nation for all its citizens, irrespective of linguistic and cultural backgrounds.
The ethnic entrepreneurs, on the other hand, want ethnic and linguistic differentiations to get accentuated even further, deeper and broader.
The current ethno-linguistic federation, they argue, should be loosened to a confederation, just shy of a tiny jump to an ethnically pure, mono-lingual, mono-cultural sovereign nation-state, which needless to say is their original intent in the first place..
It's in this light that we should see the dangerous and illegal ethnic youth movement in the southern Ethiopian region of Sidama.
The movement was heating up in that part of the region for some time now.
Some young people in Sidama, and specifically in the Southern capital Awassa, are agitating for statehood, with the multi-ethnic regional capital Awassa strictly under their control.
To realize such eventuality, they are threatening to take a unilateral step in declaring Sidama as a separate ethnic state.
This is clearly in contravention to written laws and working procedures of the nation.
Moreover, this youth movement has given the federal government a set date at which time they'll carry out the intended unilateral declaration should the latter fail to fulfill their demands.
It's not lost on us that while the young in Sidama (known as Ejeto meaning hero in the Sidama language) are fronting this illegal movement, the elites who are the brains behind Ejeto are never heard from; and if they are heard from by indirection, what they say is always in the generalities of supporting the movement, not in the specifics of endorsing actionable items such as the unilateral decision stated above..
The federal government on its part has asserted in no uncertain terms that it'd crush any attempt by the Sidama youth in Awassa if the latter attempt anything in contravention of the constitution.
Its own solution, as stated by the prime minister, is to implement a nation-wide corrective that's a comprehensive and judicious arrangement based on the recommendations of the newly formed Administrative Boundaries and Identity Issues Commission.
The expectation is that the Commission will do a solid, professional and non-partisan study, and the government and all political actors including civic organization will use it as a basis to rectify the highly politically charged and gerrymandered ethnic enclaves handed down to us by the remnants of the leftist and ever short-sighted Ethiopian Student Movement of the 1960's..
Coming back to the immediate problem at hand, I think it's fair to say that at this point Abiy and Ejeto are effectively staring at each other, and along with the rest of us, at the dateline.
TPLF and OLF, sensing that Abiy and the historic Ethiopian state are weak, may push the Sidama elites to give the go-ahead to Ejeto and call Abiy's bluff.
Will the Ejeto take the bait and make a deadly mistake?
Nobody knows, but we can guess few things.
Ethnic propaganda being what it is, we can suspect the youth are promised a lot once the elites are able to exclusively control Awassa.
Jobs, businesses, housing, you name it.
That's how tribalism telegrams its message: You're deprived because the others dispossessed you of your rightful properties, denied your rights and oppressed you in your own 'homeland'..
The grievance machine had been tuned for generations and the real action will then begin once the ethnic elements believe they have the upper hand.
Reports say that it's doing some of this already, but if the elites believe that the prize is in sight, it can be safe to say to that the Ejeto will graduate itself into bullying, intimidation, and harassing the non-Sidama.
The multi-ethnic, multi-lingual, tolerant Awassa will descend to chaos and bloodshed.
The non-Sidamas will subsequently be pressured to leave the city by the elites; as experienced hands, they will couch the language so it reads, We canot guarantee your safety; we advise you to go back to your 'own land'.
All this so that in the end, the perpetrators will bask in the mono-ethnic nirvana the cleansing is supposed to usher in..
Some people may think such a scenario is an exaggeration, and unlikely to happen.
But I think ethnic cleansing in Awassa is a distinct possibility if, for instance, Abiy blinks and fails to deliver on his words.
Take, for instance, the case of Gedeo in Guji, just next door.
The Gedeo suffered significant persecution in the hands of the OLF fighters and its sympathizers among Oromo nationalists.
Their houses got burnt, and they had to flee their homes.
They may have been displaced for a better part of the year, if not more.
OLF, either by proxy or directly, had done similar things in Harar and Burayu.
Of course, the Sidama ethnic elites likely have taken some lessons.
Much as the OLF wants to cleanse non-Oromos from what thinks is its homeland, the Sidama elites, as its ideological brethren (if you glorify tribalism as ideology), will certainly try out some of the same things in what it considers as its homeland; in Awassa above all.
It knows time is on its side, and it will work through the cleansing once it's able to achieve its Killil and the prize Awassa..
This is a frightening and, potentially disintegrative outcome for the country at large.
We should dread the aftermath of such an outcome.
If Ejeto succeeds in realizing Sidama + Awassa, this effectively means open season for everyone.
If Ejeto can do it, so can anybody: a federal government that shrugs its shoulders when it happens in Sidama is expected just to stand aside when others anywhere else do it, by whatever means..
On the other hand, what the federal government is actually threatening to do is also scary.
No one but a cruel person wishes death and mayhem on the Sidama youth of Awassa; after all this is what 'crushing' means.
And given that no effort as far as moderation has been publicized from either side so far, the increasingly likely outcome of the stand-off seems nightmarish.
At this point, one may ask what will come of their declaration anyway?
Let Ejeto say whatever it wants, and at the end of the event, they'll go home, and the next day, it'll be business as usual.
But I donot believe it'll end there.
My guess is that they'll start acting on the implications of their decision.
Which is to say that they'll start taking over the security, and the local administration – as a proxy for the elites, that is.
Which is to say that the cleansing proper will then ensue..
What to do then?
Avoidable bloodshed on the one hand and ethnic cleansing and massive conflict on the other.
As far as I can tell I think Abiy's least bad option (there seems to be no good option) is to bring in a significant federal police and security to Awassa and, if need be, to smaller towns in the Sidama zone.
This will help forestall a mis-adventure by the Ejeto youth.
The show of force should be intimidating enough so the youth should be frustrated from having any second thoughts.
In such a manner, the lives of the youth will be spared and Abiy's government will have thwarted a crisis in the making.
Also, given that the timeline is rather short, the decision to move in the federal forces should be made in the next few days.
The federal forces should plan on staying in Awassa and securing its peace for a foreseeable future, at least until the Commission gives its recommendation and the government redraws the administrative boundaries along sensible lines.
It pains me to write that the federal force should exclude ethinic Sidama for obvious reasons – shame on us, but this is the current reality in our beloved country..
At this point, let me digress to make a larger point: Abiy's government or any future government should never let major urban centers to be under any one ethnic group.
Urban centers are by their very nature inclusive, tolerant, diverse, multi ethnic and multi lingual melting pots.
They are no one's homeland; no body 'owns' them.
If they 'belong' to anyone, it's to the residents of the particular time in question.
And as such, they should be administered by business savvy and entrepreneurial mayors and other elected officials chosen by residents of the city.
They should not be allowed to be corruption machines for unproductive, incompetent, entitled and narcissistic ethnic elites.
Much as Addis Ababa is melting pot of Ethiopians, so should be Awassa, Nazret and Dire Dawa.
In a decade or so, the odds-on is that the nation's economy will likely have already taken off, and in the process lift most other Ethiopian cities (Arba Minch, Jimma, Dessie, etc.) to a similar melting pot.
In the ensuing economic prosperity, we'll reverse the centrifugal ethnic force threating to do us apart..
To wrap up, throughout human history cities have served as economic engines of nations.
Properly administered cities draw all sorts of businesses and ambitious people from near and far.
Their primary goal is to facilitate a conducive atmosphere so the city's residents engage in productive pursuits with equal opportunity; not to alienate parts of the residents.
Nobody should have precedence nor given exclusive rights to anything.
Merit and only merit should be the measure of all public offices, not some automatic 'ethnic right'.
In other words, the most competent person must be rewarded for his efforts and initiatives, irrespective of ethnicity.
Even for the disadvantaged among the 'natives' such a person of ability will do far more than an entitled person selected from ones' own ethnic group.
Ethnicity should not even be acknowledged let alone be used as a measuring stick.
If London's mayor can be a person whose parents are non-white and non-Christian (neither of which describe the British in any historic sense), it's pointlessly retrogressive to argue that people in Ethiopia should first pass the ethnic test to live and serve in a particular place..
But we all know that the ethnic elites have mastered the art of nursing ethnic grievances.
We also know nursing ethnic grievances is not a productive pursuit – it doesnot create wealth, nor does it promote economic wellbeing.
And as any honest Ethiopian can see, our nation's problem is at its root economic; it's not failing to affirm ethnic right of this sort or another.
After all, in the times we live in, no one is forbidden to speak in his or her mother tongue, nor forced to dress or dance in only a certain way.
Except for an extremely tiny ethnic elites, the overwhelming citizenry (virtually 100%, and yes including the people of Tigray despite what we're being told), just want a secure livelihood and a betterment of their lives.
The rest is petty-bourgeois random noise..
– Dr Eugene Kongnyuy, the Country Representative of UN Population Fund (UNFPA), has advocated for increased budgetary allocation to youth empowerment initiatives for the rapid development of the country..
Kongnyuy said this in an interview with the News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) in Abuja..
At the centre of the work UNFPA is the young people..
The young people can change this world and they can change Nigeria, what we simply need is the young people who have the dream themselves and the drive for their dream..
But unfortunately we still have about just five per cent of the young people who have a clear dream and clear drive for their dreams, but it is our clear role as parent, as community to let them develop a clear dream of what they want to do..
`Passion comes from the desire to solve problems and that is why UNFPA is concerned about young people..
Imagine if government can put 40 to 50 per cent of the budget on the young people in two terms, they (youth) will change this country..
Because, the young people are going to change the society here in Nigeria and they will change this country in 10 years I believe.''.
He said governments as well as agencies should show more commitment to the provision of strategic intervention and support towards empowering the youth to realise their potentials and harness demographic dividends..
He said UNFPA in collaboration with the private sector had organised a four month youth innovation leadership programme for 40 talented professionals..
He said the training which commenced in May had participants between the ages of 18 to 28 years in attendance..
He said participants were undergoing leadership training to provide innovative solutions to developmental problems..
Kongnyuy said the UNFPA had provided a plan to sustain the initiative stressing that another set of youths would participate in another edition that would hold in November with two more segments in 2020..
We are hoping that the training will cascade down across the country with the sole aim of providing innovative solutions to real life problems..
We are working to have 20 per cent young people who have dreams and drive for the dream..
If we have this percentage of young people, this country will change..
But we need investment in young people who are able to create the start-ups and employ their peers..
They (young people) take a lot of risk; therefore, they need orientation and guidance,'' he said..
He noted that technology offered significant opportunity for development..
He recalled that the Asian tigers got developed in 30 years being the fastest development ever in history..
According to him, some countries take more than 200 years to develop adding that Africa could develop within 10 to 15 years, with technology and other variables that abound on the continent..
Kongnyuy said the UNFPA was established as a subsidiary of the General Assembly in its own right in 1969, noting that it would commemorate its 50th anniversary this year..
Malixi earlier completed a wire-to-wire triumph in the 11-12 play as the reigning Philippine Amateur Open overall champion fired a 69 and 71 for a 140 and routed US-based Thai Natrada Pongsasin (70-74) and Arianna Lau (71-73) of Hong Kong by four..
Wu matched Superal's opening 70 and the duo, teeing off at the backside of the par-71 Willow Glen, remained tied with eight holes left in the 36-hole championship before the Taiwanese pounced on The Country Club mainstay's bogey on No.
2 to take command..
But after both traded bogeys on No.
5, Superal birdied the par-3 No.
6 from six feet and surged ahead as Wu three-putted for bogey.
Gaining control and momentum, the younger sister of former US Girls' Junior champion Princess hacked a solid drive on the next hole to set up an easy birdie then watched her rival succumb to pressure and holed out with a 7..
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Reddit (Opens in new window).
Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window).
Click to print (Opens in new window).
THE presence of a shelter for victims of abuse will not only benefit the community of Richards Bay but the Zululand region as a whole..
These were the words of Richards Bay police officer, W/O AB Mathonsi who visited the site of the proposed facility in Mzingazi..
He said police do not only have the responsibility of investigating cases but often have to place victims in a safe environment when they have nowhere else to go..
The facility is the brainchild of Community Policing Forum representative Sharon Mdletshe, who has cleared a piece of land on her property for the proposed Eagle Wings Shelter..
Mdletshe has however been struggling to get the project off the ground owing to lack of funding..
'This facility will help relieve police in the region who are often faced with the task of finding a safe place to house abused woman and children,' she said..
Legendary singer, Stevie Wonder, at a recent concert in London has disclosed that he will be taking a break from music to undergo a kidney transplant surgery. .
According to the pianist, the kidney transplant surgery will happen in September and he has a donor already. .
His words, So what's gonna happen is this, I'm going to have surgery, I'm going to have a kidney transplant in September of this year.
I'm all good, I'm all good, I'm all good.
I have a donor, it's all good, Wonder said. .
I want you to know I came here to give you my love and to thank you for your love.
You ainot gotta hear no rumors about nothing, I told you what's up.
Lebanon's transport sector is one of the most unsustainable in the Middle East region.
This is mostly due to the continuing absence of any public transportation by bus or rail for over 40 years, and the lack of infrastructure for alternative transport means, such as bicycles and walking.
The result is an exclusive reliance on cars and trucks that are overly polluting; according to , 98 percent of all fuels used in Lebanon's transport are gasoline and diesel, with 60 percent of all cars having large engines, and 70 percent being older than 10 years.
Mobility in Lebanon has become synonymous with traffic congestion and noxious fumes, harming human health, the economy, and the environment..
It is clear from the diagnosis of the problem that serious solutions by the state are needed immediately, under the organizing umbrella of a national transportation strategy that is still missing to date.
But in a tough economy and without effective state institutions today, it might be more useful to look at feasible solutions that can be done in the near-term at the level of municipalities and non-state actors, such as non-governmental organizations (NGOs) and the private sector. .
Where the government is not able to fulfill its mandate, many NGOs and experts have been active, but each one working in a separate part of the sector.
To increase chances for success, NGOs should unify their voice and engage the state, the private sector, academia, and international bodies in a constructive dialogue, pooling resources.
This can push forward low cost, near-term projects and pilot projects with tangible positive impacts on the daily commute. .
For example, in the absence of a comprehensive public bus service across all regions, smaller regional initiatives by municipalities and the private sector can be very effective in improving mobility within cities and high-density areas.
Such initiatives can also serve as pilot tests ahead of any future deployment of a country-wide bus network by the state, providing valuable insights about passenger demand, service costs, and bus technology performance, potentially even becoming feeders for the main network in the future.
These projects would also encourage the gradual development of local capabilities in the sector, from training and maintenance of facilities to information service providers. .
However, such initiatives cannot replace the state, which has the primary role and responsibility for providing a nationwide and modern public transport service to its citizens, with all the significant infrastructure and resources needed to operate it.
This is why it is equally important to continue lobbying the state for this right, especially at this critical juncture where funding pledges for the transport sector out of CEDRE amount to a third of the $11 billion pledged..
In its current form, the CEDRE -linked Capital Investment Plan (CIP) for the transport sector is entirely focused on infrastructure projects such as roadways and tunnels, but does not account for public transportation needs.
And while many of these projects are useful and needed, they will not, however, improve mobility in the long term, as more cars and trucks will eventually overfill the additional capacity—according to a 2016 Bankmed, on average, over 35,000 new-model passenger cars alone enter our roads each year.
This is why some NGOs, like Transport Coactives (TRACS), which itself is formed by a number of active NGOs and experts in the transport sector including myself, are actively lobbying today to reprioritize the CEDRE/CIP spending toward transport projects that include public transportation..
In the meantime, more of the feasible and affordable initiatives can be implemented easily and can have a positive impact, if not on congestion levels, at least on human health and the environment.
In a 2017  by the Ministry of Energy and Water and the UNDP on the potential use of low carbon fuels in the transport sector, one of our short-term policy recommendations was to reduce taxes on hybrid electric vehicles in order to make this cleaner technology more affordable, and thereby encourage its adoption in Lebanon.
In that study, hybrids were estimated to save nearly 30 percent in fuel consumption and greenhouse gas emissions compared to conventional engine vehicles, while also significantly reducing emission of some of the air pollutants harmful to human health.
And while the government did recently reduce taxes on these vehicles down to 20 percent, more reductions are necessary to speed up their adoption, as Lebanon remains largely behind global and even regional trends..
But perhaps the most important takeaway is that collaboration on feasible solutions, while necessary and useful, is not sufficient to sustain the transport sector in Lebanon.
Only a national transportation strategy that organizes efforts and resources can begin to tackle the problem at its root cause..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
The Imo State Police Command has arrested a suspected rapist and killer of a 27yrs old female corp member, late Lilian Mgbanwa from Delta state..
The suspect, one Chukwuemeka Eze 25yrs M from Umuorji Mgbidi in Oru West LGA, was linked to the crime after reportedly being in possession of a black Android Itel phone, belonging to the corp member..
According to the police report, the suspect who pretended to be insane, took the android phone to a shop belonging to one Ahamefule Onyeka, who out of curiosity, that the suspect couldnot afford such phone, put it on.
But was barraged with incessant calls of someone wanting to speak to the owner of the phone, claiming the phone belonged to her sister who has been missing..
Onyeka quickly moved to the nearest police station and subsequently, the suspect was arrested.
He confessed to the crime of rape and murder and also led operatives to the scene where her decomposing body was found..
Addressing newsmen, the Public Relations Officer, Force Headquarters Abuja, DCP Frank Mba who represented the Inspector General of Police, IGP, Mohhammed Adamu, stressed that, the operation Puff Adder, a police special operation that help law enforcement community recover and restore security in all troubled spots of the country, flagged off by the IG, was yielding tremendous benefits in Imo..
He equally introduced other suspects paraded for various crimes ranging from armed robbery, kidnapping, child trafficking, illegal possession of firearm and victims of kidnap rescued unhurt during the operation at Ilile forest in Ohaji Egbema LGA..
One of the victims, Okey Nnaka M, who spoke to newsmen, narrated his ordeal with men of the underworld.
He informed that he was kidnapped on his way back from Portharcourt, just before Umuagwo, when he was flagged down by men dressed in police uniform, suspecting to be policemen making him pulled to a stop.
But within split seconds he was surrounded and ordered to come down..
Sensing he's hesitation, they broke he's door window and took him, among others to the forest.
But for the timely intervention of the police, his family would have paid the ransom, as they had gone far in negotiations..
DCP Frank Mba, expressed appreciation to the officers and members of the Imo state Command and Imolites for their cooperation in crime fighting and appealed that they continue to serve and support the police to rid the state of all forms of criminality..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
THE Other Foundation, the Durban Lesbian and Gay Centre together with the Diakonia Council of Churches, hosted a public discussion with renowned anti-apartheid leader, theologian and author, Prof Allan Boesak on Monday night..
The event, titled Breaking Through the Backlash: Transformative encounters between LGBTI people and the churches in Africa, was the opening event on the first day of a larger Africa wide three-day gathering of church leaders and activists to address homophobia and the churches in Africa..
In his address Boesak said: Not did we only call racism a sin in general, we called it a form of idolatry in which the dominant group assumes, on the basis of pigmentation and the mythical belief in a social construct called race, for itself a status higher than the other and through political, cultural, military and economic power.
As well as social and psychological restructuring they seek to play God in the lives of others..
Participants included secular and church-based LGBTI activists and their parents and organizations, theological and other researchers/scholars, church-based media groups, and institutional church leadership who are challenging faith-based homophobia and transphobia – from local congregations to the highest levels of leadership..
Youth program brings out the best.
Theological schools and seminaries, spaces in which pastors are trained, have initiated processes to relook at their training curricula and institutional cultures towards improving the teaching and practice of churches to be more inclusive of people regardless of their sexual orientation and gender non-conformity.
However, the progress of the last three years is seeing an emerging backlash, with increased divisions about how to deal with a new wave of change in the churches, said The Other Foundation's Teboho Klaas..
Manifestations of the backlash have emerged in various ways and at various levels in churches, such as due processes of decision-making being flouted by reactionary groups in the churches, exemplified in the Dutch Reformed Church (southern Africa); using voting power of African delegations in the United Methodist Church in the United States of America, to block a resolutions in favour of including LGBTI people and clergy, using the myth that homosexuality is unAfrican, not cultural and unbiblical; as well as Africans leading in the division seen in the establishment of separate conference from the Lambeth Conference of the Anglican Church, added Klaas..
Do you want to receive news alerts on this and many other stories relevant to the Durban area  via WhatsApp?
Send us a WhatsApp message (not an sms) with your name and surname to 060 532 5535..
You can also join the conversation on Facebook, Twitter and Instagram..
PLEASE NOTE: If you have signed up for our news alerts you need to save the Berea Mail WhatsApp number as a contact to your phone, otherwise you will not receive our alerts.
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
If there is something we are all afraid of, it is not having money in our pockets..
The geographers said that the tropical cyclones, with maximum sustained surface winds of less than 74 miles per hour (mph), are called hurricanes.
Simply put, it is a complex storm that destroys people, properties, businesses, and natural resources.
The financial experts say financial hurricane is a situation in which the supply of money is outpaced by the demand for money.
It therefore means that liquidity is quickly evaporated because available money is withdrawn from banks, forcing banks either to sell other investments to make up for the shortfall, or to collapse..
For most of us, financial hurricane is much more than that.
It is like being on a boat at the mercy of the next wave, waiting endlessly.
We are unable to meet our immediate needs, much less our long term obligations.
We are left with asking the following questions:.
Can our current assets cover our current liabilities?.
Do we have investment portfolio that we can convert to cash without losing value?.
Do we have enough savings to cover the costs of unforeseen crises?.
Do we even have adequate value for what we buy?.
So many questions.
If you are not affected by the financial hurricane in this part of the world, thank your star, but donot despise those in need.
The financial hurricane is a storm that can unleash a hail of bullets on its victim..
There is a story in the Bible that serves as a good example.
Despite all his riches, Job lost all he had.
He was in total financial ruin.
Financial hurricane is cruel.
It is depressing to be in financial mess..
Of recent, the president, , declared war on poverty when he said, With leadership and a sense of purpose, we can lift 100 million Nigerians out of poverty in ten years..
In one of my articles titled I Am Checking Out of Poverty, I wrote about poverty and said, Lack is the cousin of little, and little is the uncle of wretchedness.
Penury and insufficiency are not my words.
In place of shortage, I embrace abundance.
In place of inadequacy, I embrace sufficiency.
In place of destitution, I embrace riches.
Financial hurricane blows in different direction hitting nations, individual or things, it tears nations apart and remove their self esteem and if you are not in sync with what the expert said as stated above, you have to term with the fact that success and failures are measured with numbers and number donot lie..
One thing is certain: a financial hurricane will surely come.
But if you are prepared, you will scale through the raging storm.
Do not lose hope.
The storm is a period of opportunity, as the Chinese proverbs say: A crisis is an opportunity riding the dangerous wind.
It is during crises that talents are uncovered..
As at now, Nigeria is still generating less than 5,000 megawatt, with a population of almost 200 million people.
Congo is till bedevilled with poverty and war.
Cote d'Ivoire, Guinea, Sierra Leone are not left out; they are crippled with poverty, corruption and governance.
As I write now, Kenya is battling a financial hurricane..
The financial hurricanes are tearing these nations apart.
The World Meteorological Organisation uses different names to categorise hurricanes depending on the location where the hurricanes come from.
If they occur in the Atlantic Ocean, Gulf of Mexico, and the Eastern Pacific Ocean, they are called hurricanes.
If they occur in the Western Pacific Ocean, they are called typhoons.
If they occur in the Indian Ocean, the Bay of Bengal, and Australia, these types of storms are called cyclones..
Similarly, financial hurricanes is also given different nomenclature.
If a country is poor, we often refer to it as economically depressed.
If companies are at the verge of a financial hurricane, we say they are liquidating.
If building is weak, we say it will soon collapse.
And if an individual lacks money, we often say he is broke..
If we must conquer the dreaded demons called financial hurricanes, we must begin to think.
In the words of Voltaire: No problem can withstand the assault of sustained thinking..
The collective interests of the state should be paramount.
If we accept this principle, then Pakistan's long-held position against diplomatic relations with Israel makes little sense.
Reason above passion and emotion is the pillar of a successful foreign policy.
A lesson our policy-makers may well learn if they wish to further the country's interests..
It is interesting, that at the outset, Pakistan and Israel foreign policies were based on similar security calculations.
Both countries saw a hostile external environment that potentially threatened state destruction.
Pakistan was fearful of India.
In response, it joined Western alliances, aimed at containing Communism, primarily to get military and economic aid.
Similarly, Arab enemies surrounded Israel.
It counted on political, military and economic support from the United States and Western Europe to defend the new state.
But that is where the congruence between the foreign policies of Pakistan and Israel ends..
After surviving extreme vulnerability and inflicting crushing military victories, Israel shrewdly made a land-for-peace deal with Egypt in 1979.
This removed the deadliest foe from its threat equation.
In contrast, Pakistan remains locked in its losing confrontation with India.
We expect to hear the familiar argument that while Egypt was willing to make peace with Israel, India has spurned similar peace overtures from Pakistan.
Even if true, we have to ask who needs peace more and should make the greater sacrifices: an ascendant India or a struggling Pakistan..
Getting back to the subject, one wonders what strategic benefit is derived by Pakistan by keeping overtures to Israel on hold, to curry favour with the Arab world.
Even gullible Pakistanis must be tired of hearing that Pakistan was created to serve the cause of Islam.
Since the early years, our brotherly Arabs have treated Pakistan with a mixture of condescension and derision.
Initially, Pakistan was labelled a Western lackey and an opponent of Arab nationalism.
More recently, rich Arab states have treated Pakistan as a poor relation constantly begging for aid.
Also, many Arab states are themselves lining up to establish ties with a militarily and economically strong Israel..
Pakistan needs to reshape its foreign policy in the post-9/11 era.
To take advantage of the changing geopolitical situation in the region, Pakistan must develop a multi-pronged approach.
Balancing ties with the Muslim world and Israel can maximise Pakistan's interests.
On the Palestine dispute, while Israel is entitled to peace and security, it should desist from oppressing the Palestinian people.
But Palestinians have suffered not just from Israeli hubris and racism.
Palestinians have been repeatedly let down by their own myopic, inept and corrupt leadership.
They have also suffered from the betrayal by fellow Arabs, content to use the Palestinians against one and other, and the neglect of the international community.
But Pakistan is not in a position to moderate Israeli behaviour or influence the resolution of the Palestinian dispute.
It is illogical for Pakistan to wait for the complicated situation in the Middle East to resolve itself, before establishing a relationship with Israel..
Moreover, Pakistan's relations with Israel shouldnot be seen through the prism of relationships with other states and should instead be developed separately.
As an example, India enjoys good relations with the Arab world, Iran and Israel.
Development of relations based on rational self-interest, rather than historical and entrenched positions, is critical for Pakistan in the modern world..
There is an absence of clashing interests between Pakistan and Israel, which is a prerequisite for an enduring bond between peoples and states.
Which is why it is especially nonsensical to continue to treat Israel as an implacable enemy or to hold a permanently entrenched position of opposition against it?
Emotions such as anger, hate, compassion, and fear canot be allowed to dictate foreign policy..
We should expect the standard resistance from the Islamist lobby long opposed to a dialogue with Israel on 'moral' grounds.
We are bound to hear about an American-Jewish conspiracy to entice Pakistan away from the Islamic and Palestinian cause.
Stirring the religious beast onto the streets is avoided by governments in Pakistan.
It requires inspired and visionary leadership to take on the political risks for opening new diplomatic horizons for Pakistan..
Pakistan needs to reshape its foreign policy in the post-9/11 era.
To take advantage of the changing geopolitical situation in the region, Pakistan must develop a multi-pronged approach.
Balancing ties with the Muslim world and Israel can maximise Pakistan's interests.
Israel may also see the benefit of an economic partnership with Pakistan, without compromising its burgeoning strategic relationship with India..
Modern diplomacy has also moved on from the era of alliances.
Economic diplomacy and bilateral relationships based on trade and investment are at the forefront.
PM Imran Khan and the national security establishment that backs him have promised economic revival, better governance, and the use of diplomacy to improve the country's international standing.
Establishing long-overdue diplomatic ties with Israel should top the foreign policy agenda..
The writer is a freelance contributor.
Rabat – Lixus is an ancient city on the banks of the Loukous River.
First settled by the Phoenicians in the 12th century BC, it flourished under the Roman empire.
The site is home to the only Roman amphitheater in Morocco and a large industrial complex where fish was preserved in salt.
The city was destroyed during the Muslim conquest of Morocco in the late 7th century..
The site was excavated and restored during the 1940s, 50s, and 60s.
Earlier this year, the Ministry of Culture spent MAD 11.8 million, building a new visitor's center and other tourism infrastructure..
Under the new MAD 15 million (approximately $1.5 million) restoration program launched on July 6, MAD 6,75 million will go towards restoration and maintenance of the site.
A further MAD 4,6 million will go towards improving infrastructure, while MAD 2,2 million will go towards archeological research and training, and MAD 1,05 million will go towards promotion..
In a press release, the Minister stated that the program aims to promote the site locally and nationally, making it a hub for scientific research and tourism.
The Ministry will also work towards the site being listed on the UNESCO World Heritage list..
The Ministry will also plans to launch a national pilot program to promote other archeological sites across the country.
The project comes as part of a cultural and economic development strategy, adds the press release..
Morocco boasts a variety of archeological sites, dotted across the country.
These include dinosaur footprints and fossils, rock carvings, ancient Phoenician cities like Lixus, and the site of the Roman ruins of Volubilis, which was listed on the UNESCO register in 1997..
Donald Trump lashed out at Theresa May on Monday, visibly angry at her continuing support for the British ambassador to Washington despite the leak of diplomatic cables highly critical of his presidency..
London has been scrambling to stem the damage caused by the release of confidential telegrams from envoy Kim Darroch, which described Trump as inept and his White House as uniquely dysfunctional..
In a series of tweets, Trump assailed the British premier, welcoming her impending departure from office, and saying he would have no further contact with the ambassador..
I have been very critical about the way the UK and Prime Minister Theresa May handled Brexit, Trump wrote.
What a mess she and her representatives have created. .
I told her how it should be done, but she decided to go another way..
The good news for the wonderful United Kingdom is that they will soon have a new Prime Minister, Trump wrote..
Regarding the envoy Darroch, Trump declared: We will no longer deal with him..
I do not know the Ambassador, but he is not liked or well thought of within the US, the president said..
The British prime minister's office called the leak unacceptable but also defended the work of ambassadors in providing honest, unvarnished assessments of politics in their country..
The prime minister has full faith in her ambassador to Washington, a Downing Street spokesperson said..
The release of the cables came just a month after a state visit by Trump that included a 41-gun salute welcome at Buckingham Palace and a banquet dinner with the queen..
While I thoroughly enjoyed the magnificent State visit last month, it was the Queen who I was most impressed with!
The Yemeni army and popular committees detonated an IED, destroying a military vehicle for the Saudi-led mercenaries in Lahj province..
In a different context, Yemeni army spokesman Yahya Sarea denied the reports which mentioned that the Yemeni forces targeted a ship in the red sea..
Yemen has been since March 2015 under brutal aggression by Saudi-led coalition, in a bid to restore control to fugitive president Abd Rabbu Mansour Hadi who is Riyadh's ally..
Tens of thousands of people have been killed and injured in the strikes launched by the coalition, with the vast majority of them are civilians..
The coalition, which includes in addition to Saudi Arabia and UAE: Bahrain, Egypt, Morocco, Jordan, Sudan and Kuwait, has been also imposing a harsh blockade against Yemenis..
Al-Manar English Website.
July 10, 17, 24 and 31.
• Rest-a-While Service Centre for the Elderly: Skills development morning, on the corner of Shamrock Road and Churchill Avenue, Primrose, 10am.
ACDP wants 'aggressive incentives' for solar power to lessen crippling electricity costs .
According to Marie Sukers, ACDP MP, solar power could uplift communities, including ones in deep rural areas. .
The African Christian Democratic Party (ACDP) on Monday called on government to ensure aggressive incentives for companies to pursue photovoltaic power in order to lessen the crippling effects of electricity costs on South African households..
Photovoltaic cells convert sunlight into electricity..
According to Marie Sukers, ACDP MP, solar power could uplift communities, including ones in deep rural areas..
The ACDP notes that a major milestone has been reached in Brazil, where a solar power project has been auctioned off at the lowest price ever for a power generation project, said Sukers..
Southbank Investment, a British research company, has asserted that this means solar is now the cheapest form of energy from any technology, ever..
Sukers said that affordable and reliable modern energy services were recognised to be essential for alleviating poverty, improving health, and raising living standards..
There is a huge energy demand in South Africa and electricity costs are crippling households.
With great technological advances and resulting economies of scale, prices have fallen enough to be more than within our reach, she said..
The ACDP calls on government to ensure that there is the right business environment offering aggressive incentives for companies to pursue photovoltaic (PV) utilities and storage systems.
We must make use of our abundant sunlight to radically reduce energy costs across the board and uplift particularly the poorest rural communities..
African News Agency (ANA).
For more news your way, download The Citizen's app for .
JOHANNESBURG — Eight months after social media exploded with claims that rappers South African Cassper Nyovest and A-Reece were beefing hard, Cassper has told fans that he's tried to reach out to his rival, but keeps getting blue ticked..
It all started when Cassper penned a lengthy drugs are bad thread that led to some suggesting it was aimed at A-Reece.
They claimed it was in response to a verse on Reece's song that dissed rappers who thought hip-hop was kwaito..
Cassper later blocked A-Reece..
The pair have been trading subliminals ever since and even Cassper's offer for a collab to make peace hasnot seemed to help..
Cassper was asked this week about the collab and told a fans that it was not going to happen because he couldnot get hold of Reece. .
Been trying to find him.
After delivering the first State of the Province Address (Sopa) of the sixth Legislature in Lebowakgomo on Friday, Premier Stan Mathabatha can now look forward to the anticipated criticism from political opposition parties and individuals..
Although there were no disruptions during the address, Economic Freedom Fighters Provincial Chairperson Jossey Buthane was somewhat not happy with the fact that the African National Congress member of the provincial legislature Mapula Mokaba-Phukwana was allegedly sleeping in the house during the Sopa.
Buthane stood on a point of order and indicated that the sixth administration had a long way ahead and that it was unacceptable for Mokaba-Phukwana to sleep on the job..
Ahead of the address, a group of learners from various schools in Ga-Mashashane staged a silent protest next to the Legislative chamber holding placards with their demands, which included access to clean water and proper infrastructure and eradication of pit latrines in schools across the province.
The learners, affiliated to Equal Education, indicated that the exercise was to remind Mathabatha of the hiccups experienced by learners in schools..
Mathabatha's address highlighted budgets that are set aside for different projects such as the construction of low cost housing, Limpopo Academic Hospital and an arts theatre for the province, roads and special schools.
Creation of jobs and improving the local economy were also some of the topics that were covered during the address as Mathabatha indicated that they would boost agricultural, tourism and mining projects to help fight unemployment..
Read more about the Sopa and silent protest in this week's edition of Polokwane Observer..
BEVERLY HILLS, July 08, (THEWILL) – President Muhammadu Buhari returned to Abuja on Monday after attending the 12th Extraordinary Summit of the African Union in Niamey, Niger Republic..
NAN reports that the presidential aircraft conveying the President and some members of his entourage landed at the Presidential Wing of the Nnamdi Azikiwe International Airport, Abuja at about 1:25 p.m..
While in Niamey, Buhari signed the African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA) agreement, making Nigeria the 53rd state in the continent to append its signature to the document..
The signing of the agreement was the first event at the opening of the summit on the launching of the operational phase of the AfCFTA..
The President had delayed signing the agreement, which entered into force on May 30, 2019..
The delay was to give room for extensive consultations with stakeholders, culminating in the submission of the report by the presidential committee, to assess the impact and readiness of Nigeria to join the free trade area..
The AfCFTA is expected to be the world's largest free trade area since the formation of the World Trade Organisation, with a potential market of 1.2 billion people..
Buhari at the summit met with Vice- President of the Islamic Development Bank, Dr. Mansur Muhtar, and solicited the support of the bank to address Nigeria's infrastructure deficit..
According to the president, with the growing population and infrastructure deficit, no amount of money is too much to commit to the revamping of Nigeria's development challenges..
''We need all the support we can get on infrastructure because the oil will not last forever,'' said Buhari..
The Nigerian leader also met with the Head of Libya's Government of National Accord, Fayez Al-Sarraj, and pledged Nigeria's continued support for Libya's quest to regain political and security stability..
President Muhammadu Buhari on Sunday finally signed the African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA) agreement..
The signing comes several months after the Nigerian leader initially refused to sign the agreement which has already been signed by about 52 other African countries..
Mr Buhari signed the agreement in Niger Republic on Sunday.
The president left for Niger Republic on Saturday afternoon for the African Union (AU) summit holding there..
Niger, which borders Nigeria to the North, is hosting the 12th Extraordinary Session of the Assembly of the Union on African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA) in Niamey..
Mr Buhari had refused to sign the agreement saying more consultations were necessary before Nigeria can append its signature to it..
His reluctance to sign had been criticised by many diplomats and other Nigerians including ex-President Olusegun Obasanjo..
Mr Buhari recently criticised the AfCFTA, and outlined his own vision of what African free trade should be..
Our vision for intra-African trade is for the free movement of made in Africa goods.
That is, goods and services made locally with dominant African content in terms of raw materials and value addition, he said..
It is not clear if the Nigerian leader's concerns were reflected in the agreement he signed..
Nigeria had delayed signing the deal, which entered into force on May 30, this year, to allow consultation with stakeholders and advice from a specially constituted committee..
The committee, which was set up to assess the impact of the free trade agreement and Nigeria's readiness to join, submitted its report on June 27..
The presidency, however, indicated that Mr Buhari would soon sign the agreement following the recommendation of the committee that he should sign..
Nigeria became the 53rd state to sign the agreement but such commitment is also expected of Benin Republic today.
AU trade commissioner, Albert Muchanga, had on Friday disclosed that Benin had also confirmed it will sign up in Niamey today..
With Nigeria and Benin included, 54 AU countries have signed since March 2018 when 44 countries signed the deal in Kigali, the Rwandan capital.
Only Eritrea is now being awaited..
The committee had recommended that Nigeria should sign the agreement..
The initial delay by Nigeria, the continent's largest economy, had raised concerns across the continent and in the international development circle..
This state of affairs contrasts sharply with Nigeria's prior activist roles on matters African in years gone by, said a former vice-president at the African Development Bank and director at the World Bank, Aloysius Ordu, who spoke when Nigeria had not signed.
In the past, Nigeria has used its political heft, economic power, and diplomatic and intellectual pedigree to seize the mantle of leadership that changed the course of African history..
The deal has varying steps of commitment, the highest being ratification.
More than 22 countries – the threshold required for the deal to enter into force by article 23 of the agreement – have already ratified the AfCFTA..
Intra-African trade is in a low state.
Just a mere 17 per cent of African countries' exports go to other African countries – compared with intra-continental trade of 69 per cent in Europe and 59 per cent in Asia – according to the Foresight Africa publication of the Brookings Institution this year..
The concerning trend in African trade is expected to change with the AfCFTA in the years ahead.
Africa's combined GDP is $2.5 trillion..
Last week, reports said that Israel was planning to excuse the Palestinian Authority from paying NIS 200 million a month in fuel excise taxes as a means of preventing the PA from financial collapse – but a report on Kan News said that that was just the tip of the gesture iceberg.
Israel is planning to institute many more such steps, including allowing the import of many more goods into Gaza..
Last month, Israel authorized the import of metal wire for use by Gaza fishermen – until now considered dual-use goods whose import to Gaza was prohibited.
The wires are meant to enable fishermen to strengthen their nets.
But there are many other dual-use goods that Israel is planning to allow into Gaza, Kan News said, including fertilizer which could be used for helping crops grow, as well as for making bombs.
Other items include increased amounts of aluminum pots and pans, metal doors, and other items..
Dual-use goods can be used either for their stated purpose, or to construct weapons, and given its experience, Israel tends to ban the import of such goods.
The change in policy is seen as one of the conditions that Israel agreed to last month, after reaching understandings with Hamas on quiet, after Gaza terror groups fired some 700 missiles at Israel in a single weekend..
Israel had agreed to a number of conditions as part of the understanding, including increasing the range fishing vessels could ply to 15 nautical miles.
The range for fishing vessels had been reduced to as little as six miles.
Israel also committed to allowing Qatari money into Gaza without interference, and to discuss improving infrastructure.
Also agreed to by Israel, the report said, was an increase in the amount of goods Gaza could export, as well as increased numbers of merchants from Gaza who could get permits to enter Israel.
Five thousand such permits will be issued, the report said..
For the first time in years, the report said, the unemployment rate in Gaza has fallen below 50%.
It now stands at 46.3%, with new jobs created as a result of increased levels of cheaper electricity, as well as donations and loans from the U.N. for businesses..
Many of the Gaza gestures were instituted in recent weeks, the report said, but Hamas has yet to take advantage of many; of the 5,000 merchant permits issued, only 3,300 are active; instead of the 100 trucks exporting goods that will be allowed out of Gaza to the Ashdod port or Palestinian Authority-controlled areas of Yehudah and Shomron, only 30 are leaving..
On the Gaza side, terror groups committed to ending incendiary balloon attacks.
Other commitments include a reduction in the number of people at the weekly riots at the Gaza border, and keeping rioters 300 meters away from the fence..
Sharply criticizing the gestures was former Director General of the Israel Ministry of Strategic Affairs Yossi Kuperwasser.
The PA has objected to all economic normalization with Israel, we donot have to give them a shekel, the report quoted him as saying.
I do not believe these stories of the PA's imminent financial collapse.
The establishment of the PA is the greatest thing to ever happen to the Palestinian movement.
They will not let it fall apart so easily.
There is always the European Union, the Gulf states or banks that will bail them out.
Even if the PA does collapse, that wouldnot be ideal, but it wouldnot be such a tragedy for us..
Hundreds of people came through to pick up a bargain at the sixth edition of the Boksburg Advertiser's car boot sale at Bokkie Park on July 6..
The car boot sale is a Caxton media initiative, in association with the Bokkie Park Craft Market.
The event is held once a month on the first Saturday of the month..
Second-hand items that were on sale this weekend ranged from clothing, paintings, tools, kitchenware, books, toys, baby items, garden and camping equipment..
To book phone Janine on 072 713 3332 for food and craft stalls or Elize on 087 285 6461 for car boot sale..
For more #hyperlocal news at your fingertips, visit .
Former Super Eagles Captain, Austin 'Jay Jay' Okocha and former Director-General of the Nigerian Broadcasting Commission (NBC), Mr. Emeka Mbah are among professionals, technocrats and experts, inaugurated on Monday by Governor Ifeanyi Ugwuanyi of Enugu State as members of the last batch of the sectoral ad-hoc committees to review various sectors of the state government and design roadmaps for optimized service delivery and advancement of good governance in the state..
It would be recalled that Gov.
Ugwuanyi recently inaugurated the first batch of seven ad-hoc committees in the sectors of education; health; public service reform; security; justice; water and chieftaincy/ community matters..
Inaugurating the remaining five sectoral committees, namely agriculture and rural development; finance, review of Internally Generated Revenue and international development partners' funding; lands, housing and transport; sustainable environmental and urban management; and youths and sports development, Gov.
Ugwuanyi listed 'Jay Jay' Okocha as the technical adviser of youths and sports committee and Mr. Mbah as the Chairman..
Presenting the committees' terms of reference, the governor, who expressed the desire of his administration to perform better in its IGR growth and other economic indices to improve the socio-economic wellbeing of the people of Enugu State, stated that the finance committee shall assist in designing a roadmap to further boost positive returns on our assets, increase our IGR and optimize outcomes of development partner support..
He added that the strategy was also in keeping with President Muhammadu Buhari's call on state governors to prioritize their IGR drive for the wellbeing of their people, stating that the economic viability of states in Nigeria is benchmarked on the parity between their Internally Generated Revenue (IGR) and their share of federal account allocations..
According to him, although Enugu State is currently ranked as the 7th most economically viable state in Nigeria, we seek to perform better for the sake of improving the lives of our people and fulfilling our electoral promises..
On agriculture and rural development, Gov.
Ugwuanyi, who noted that Enugu is predominantly a rural and agrarian state, with a substantial proportion of its working population engaged in farming, disclosed that the committee, is expected to design a workable roadmap to boost farming/agro-allied businesses in the state to generate mass employment and proffer a sustainable strategy to boost orderly and integrated development of the rural areas..
On youths and Sports Development, the governor who described the youth as the engine of economic growth, pointed out that Enugu State has sports talents who have won laurels within and outside the shores of the country, stressing that programmes and sponsorship are required to continue discovering and developing these youthful talents..
The committee on youths and sports development will proffer strategies for achieving this, and for engaging the youth in sports development, character building, entrepreneurship, skills acquisition and participation in good governance, he added..
Emphasizing the need to articulate a sustainable environmental management strategy that will deploy different initiatives to address various ecological issues affecting the state and forestall ecological disasters and environmental crisis, Gov.
Ugwuanyi disclosed that the committee on the sector is expected to dutifully look at the totality of our interaction with terrestrial, aquatic and atmospheric environment for sustainable development, having due regard to biodiversity conservation and ecosystem balance..
The governor further stated that the committee on lands, housing and transport is also expected to undertake a situation analysis of Enugu State's potentials and enviable status as one of the safest states in Nigeria to live in, ranking second in Ease of Doing Business and third in Ease of Starting Business, that has witnessed a growing demand for land, housing and transport..
To meet these demands, we intend to improve our land administration and management, boost orderly housing development and establish a modern intra-state transport system, the governor revealed..
Appreciating members of the committees for accepting to serve the state, Gov.
Ugwuanyi expressed confidence that they will deploy their wealth of experience, expertise and commitment to add value to the governance of Enugu State..
Responding on behalf of other members of the five newly inaugurated committees, the chairman of sustainable environmental and urban management sector, Prof. Smart Uchegbu, thanked the governor for assembling the cream of professionals to carry out the all important assignment..
Prof. Uchegbu expressed delight at the pioneering innovation adopted by Gov.
Ugwuanyi to improve service delivery and good governance in Enugu State, saying: I am really overwhelmed that for the first time, we see a dynamic governor joyfully assembling a cream of professionals to work with him, to assist him achieve more of what he has already achieved..
He commended the numerous achievements of the governor towards the rapid development of the state, adding that he was proud that Enugu State is number one state in the area of security and one of the cleanest and most beautiful states in Nigeria and firmly in the hands of God..
The committee chairman also expressed satisfaction with the governor's empowerment programmes, especially in the area of job creation, maintaining that the history of Enugu State can never be said without somebody like you who has always been directed by God Almighty..
had to cruise on back home..
Poor Jimmy.
He learned that flip flops can be hazardous to his health.
And he sang about it.
He may have been onto something: In 2016, there were 27,000 Emergency Room visits related to flip flops!.
Here are a few tips to help you decide when to wear flip flops..
Flip flops are fine in the house, around the pool, at the beach, or for walking to the corner store.
They provide protection for the bottom of your feet.
They prevent catching athlete's foot or plantar warts.
But they do not protect the top of your feet.
You risk stubbed toes, glass cuts and puncture wounds, not to mention a heavy object smashing your foot..
You may not want to wear flip flops for running, hiking, playing sports, or walking long distances.
This is hard on your ankles, your knees, and your feet.
A 2008 study found that wearing flip flops changes the way we walk, affecting gait and posture.
Fearing flip flops also increases the risk of fractures and falls..
Your toes grip your flip flops to keep them on.
Some of the toe bones curl up and some down.
This leads to hammertoes, corns, and calluses.
It can cause or aggravate plantar fasciitis, arthritis, tendinitis, heel spurs, blisters, and bunions..
And it's not a good idea to wear flip flops when you are driving.
Your flip flops can slip off your feet and get stuck under the brake or the gas pedal.
If you have diabetes, flip flops are never a good idea because any foot injury can become serious and you might not know it..
Flip flops are not all bad.
They allow our toes to spread.
They are usually flat (minimal heel) which encourages your natural arch support.
They are better than high heels!
But we will save that discussion for another time.
I've already run out of space here..
You can reduce some of the risks described by making sure your flip flips fit snuggly around your forefoot.
And by replacing your flip flops every two or three months.
Or by wearing a sandal that has a heel strap..
Here's an intelligent movement that will counteract some of the negative effects of wearing flip flops:.
Seated Top of Foot Stretch.
1. Sit in a chair in good posture..
2. Breathe in.
Breathe out.
Become aware of your breath..
3. Bring your right foot under the chair.
Press the top of your foot into the floor..
4. Stay here for 3, 6, 9 breaths.
Listen to your inner athlete..
5. Return your right foot to the start position.
Repeat on the left..
6. You can also stretch the top of your foot while you are standing..
7. If you do, this becomes a balancing move so be sure to have a safe point (wall, chair, railing, shopping cart) to reach for..
Check out previous articles or my website for other movements involving feet, ankles, toes.
They will help too..
Flip flops are fun and convenient, and you probably wonot stop wearing them.
But you may want to stop wearing flip flops on some occasions, given what you know now..
Medical disclaimer: This article is intended for education and information only.
It is not a substitute for a doctor's opinion.. yogawithvia@gmail.com
Click to share on LinkedIn (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to print (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
Coffee prices registered a 24.67 per cent drop as at the end of eight months of the 2018/19 production year, a Nairobi Coffee Exchange (NCE) report has revealed..
Average prices of a 50 kilogramme at the end of 2018/19 main crop bag dropped to Sh15,964 compared to the previous Sh21,192.  .
At the same time, coffee earnings dropped to Sh10.1billion in 2018/19 compared to Sh12.6 billion returned at the end of the main crop of 2017/18 year..
Daniel Mbithi, NCE chief executive officer, said during the review period the number of bags sold through the auction increased to 518,783, a rise of 29,544 bags from 489,239 in 2017/18. .
The number of kilogrammes of clean coffee sold through the NCE reached 31.7 million kilogrammes, a 6.16 per cent increase from 29.9 m kilos auctioned in the 2017/18 production year, he said..
Dismal performance of the international prices especially at the New York Coffee Exchange (NYCE) contributed to decrease to local prices.
For example, the Intercontinental Exchange in New York decreased to below $1.98 (Sh198) per kilogramme or 90 cents per pound mark in the month of April.  .
April was the lowest monthly average price since July 2006 when the price reached 88.57 US cents per pound (Sh194) at the New York Coffee Exchange..
Mbithi said premium grade AA attracted the highest price during the months of December, January, February and March. .
James O'Connor will practice with the Wallabies ahead of their Rugby Championship opener against South Africa, although he's yet to sign with an Australian club on his return from England..
The 44-test veteran was due to fly out Monday to join the Australian squad in South Africa as they prepare for the match against the Springboks on July 21.
Rugby Australia said the 29-year-old utility back would join the squad on a train-only basis..
O'Connor was called on after winger Marika Koroibete was allowed to remain in Australia awaiting the birth of his second child..
Coach Michael Chieka said Koroibete should join us later in the week but mother nature is in charge here, so until then it's a good opportunity for James to integrate into the team playing principles..
O'Connor has most recently been playing for the Sale club in England.
He hopes to return to Australia ahead of this year's World Cup and is in contract talks with the Queensland Reds..
His international career was hampered by off-field controversies, including an arrest in Perth in 2013 which briefly cost him his Australian contract..
Meanwhile, backrower David Pocock will continue his recovery from a calf muscle injury with the squad in South Africa..
For David, we really want to do some specific rehab work and it's just better to have him with us at this stage to ensure we get his return to play exactly right, Cheika said..
© Copyright 2019 The Associated Press.
All rights reserved.
This material may not be published, broadcast, rewritten or redistributed..
Oshiomole Wants Me Dead – Okorocha.
Oshiomole Wants Me Dead – Okorocha.
Former Governor Rochas Okorocha of Imo State has raised the alarm about alleged plot by the National Chairman of the All Progressives Congress, Adams Oshiomhole to kill him, according to Punchng.com..
The paper said Okorocha shared a text message purportedly sent to him by an operative of the Economic and Financial Crimes Commission, EFCC, with its correspondent where he was intimated about the alleged plot..
The message read: Your Excellency, I will like to give you this information.
You must be careful.
There is a plan to either eliminate you or sink you politically.
They said you want to contest for the deputy senate presidency, a position that will give you an edge to contest as President in 2023, so everything must be done to get you out of the way..
The arrowhead of this plot is Adams Oshiomhole.
He has vowed that he will block you from realising your ambition and the first step towards achieving this was to make sure your preferred successor did not emerge.
He has been having secret meetings with our Chairman, Ibrahim Magu, over your matter..
One of my colleagues, Abdullahi, has been given the task to liaise with INEC and meet with one Aminu in the legal department of INEC and two powerful women in the department as well as some national commissioners over your matter..
Recall that the two former governors are engulfed in bitter feud precipitated by the rancorous dispute that characterised APC primary in Imo State..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
Three attacks on emergency services personnel from the City of Ekurhuleni over the weekend left a paramedic injured, while two ambulances are out of service due to damage caused..
William Ntladi, spokesperson for Ekurhuleni Emergency and Disaster Services, said a paramedic was taken to hospital after an attack in Tokoza, while two ambulances were decommissioned due to broken windows caused by members of the communities in Reiger Park and Ramaphosa Informal Settlement respectively..
A member of the community, who was among a group of about 50 people in Empilisweni Informal Settlement in Tokoza, attacked a paramedic just before he got into a response vehicle after he had declared a patient dead on Friday..
The paramedic rushed to Tokoza Police Station to report the matter, after which he was taken to Union Hospital for a medical check-up.
He was discharged the same night..
Also on Friday night, an ambulance was ambushed and its window shattered in Ramaphosa Informal Settlement in Boksburg.
A patient was on board, being transported to Tambo Memorial Hospital, during the attack, said Ntladi.
Fortunately, no injuries were recorded..
On Sunday, a patient tried to strangle a paramedic while he attended to him in an ambulance in Reiger Park.
The paramedic managed to free himself and jumped out of the ambulance..
The patient and his accomplices followed the crew with one attacker wielding a knife.
They stoned the ambulance and a window was broken.
The crew managed to escape from the scene without much physical harm..
The cases were reported to the police..
The City of Ekurhuleni is pleading with the public not to attack emergency personnel.
An emergency vehicle that is decommissioned due to damage may take a long period before it is returned to service, and that might affect members of the community who may need emergency services during such period, said Ntladi..
Breaking: Court grants Senator Elisha Abbo N5million bail, case adjourned to July 22nd for hearing.
Breaking: Court grants Senator Elisha Abbo N5million bail, case adjourned to July 22nd for hearing.
Senior Magistrate Abdullahi Ilellah has granted bail to Senator Elisha Abbo in the sum of N5million and two sureties in like sum who must have verifiable addresses within the Federal Capital Territory..
The case has since been adjourned to July 22nd for hearing..
Senator Abbo was arraigned today on a one-count of assault which he pleaded not guilty.
He was arraigned by the Federal Capital Territory (FCT) police at Zuba Magistrate Court, Abuja after a video of him assaulting a woman went viral..
Senator Abbo is in the eye of a storm for attacking and beating up a woman who tried to prevent him and others with him from assaulting another woman in a sex toy shop in Abuja.
The viral video of the assault sparked outrage with many Nigerians calling for his prosecution..
Abbo has since confirmed to that he is indeed the man in the video and that he will release a statement soon in that regard.
Meanwhile, the Nigerian Senate has set up an ad-hoc committee to investigate the case.
Six men and two women were chosen as members of the committee which will be headed by Senator Sam Egwu..
Sustainability is only possible if each person contributes, said Laverne..
Our world has reached a tipping point, and it's up to each one of us to take responsibility for our planet's survival.
We need to make intelligent choices so that future generations can live a healthier lifestyle and die of old age and not climate change.
We need to learn to live sustainability, think before you destroy or chop down a tree, she said..
Trees play a vital role in sustaining human life as they produce oxygen and store carbon..
Still grave concern for Umhlanga Cemetery access.
Laverne said: When a tree is destroyed, carbon is released into the atmosphere.
Deforestation is our enemy.
Causes of deforestation are mostly mining on tropical forests, logging, cattle farming and paper.
Did you know, Africa's very own tropical rainforest, The Congo Basin which spans 6 countries is under threat.
We are losing approximately 750 truckloads of rainforest every single day.
If trees are life, shouldnot we be protecting what we depend on to breathe and survive?.
You can also follow us on .
The acting Chief Justice of Nigeria, Justice Tanko Mohammed has asked judicial officers to be diligent in their duties, shun corruption and avoid practices and misconduct in the discharge of their duties as magistrates..
Speaking at the opening ceremony of the 2019 orientation course for newly appointed magistrates, Mohammed said that the image of the judiciary is determined by what the judicial officers do in the performance of their duties..
Politicians Have Brought Rot Into The Supreme Court – Clarke.
You must be seen to perform your judicial duties skillfully and expeditiously without bias or prejudice.
You must always remember that justice delayed is justice denied.
Equally justice unrushed is justice denied.
You must remember this..
Rush in law means you are not doing justice.
Donot delay it unnecessarily, donot rush it.
Be yourself.
Donot allow anybody to makes you rush or delay it.
Be yourself.
If there is any question geared towards you, nobody will answer that question for you, he said..
President Donald Trump is promoting what he is calling his administration's environmental leadership despite its sweeping rollbacks of landmark environmental and public health protections.
Critics are calling it a credulity-straining gesture aimed at winning over voters worried about climate change and pollution..
Trump's speech at the White House on Monday afternoon will focus on the administration's practical approach to addressing environmental challenges while also supporting a strong economy, Mary Neumayr, who heads the president's Council on Environmental Quality, told reporters in previewing his remarks..
Polls show increasing numbers of voters are identifying the environment and climate change as priorities, although the issues are a much bigger concern for Democrats rather than for Trump's Republican base..
Trump has a tough case to make as an environmental steward, given his record, according to former environmental advocates and former federal regulators..
Mustafa Santiago Ali, a former official in the Environmental Protection Agency's Office of Environmental Justice, said the White House is recognizing that the majority of folks in the country are now beginning to pay attention to climate issues and environmental issues..
He said administration officials are trying to reframe the conversation to make people think they've done something to better protect them.
And unfortunately they havenot done a single thing.
He pointed to EPA estimates that proposed rollbacks for fossil fuel emissions will cause thousands of additional deaths annually from air pollution..
In the view of a former senior EPA transportation engineer, Jeff Alson, the administration's claims of environment leadership are truly Orwellian.
Alson has accused the administration of fudging data to support easing vehicle mileage standards..
Candidate Trump campaigned on a pledge to eradicate all but a little bit of the EPA.
As president, he routinely has proposed cutting the agency's budget by almost one-third.
Both Democratic and Republican lawmakers have blocked the proposed cuts..
The administration has initiated dozens of regulatory changes, at times proposing cutting rules even more than regulated industries requested, as in the case of mileage standards..
The biggest changes include easing federal Clean Water Act protections for millions of miles of waterways and wetlands, a cut welcomed by developers and many farmers.
Other changes would ease regulation and support the coal industry and oil and gas companies, sources of heat-trapping fossil fuel emissions and air pollutants..
Critics say other changes favor industry over science in environmental and public health protections..
Trump has pulled the United States out of the Paris climate accord and dismissed federal scientists' warnings on climate change.
In tweets, he has mocked hopes for more global warming during winter cold snaps..
In comments before the speech, Neumayr and EPA administrator Andrew Wheeler pointed to overall U.S. progress cleaning up the air and water since the 1970s, and said progress has continued under Trump..
Earlier this year, 7 of the 10 surviving, Senate-confirmed heads of the EPA signed a letter urging lawmakers to step up oversight of the agency and make it focus on its mission of protecting public health and the environment..
In December, an Associated Press-NORC poll found Democrats driving an increase in the share of Americans who name the environment and climate change as an important issue for the government to work on in 2019.
About 4 in 10 Democrats
(39 included the environment as a priority, compared with just 8 percent of Republicans.
The share of Democrats naming the environment grew 11 percentage points, from 28 percent a year ago..
In January, 30 percent expressed approval of the way Trump was handling climate change, while 68 percent disapproved, according to an AP-NORC poll.
Just 8 percent of Democrats approved of Trump on climate change and, compared with other issues, a relatively small majority of Republicans — 67 percent — did as well..
Trump's speech came hours after a rainfall in the nation's capital region that set records for the date, raised creeks as much as 11 feet and flooded the White House basement.
The deluge highlighted the weather extremes of hurricanes, floods and wildfires that polls show are helping to fuel public concerns about climate change..
LATEST WORLD STORIES.
U.K. bars Russia's RT, Sputnik from media freedom conference over 'disinformation'Britain said Monday it had barred Russia's RT and Sputnik news organizations from a global conference on media freedom in London because of their active role in spreading disinformation.
Some 6....
Eleven years after letting Jeffrey Epstein off lightly with a secret deal, federal prosecutors took another run at putting the billionaire financier behind bars on sex charges, accusing him Monday of abusing dozens of underage girls as young as 14. .
The 66-year-old hedge fund manager, who once socialized with some of the world's most powerful people, was charged, in a newly unsealed indictment, with sex trafficking and conspiracy and could get up to 45 years in prison. .
The defendant was ordered jailed for a bail hearing next Monday, when prosecutors plan to argue that the rich world traveler might flee if released.
They noted that he has three active US passports and has frequently traveled in and out of the country on his private jet. .
Get The Times of Israel's Daily Edition by email and never miss our top stories .
Prosecutors said the evidence included a vast trove of hundreds or even thousands of lewd photographs of young women or girls, discovered in a search of his New York mansion..
Officials said in court papers Monday that the pictures included some on CDs with handwritten labels including Misc nudes 1, Girl pics nude, and the names of specific young women..
Prosecutors say federal agents found some of the photos of young-looking women or girls in a locked safe while searching the seven-story town house, after the wealthy financier's arrest Saturday on sex trafficking charges..
Prosecutors say the lawyer for one of the girls pictured told them the girl was underage when the photos were taken..
It is not clear whether all the photos depict girls involved in the alleged sex trafficking operation..
Epstein, who was arrested over the weekend, as he arrived in the US from Paris, aboard his private jet, was brought into court Monday in a blue jail uniform, his hair disheveled, and pleaded not guilty.
His lawyers argued that the matter had been settled a decade ago with a plea agreement in Florida involving similar allegations..
This is ancient stuff, Epstein attorney Reid Weingarten said in court, calling the case essentially a redo by the government..
Epstein was accused of paying underage girls hundreds of dollars in cash for massages and then molesting them at his homes in Florida and New York from 2002 through 2005..
Two of Jeffrey Epstein's alleged victims, Michelle Licata (L) and Courtney Wild (R), exit the courthouse after a hearing about the billionaire financier on July 8, 2019, in New York City.
(Stephanie Keith/Getty Images/AFP).
He intentionally sought out minors and knew that many of his victims were in fact under the age of 18, prosecutors said.
He also allegedly paid some of his victims to recruit additional girls..
In this way, Epstein created a vast network of underage victims for him to sexually exploit in locations including New York and Palm Beach, prosecutors said..
US Attorney Geoffrey Berman of New York said that the non-prosecution agreement that spared Epstein from a heavy prison sentence a decade ago is binding only on federal prosecutors in Florida, where the deal was made, not on authorities in New York..
While the charged conduct is from a number of years ago, it is still profoundly important to the many alleged victims — now young women, Berman said.
They deserve their day in court.
We are proud to be standing up for them by bringing this indictment..
Assistant US Attorney Alex Rossmiller said that while there is some overlap between the Florida and New York cases, one of the counts against Epstein is based entirely on New York victims..
Federal authorities said new accusers have come forward since Epstein's arrest, and they urged other possible victims to contact the FBI..
Jeffrey Epstein, center, in custody in West Palm Beach, Florida, on July 30, 2008.
(Uma Sanghvi/Palm Beach Post via AP, File).
Some of Epstein's accusers welcomed the indictment..
The news of my abuser's arrest today is a step in the right direction to finally hold Epstein accountable for his crimes and restore my faith that power and money canot triumph over justice, Sarah Ransome said through her lawyer..
Prosecutors in New York are seeking the forfeiture of Epstein's mansion, a seven-story, 21,000-square-foot townhouse less than a block from Central Park.
The home, formerly a prep school, is across the street from a home owned by Bill Cosby and has been valued at approximately $77 million..
Epstein, who is unmarried and whose friends have included US President Donald Trump, former president Bill Clinton and Britain's Prince Andrew, was arrested Saturday at an airport in New Jersey, just outside New York City.
Prosecutors said they would oppose his release on bail..
He has enormous wealth.
The charges are very serious and carry with them a maximum sentence of 45 years, which to someone of Epstein's age is basically a life sentence, Berman said, so we think he has every incentive to try and flee the jurisdiction..
Epstein's arrest came amid increased #MeToo-era scrutiny of the 2008 non-prosecution agreement that allowed Epstein to maintain his jet-set lifestyle.
He has a Bentley, as well as homes in Paris and the US Virgin Islands, where he owns an island..
Under the once-secret deal — overseen by Alexander Acosta, who was the US attorney in Miami at the time and is now Trump's labor secretary — Epstein pleaded guilty to state charges of soliciting a minor for prostitution.
He avoided a possible life sentence and served 13 months in jail, during which he was allowed out to go to his office during the day..
The deal also required that he reach financial settlements with dozens of his alleged victims and register as a sex offender..
Protesters hold up signs of Jeffrey Epstein in front of the federal courthouse on July 8, 2019, in New York City.
(Stephanie Keith/Getty Images/AFP).
Acosta has defended the agreement as appropriate, though the White House said in February that it was looking into his handling of the case..
The new charges were brought by the public corruption unit within the US attorney's office in New York, which normally handles cases against politicians.
Berman would not comment on why that was so and cautioned against reading anything into it..
Attorney General William Barr declined to comment on Epstein's case and would not offer an opinion whether federal prosecutors mishandled it initially, saying he has recused himself from the matter..
According to court records in Florida, authorities say that at least 40 underage girls were brought into Epstein's Palm Beach mansion for sexual encounters after being recruited around the world..
Some of Epstein's alleged victims have accused Prince Andrew and former Harvard law professor Alan Dershowitz of taking part in Epstein's sex ring.
Buckingham Palace has vehemently denied any involvement by Andrew, and Dershowitz has accused the victims of lying about him..
The non-prosecution agreement, examined in detail in a series of stories in The Miami Herald, is being challenged in federal court in Florida.
A federal judge ruled earlier this year that Epstein's victims should have been consulted under the law about the agreement, and he is now weighing whether to invalidate it..
Federal prosecutors recently filed court papers in the Florida case contending that the deal must stand..
The past cannot be undone; the government committed itself to the NPA, and the parties have not disputed that Epstein complied with its provisions, prosecutors wrote..
Arsenal have confirmed the signing of teenage defender Jason Sraha from Premier League rivals..
Sraha was among the 12 first-year scholars unveiled by the Gunners on Monday..
Jason recently joined us from Chelsea.
He is a left-footed centre back with a calm and composed attitude in and out of possession, the club said in a statement on their official website..
In the 2019/2020 season, Sraha will be hoping to make his debut in the U18 Premier League, after failing to do so during his time at Chelsea..
All players in their U17 year are required to start the season on a scholarship arrangement, before they are permitted to sign a first professional football contract on or after their 17th birthday..
Download Daily Post App.
Subscribe to Daily Post Newsletter.
Send us enquiries, press releases..
A teenager's criminal tendency may seal the end of his school days after he was arrested for the illegal possession of a gun..
He was remanded in custody to 3 July by the Alexandra Magistrates' Court.
Bongani Zungu (21), who was in Grade 10 and on parole under correctional supervision until 2027 for murder and attempted murder, was arrested in the evening on 14 June at the intersection of Vincent Tshabalala Road and 13 th Avenue..
He and three others were reported to Alexandra Police Station after they were spotted with guns next to Minerva Secondary School.
Officers dispatched to the scene managed to apprehend him while the others escaped.
He was found with a gun and arrested when he failed to produce a firearm licence..
Teen suspects wanted for hijacking.
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
Alhaji Buba Galadima, a former ally of President Muhammadu Buhari, was called to the witness stand at the proceedings of the President, after the petitioners, through their lawyer, tendered some result sheets in respect of four Local Government Areas of Kano State..
Under cross-examination by President Buhari's counsel, Wole Olanipekun asked Galadima if he was convinced that President Buhari was qualified to run the initial four times he ran for the presidency and Galadima answered in the affirmative..
When asked why he fell out with the President and why he thought the president was not qualified to run, Galadima said he is a fighter against injustice and he felt the president was not qualified again because of bad governance..
According to him, he has nothing personal against President Buhari but against bad governance..
Galadima is a spokesperson for the Atiku Campaign Organisation and former ally of President Buhari..
Rivers people were greeted with the pleasant announcement that in his second term, Governor Nyesom Wike had prioritized commercial agriculture; hence all available arable land in the state would be needed to drive commercial agriculture across the state to create employment for the youths..
The good news was contained in a statement issued on Tuesday July 2, 2019 by the Permanent Secretary, Ministry of Information, Mr. Paulinus Nsirim while announcing the decision by Gov.
Wike not to take part in the now suspended Rural Grazing Area, RUGA programme of the federal government..
Until this revelation, Rivers people were unaware that Gov.
Nyesom Wike had any plan to prioritize commercial agriculture across the state in his second term in order to create employment for the teeming population of unemployed persons, especially the youths..
The government had exhibited total disinterest in the agricultural revolution that gained unprecedented momentum across Nigeria in the last four years.
The Wike-led government discontinued all the laudable agricultural programmes of his predecessor, Rt.
By A Correspondent- SHURUGWI South MP Edmond Mkaratigwa (Zanu PF) took over the chairmanship of the Mines Committee from vocal Norton MP Temba Mliswa, at a time when many people were wondering what would happen to one of the most pivotal committees in Parliament..
The Mines committee was reconstituted after Mliswa almost traded blows with Chegutu West MP Dexter Nduna (Zanu PF) when the committee was investigating issues around the Hwange Colliery Company corruption saga that nearly brought the giant coal miner to its knees.
Mliswa and Nduna were removed from the committee and Mkaratigwa appointed chairperson..
The committee deals with very sensitive issues in the mineral sector which is dogged with corruption, illicit financial flows and smuggling..
Accountability and transparency is needed, including Parliamentary oversight over the mining sector.
A competent chairperson with the ability to probe without fear, is critical for such a committee..
Mkaratigwa describes himself as a hands-on electrical tech engineer-cum-marketing executive, businessman and politician who is currently studying for a Master's Degree in Energy and Sustainability with the University of Cumbria in the United Kingdom..
I was born and bred by Zanu PF parents and I grew up from being a party youth to vice-chairperson of Guruguru South youth league.
I chose Zanu PF because in my view, it is the only party rooted in a political philosophy that is historically traceable and has a broad ideology; the party has never lost focus on, he said..
The party has also embarked on the new trajectory of transforming itself to suit new national characteristics as well as the renewed aspirations of the people of Zimbabwe, and yet on the contrary, a host of other political parties in Zimbabwe lack that foundation, hence I opted for Zanu PF where young leaders are nurtured by fellow experienced, decorous and mature.
During the 2018 Zanu PF primary elections, Mkaratigwa competed and won against former Sports deputy minister Tapiwa Matangaidze.
He says he easily trounced Matangaidze because he was not a competent MP..
I can categorically state that I am the MP for Shurugwi South, particularly because of what my predecessor did not do right.
He succumbed to the temptations that often lead one to lose touch with the constituency when engrossed in power, he said..
Once one loses that touch with the grassroots, it also raises questions regarding whose new interests you will now be representing, if not only personal, thereby defeating the whole purpose of the foundational concept of parliamentarism and parliamentary democracy, upon which our existence as MPs rests..
In short, he did not move with the winds of change, again like the Biblical Lot's wife, remained stuck in old Zanu PF utopia, and fell into disfavour of the adaptively transforming Zanu PF party, philosophy and electorate at the dawn of the new dispensation (President Emmerson Mnangagwa's era).-Newsday. If our services have assisted you, our work would be much more secure with your help - For as little as £5, you can support ZimEye – and it only takes a minute.
To receive news updates daily, enter your email address.
Enter your email address:.
The Nigerian Navy on Monday said it recovered and handed over to the Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation (NNPC), 3,181 jerry cans of petrol – Petroleum Motor Spirit (PMS) worth N11 million..
The Commander, Nigerian Navy Ship (NNS) BEECROFT, Commodore , made the disclosure while speaking to journalists in Apapa, Lagos..
He said the jerry cans were intercepted in Akaraba area, Atlas Cove, Lagos..
On July 4, at 16.00hrs, NNS BEECROFT patrol team deployed to the Atlas Cove Island conducted raids at Akaraba area based on intelligence reports..
The team recovered 3,181 in 25 litres jerry cans with product suspected to be PMS valued at N11,500,000.00..
It was further discovered that the product was sourced from several vandalised points on the NNPC pipeline on the Atlas Cove Island,.
Shettima said that the discovery resulted from the navy's aggressive patrols..
The navy under the leadership of the Chief of the Naval Staff, Vice Admiral, is determined to rid our waterways of all forms of criminality..
NNS BEECROFT is, therefore, committed to assisting NNPC and other agencies of government in dealing with the issues of pipeline vandalism and crude oil theft,.
He warned pipeline vandals and other criminals particularly in the maritime environment to desist from nefarious activities and pursue lawful means of livelihood, warning that the navy would continue to hunt them..
The News Agency of Nigeria(NAN) reports that the stolen petrol was handed over to the NNPC Atlas Cove Terminal Manager, who refused to mention his name. .
Director of the Cannabis Licensing Authority (CLA), Delano Seiveright, says emerging reforms in the United States and Europe relating to cannabis are exactly what Jamaica needs to benefit from the lucrative medical marijuana industry..
Mr. Seiveright, who recently returned from Great Britain where he joined some 80 panellists from countries across the globe at a Cannabis Europa Conference, said the stakes are too high for Jamaica not to be prepared to be a huge part of an estimated US$100-billion global medical marijuana market..
He said it is also important that the traditional local growers are given the opportunity to transition into the medicinal cannabis sector, where they are able to position themselves to capitalise on what will be an inevitable boom..
We are all here on the strength and hard work of our traditional growers.
Those are the growers who ensured that we have a brand Jamaica, in relation to cannabis and we as a body (CLA) will be doing all in our power to ensure that those who still operate in the traditional industry can transition into the legal cannabis industry, Mr. Seiveright added..
Mr. Seiveright said that in a number of States in the USA and also in Canada, medicinal cannabis has already taken on a life of its own and has been generating billions of dollars annually towards those economies..
We see what is happening in the United States where Illinois just became the latest State to legalise marijuana, Mr. Seiveright told JIS News..
A number of US attorneys general have also been lobbying the United States Treasury Department to loosen banking laws that are hostile to cannabis growers.
As our Minister of Industry, Commerce, Agriculture and Fisheries, Hon.
Audley Shaw, keeps saying, Jamaica cannot afford to miss this boat, he said..
Minister Shaw, at a function in Montego Bay, St. James, recently, said that in addition to being in solidarity with the US attorneys general, the Jamaican Government will be using all its diplomatic channels to lobby the United States Treasury Department to deal with the problem of de-risking, so that our cannabis farmers can have access to services from our local banks..
Mr. Seiveright said his visit to England has only served to reaffirm his belief that Jamaica can be a pioneer for cannabis reform globally..
Everyone is coming around to the benefits to be had from being a part of medicinal cannabis, he said..
Cannabis Europa 2019, which took place at the South Bank Centre in London, saw some 1,200 attendees, including 80 speakers and panellists from across the international community, focused on government policies and business development activities for cannabis in Europe and other countries..
Indoor levels of carbon dioxide could be clouding our thinking and may even pose a wider danger to human health, researchers say..
While air pollutants such as tiny particles and nitrogen oxides have been the subject , there have been far fewer studies looking into the health impact of CO.
However, the authors of the latest study – which reviews current evidence on the issue – say there is a growing body of research suggesting levels of COthat can be found in bedrooms, classrooms and offices might have harmful effects on the body, including affecting cognitive performance..
There is enough evidence to be concerned, not enough to be alarmed.
But there is no time to waste, said Dr Michael Hernke, a co-author of the study from the University of Wisconsin-Madison, stressing further research was needed..
Writing in the journal Nature Sustainability, Hernke and colleagues report that they considered 18 studies of the levels of COhumans are exposed to, as well as its health impacts on both humans and animals..
Traditionally, the team say, it had been thought that COwould need to reach a very high concentration of at least 5,000 parts per million (ppm) before they would affect human health.
But a growing body of research suggests CO levels as low as 1,000ppm could cause health problems, even if exposure only lasts for a few hours..
Air pollution rots our brains.
Is that why we donot do anything about it?
| James Bridle.
The team say crowded or poorly ventilated classrooms, office environments and bedrooms have all been found to have levels of CO that exceed 1,000ppm, and are spaces that people often remain in for many hours at a time.
Air-conditioned trains and planes have also been found to exceed 1,000ppm..
Indoor environments are of much more concern presently and for many people that is where they spend 60-80% of their time, said Hernke, although projections suggest by 2100 some large cities might reach outdoor CO levels of 1,000ppm for parts of the year..
The team found a number of studies have looked at the impact of such levels on human cognitive performance and productivity.
In  of 24 employees, cognitive scores were 50% lower when the participants were exposed to 1,400ppm of CO compared with 550ppm during a working day. .
The team additionally looked at the impact of COlevels on animals, finding that a few hours' exposure to 2,000 ppm was linked to inflammatory responses that could lead to damage to blood vessels.
There is also tentative evidence suggesting that prolonged exposure to levels between 2,000 and 3,000ppm is linked to effects including stress, kidney calcification and bone demineralisation..
The team add that rising outdoor levels of CO will mean rising indoor levels – a situation that could be exacerbated by greater use of certain air-conditioning units, people spending more time inside, energy-saving building techniques, and increasing urbanisation..
Any health impacts, they add, might be particularly problematic for children or those with health conditions that might exacerbate the effects.
And even if the impacts are reversible, said Hernke, it would depend on people being able to access air with low levels of CO.
The question is what happens over the very long term when you are unable to go outside and, as it were, have that carbon sucked back out of you?.
Dr Gary Fuller, an air pollution scientist at King's College London, said his team had been measuring CO levels in London for the past decade.
While levels rarely reached 1,000ppm, he said, they often exceeded 750ppm along busy roads.
Unless we decarbonise heating and transport then these peaks will worsen as the global background increases, he said. .
Greenhouse gas emissions .
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
American diplomats have been  a resolution to the Israeli-Lebanese maritime border dispute, an important step to avoiding another war between these two countries.
However, even if American mediators can resolve the dispute, Hezbollah's presence in southern Lebanon keeps alive the possibility of a devastating war..
In any future war with Israel, Hezbollah will likely rely on its growing arsenal of roughly 120,000 missiles and rockets that likely can overwhelm Israel's air defenses.
Both of us have participated in trips to the Israel-Lebanon border with the Jewish Institute for National Security of America (JINSA) that demonstrated the next war between Israel and Hezbollah will yield unprecedented destruction on both sides..
Hezbollah's ability to launch missiles against Israel has significantly improved since their last war in 2006.
In the initial phases of another war in Lebanon, Israel will be forced to quickly destroy these missile sites, bringing itself into direct contact with troops from the Lebanese Armed Forces (LAF).
These troops are distinct from Hezbollah, but their uncertain position and sheer proximity is a complicating factor since the United States has been providing aid to the LAF.
Should fighting break out, the United States could find itself funding both sides of a major war involving our closest ally in the region..
United States has provided the LAF with $1.7 billion since 2006, hoping substantial military aid would decrease Hezbollah's influence in Lebanon.
During the 2006 conflict, the LAF demonstrably distanced itself from Hezbollah.
In recent years, however, multiple factors indicate that ties between Hezbollah and the LAF are growing dangerously close.
In their joint fight against ISIS on Lebanon's northern border, the parties  military operations and deployments, and shared intelligence..
In southern Lebanon, where Hezbollah's influence is most pronounced, the LAF has ignored its obligation to enforce U.N. Security Council Resolution 1701, which calls for the disarmament of all armed groups in Lebanon other than the LAF.
Despite increased LAF troop deployments to southern Lebanon in recent years, Hezbollah's military capacity has continued growing there unchecked – including its development of offensive cross-border tunnels into Israel..
Political ties between Hezbollah and the LAF have grown alarmingly close as well.
In 2018, Hezbollah won its first majority in the Lebanese parliament.
Lebanese President Michel Aoun remains a loyal ally of Hezbollah and has repeatedly hailed Hezbollah's major and essential role in Lebanon's defense apparatus.
Likewise, Hezbollah's Secretary-General Hassan Nasrallah has  to the LAF as a partner and pillar of defense against Israel.
Hezbollah's growing partnership with the LAF has alarmed many Lebanese political leaders, especially moderates who seek to free their country's future from the grip of Iranian influence..
One of us argued in a  that American policymakers should revisit their decision to fund the LAF, given its growing connections with Hezbollah.
Unless the United States begins to recognize the dangerous implications of its current policy, the Trump administration will likely continue this funding without placing appropriate checks on the LAF's actions.
Maintaining the current policy endangers U.S. national security and that of our ally Israel..
Members of Congress from both parties recently introduced the Countering Hezbollah in Lebanon's Military Act of 2019setting conditions on 20 percent – rather than all – of U.S. aid to the LAF and Lebanese government, the bill seeks to pressure Beirut to distance itself from Hezbollah without compromising or eliminating American influence and leverage..
This bill is a welcome step in the right direction.
Congress should also consider imposing additional conditions on the U.S. military aid package, including demands that the LAF attempt to restrict Iranian arms channels to Hezbollah..
For too long, the United States has given the LAF a free pass to expand its dangerous and enabling relationship with Hezbollah, a terrorist group that has served as a destabilizing force in the Middle East.
If the trend continues, American taxpayers can expect more of their dollars to flow to an active and willing partner of Hezbollah..
The LAF could serve as an effective ally against terror, and they undoubtedly demonstrated their military capabilities in the fight against ISIS.
To protect U.S. interests in the Middle East, however, a critical reexamination of our relationship with the LAF ought to take place.
Conditioning the aid that the U.S. provides to the LAF is a necessary first step in the process..
Lt Gen Richard Natonski, USMC (ret.), is former Commander, U.S. Marine Corps Forces Command, a former observer to U.N. peacekeeping operations in the Middle East, and is currently a Distinguished Fellow at the Jewish Institute for National Security of America (JINSA).Lt Gen Thomas Trask, USAF (ret.) is former Vice Commander, United States Special Operations Command.
Both are members of JINSA's Hybrid Warfare Task Force..
Senator Abbo pleads not guilty, granted N5 million bail - PURE ENTERTAINMENT Senator Abbo pleads not guilty, granted N5 million bail.
Senator Elisha Abbo has been granted bail of N5 million, hours after the police arraigned him in court..
The senator representing Adamawa North Senatorial District was arraigned on two counts of criminal assault and criminal use of force.
This comes few days after viral video of the Senator assaulting a nursing mother..
Standing before the Chief Magistrate's Court in Zuba, Senator Abbo pleaded not guilty to both charges, bypassing his admission of wrongdoing and an apology he made last Wednesday..
Mr Abbo was granted N5 million bail and was told to present two competent sureties to the court to secure his appearance in subsequent hearings on the criminal charges..
Turkey 'hopes' for a new era with Greece under new Mitsotakis government .
Turkey hopes for a new era in ties with the new Greek government to be formed under New Democracy Party (NDP) leader Kyriakos  and one which will avoid fresh rows in Cyprus and the Aegean Sea, President Recep Tayyip  has said, while vowing continued oil and gas drilling activities in the eastern Mediterranean.. ] yesterday and congratulated him.
My wish is to run this new process with  in peace and in solidarity.
After the polls, we will carry out our talks through our relevant officials.
Our desire is not to experience any sort of difficulty in the Mediterranean and in the Aegean in the upcoming period,  told reporters before departing to Bosnia-Herzegovina where he will attend a Balkan Summit on July 8..  won around 40 percent of the votes, well ahead of Syriza's Alexis , which secured his NDP a majority in parliament to form a single party government.
The new Greek prime minister represents the second generation politicians of the  family after Konstantin ' premiership between the years of 1989 and 1922..
' election as prime minister positive, with expectations that a new era could be launched.
The former coalition government led by  had included ultra-right wing politicians, among whom a hawkish defense minister who caused tension between Ankara and Athens..  was one of the first leaders to congratulate  late July 7, in a sign of good relations for a new beginning.
The Turkish president said he hopes the results will contribute to the relations between the two countries and to regional prosperity, presidential sources have said. .
Turkish Foreign Minister Mevlüt  also congratulated  on Twitter.
Warmly congratulate New Democracy leader Kriakos  for the electoral victory.
Confident that Turkish-Greek friendship & bilateral relations will further strengthen during his leadership, .
In a written statement, Turkish Foreign Ministry spokesperson Hami Aksoy extended Turkey's message over the results of the snap elections in neighboring .
We congratulate the New Democracy leader Mr. Kyriakos , who has won the snap general elections held in  yesterday [July 7] and has been entitled to form the government, Aksoy said..
With the establishment of the government under the leadership of Mr. , we hope that our bilateral relations will be further enhanced on the basis of the friendship between Turkish-Greek peoples.
To this end, we want to swiftly revitalize existing dialogue channels and start our contacts as soon as possible to address issues on our agenda, he stressed..  have faced serious confrontations in the past, with an unresolved dispute stemming from a lack of demarcation lines in the Aegean Sea, which they share..
They came to the brink of a hot conflict in 1996 due to sovereignty claims by both sides of the Kardak/Imia islets in the Aegean..
The two foreign ministries had installed what they called exploratory talks in order to find ways to resolve these problems but are yet to conclude them.
Following tensions in the recent years, a new working group between the defense ministries has been established to discuss them..
Another important regional matter is an ongoing tension over the unilateral drilling activities of the Greek Cypriot government for hydro carbon reserves off Cyprus.
Turkey and the Turkish Cypriot government have long condemned the Greek government for conducting these activities in the disputed waters of the eastern Mediterranean at the expense of violating the rights of Turkey and of the Turkish Cypriots..
Turkey's determination not changed.
When asked a question about this tension,  reiterated Ankara's determination in moving forward in its efforts to explore and drill with two vessels, Fatih and Yavuz, which have been deployed in the eastern and western parts of the island..
Our determination, as both Turkey and the Turkish Republic of the Northern Cyprus, endures, he said, repeating once again that Turkey's activities and presence in the region will continue despite dissident voices..
This process, in coordination with our vessels' search and exploration activities, continues with its own road map.
There may be some disturbing voices but we have already made clear that they will not divert us from our path.
I am still of the same view, I am saying the same thing, he added..
TEL AVIV, July 5 (Reuters) - Israel's energy minister voiced frustration on Friday with what he called Lebanon's failure to agree to U.S.-mediated talks on setting their maritime border, suggesting Iran-backed Hezbollah was applying pressure on Beirut. .
Senior U.S. official David Satterfield has been shuttling between Lebanon and Israel in an effort to launch the talks between the countries, which have remained formally in a state of war since Israel was founded in 1948. .
Israel and Lebanon have long disagreed on border demarcations in the eastern Mediterranean, an issue that gained prominence in the past decade when large deposits of natural gas were found there. .
Israeli Energy Minister Yuval Steinitz said on June 19 he expected U.S.-mediated talks to start within a month.
On Wednesday, Lebanon insisted any demarcation of its sea boundary with Israel be implemented only as part of a wider package including the land border - something Israel has previously ruled out. .
Steinitz sounded less upbeat on Friday. .
(The) Lebanese on the one hand really want to develop their natural resources, and the unresolved dispute with Israel is disruptive for them - for us too, but for them more, Steinitz told Tel Aviv radio station 102 FM. .
But Steinetz added Lebanon could also be facing internal pressure, that they (are) under the sway of fear of Hezbollah, referring to Lebanon's most powerful armed force.
Hezbollah is also part of the Lebanese coalition government. .
Steinitz said Lebanon had yet to formally refuse the overture for mediation.
He said that in a week, 10 days we will know finally if we are on the way to talks or if this matter will be postponed by another one, two or three years. .
Officials at the U.S. Embassy in Jerusalem were not immediately available for comment.
(Reporting by Dan Williams Editing by Rami Ayyub/Mark Heinrich ). The Thomson Reuters Trust Principles..
The African Export-Import Bank (Afreximbank) says it is providing one billion dollars grant to African countries to support the implementation of the Agreement for the African Continental Free Trade Area (AfCFTA)..
In a statement by Afreximbank's spokesman, Mr Obi Emekekwue, the bank's president said this to the African Heads of States at the 12th Extraordinary Summit of African Union (AU)..
The President of the bank, Prof. Benedict Oramah, told the Heads of States, that the facility was to enable countries adjust to sudden significant tariff revenue losses as a result of the implementation of the agreement..
Oramah said the bank will also provide aid for the work being done by the African Regional Standards Organisation and the AU in implementing the agreement..
Oramah also informed the summit of the launch of the Pan-African Payment and Settlement System (PAPSS)..
He described the PAPSS as the first continent-wide payment digital system focused on facilitating payments for goods and services in intra-African trade in African currencies..
We launched the Africa-wide digital payment infrastructure, PAPSS, which was developed in collaboration with the African Union..
It is a platform that will domesticate intra-regional payments, save the continent more than 5 billion dollars in payment transaction costs per annum..
It will also help to formalise a significant proportion of the estimated 50 billion dollars of informal intra-African trade, and above all, contribute to boosting intra-African trade, he said..
Oramah said that making it possible for Africans to pay for intra-regional trade in their local currencies will aid in the development of African economies..
Our goal is to reduce, significantly, the foreign currency content of intra-African trade payments..
No people have achieved meaningful development when their economic progress depends on others..
In trying to boost trade and investment, it is imperative that we address the economic costs of effecting so many payments in scarce foreign exchange..
Making cross-border payments easier, cheaper and safer is an obvious critical step in creating an Africa we want, he said. .
The most cherished moments in my adult life, is the opportunity to get to meet the man I adored and whose name always evokes certain nostalgic feelings, General Arnold Quainoo, popularly known as Buffalo Soldier..
As he clocked 80 last Friday, General Arnold Quainoo, I do not only want to wish him a Happy Birthday, but I want to celebrate him, and tell him that, he is a true and unique leader, he opens up and welcomes all, regardless of age, tribe, profession etc and only one word sums him up, he is the 'People's' General..
The very successful story of the Ghana Armed Forces will be incomplete without the generous mentioned of General Arnold Quainoo..
He served in various capacities and established so many traditions, as well as institutions that today are the bulwark of what makes our Armed Forces one of the best in the world..
Unfortunately and sadly as a country, we do not celebrate our heroes.
Institutional memories are not documented for future generations..
The sacrifice, dedication and commitments that people like General Arnold Quainoo, gave to this country, we should establish a hall of fame, where as a country, we will give them their right of place, as we hope to aspire others to do same..
Palestinian Authority 2019 Summer Camps: Children Tear Up, Burn U.S. Flags, Pictures Of Trump .
On July 1, 2019, the PLO's Higher Council for Youth and Sports (HCYS) announced the opening of 625 summer camps, 425 of them in the West Bank and 200 in Gaza, attended by 40,000 campers, and added that this summer's camps are held under the slogan This Is Our Home and Jerusalem Is Ours.
This summer, too, alongside usual summer-camp activities the camps also offered political activities, intended to inculcate various political messages, including the importance of the Palestinian struggle and of the right of return, the centrality of Jerusalem and Al-Aqsa, and glorification of martyrdom.
The camps have names such as 'Omar Abu Laila (after the perpetrator of a recent terrorist attack in the West Bank) and [Palestine] from the River to the Sea, and some groups of campers are named after cities in the 1948 territories, like Haifa, Acre and Jaffa..
Special focus is placed this year on the right of return and on opposition to the U.S.-led Middle East peace plan known as the Deal of the Century, which is expected to be announced soon and which, according to certain leaks and assessments, will not include the right of return.
At a summer camp in the Tulkarm governorate campers even tore up and burned American flags and pictures of U.S. President Donald Trump..
HCYS chairman and Fatah Central Committee Secretary Jibril Rajoub explained that the summer camps were a basic component in shaping the campers' awareness of two main issues: that Palestine is our home and nothing can replace it, and the sanctity of the Al-Aqsa mosque.
He also stressed that the HCYS has shouldered and always will shoulder the task of raising an educated and aware generation, according to our national principles..
This report reviews some of the activities at the camps operated by the PLO's HCYS during the first days after their launching:.
Campers, Counselors Tear Up, Burn U.S. Flags, Pictures Of Trump .
As part of stressing the opposition to the Deal of the Century, a counselor at a camp in the Tulkarm governorate gave the children a lecture on the deal, following which he and the children tore up, burned and stepped on U.S. flags and pictures of President Trump.
The following are photos of this activity:.
Cops bag high-powered rifle from canine search in St Andrew South – Bes 100 FM Radio | Simply Da Bes!
Cops bag high-powered rifle from canine search in St Andrew South.
The police on Sunday night seized a high-powered rifle during an operation in a section of the St Andrew South division where a state of emergency (SOE) has been imposed..
The police said the rifle was found with the help of the Canine Division..
No details were provided about the location in the police division where the find was made..
The police, however, reported that the find was specifically made by a dog named 'Trigger' from the Canine Division..
There was no report of any arrest in relation to the gun find, but police sources have warned that they intend to step up their operations as they seek to rid the streets of illegal guns.
[Read our previous coverage of the arrest of .
Investigators seized nude photographs of young women from the Manhattan townhouse of Jeffrey Epstein as part of a new investigation into allegations he exploited dozens of minors for sex, prosecutors revealed on Monday..  by federal prosecutors on Monday as they unsealed an indictment charging Mr. Epstein with sex trafficking and made an appeal to other women who may have been abused by him to come forward. .
They deserve their day in court and we are proud to stand up for them by bringing this indictment, the United States attorney in Manhattan, Geoffrey S. Berman, said..
Hundreds, and possibly thousands, of sexually suggestive pictures of nude or partially nude young women and girls were found during a search of Mr. Epstein's Manhattan townhouse on Saturday, conducted at roughly the same time the financier was arrested at Teterboro Airport in New Jersey, prosecutors said..
It was striking, prosecutors said in court documents, that Mr. Epstein, having been convicted of a sex offense involving an underage victim, would continue to maintain a vast trove of lewd photographs of young-looking women or girls..
The cache of photos, some of which were discovered in a locked safe that also contained CDs with labels like Girl pics nude, demonstrate the predatory attitude that Mr. Epstein continues to have toward young women, prosecutors said in a detention memo filed on Monday..
Mr. Epstein is not reformed, he is not chastened, he is not repentant, prosecutors wrote to the judge, arguing against bail..
The indictment accuses Mr. Epstein, 66, of engaging in sex acts with dozens of vulnerable minors, some as young as 14, during naked massage sessions, then paying them hundreds of dollars in cash.
He also asked some of the girls to recruit other underage girls, the indictment said..
In this way, Epstein created a vast network of underage victims for him to sexually exploit in locations including New York and Palm Beach, the indictment states..
In addition to his homes in Manhattan and Palm Beach, prosecutors said Mr. Epstein has four other residences: a primary home on a privately owned island in the United States Virgin Islands, Little Saint James; a home on Great St. James in the Virgin Islands; property in Paris and a ranch about an hour east of Albuquerque..
The government also said in court papers that prosecutors have real concerns, based on past experience,that Mr. Epstein, if freed on bail, could attempt to pressure and intimidate witnesses, including his accusers and their families..
Prosecutors are also seeking the forfeiture of Mr. Epstein's home on East 71st Street between Fifth and Madison Avenues, which has been called one of the largest townhouses in Manhattan.
It has at least seven floors and covers 21,000 square feet. .
The indictment said Mr. Epstein used employees and assistants to arrange sexual  with at least one girl at his New York residence and two at his home in Palm Beach. .
Mr. Epstein is accused of having the girls perform nude massages, at which point he would masturbate and touch their genitals with his hands or with sex toys. .
The girls were paid hundreds of dollars in cash for each encounter and, once recruited, were asked to return to the mansion several times, where they were abused again, the indictment said.
Mr. Epstein, the court documents read, created a similar network of minor girls to victimize in Florida..
This conduct, as alleged, went on for years and involved dozens of young girls, some as young as 14, Mr. Berman said.
The alleged behavior shocks the conscience. .
The charges unsealed Monday by the Southern District of New York signal a prosecution that some of his accusers have been awaiting for years. .
Accusations of pedophilia and sexual predation have dogged Mr. Epstein for decades.
And now, in the #MeToo era, his case had been held up as a prime example of insulated, powerful men avoiding accountability..
For more than a decade, Mr. Epstein, a hedge fund manager, avoided a lengthy prison sentence, largely because of the agreement his lawyers struck with federal prosecutors in 2008. .
Mr. Epstein's social circle is filled with the rich and famous,including former President Bill Clinton and Prince Andrew of Britain. .
In 2002, Mr. Trump described Mr. Epstein as a terrific guy..
He's a lot of fun to be with, Mr. Trump told .
It is even said that he likes beautiful women as much as I do, and many of them are on the younger side..
Most people affected by diabetes are unaware that they even have the condition.
According to the Zimbabwe Diabetic Association over of Zimbabweans probably have diabetes .. The incidence rate in the country has increased  and in 2014 almost 17000 Zimbabweans died from diabetes-related conditions..  interview this year, the President of the Diabetic Association and specialist diabetologist, Dr. John C. Mangwiro stated that most types of diabetes can be reduced through a proper diet.
Nutritionally, Zimbabweans are eating wrong, they are sticking to these so called western diets which make them very obese, he said..
Diabetes has two types.
Type 1 which people are usually born with and Type 2 which tends to develop in middle age and is related to consumption of excess sugar and refined carbohydrates coupled with lack of exercise.
The condition can be fatal and may lead to heart and blood vessel disease; damage to the nerves, kidneys, eyes and feet as well as hearing impairment, skin conditions and Alzheimer's disease..
There is no cure for diabetes and once you have it you have to change your diet and your lifestyle as well as take medication in the form of daily tablets or injections.
In Zimbabwe this can be expensive and sometimes diabetes medication is hard to obtain..
It is crucial to detect the symptoms as early as possible in order to limit possible damage.
Detection of Type 2 Diabetes often only occurs at a doctor's visit during an examination for an unrelated condition by which stage damage may have occurred already.
Symptoms are as follows:.
Fatigue, especially after meals.
Often hungry, especially if shortly after eating.
Urinating more often (especially at night).
Slow healing of cuts or wounds.
Regular Candida infections ( Thrush).
Skin disorders such as Psoriasis or Acanthosis Nigricans.
Sudden weight loss or loss of muscle mass.
It appears that little has been done to educate Zimbabweans about the dangers of eating too much sugar even though the mortality figures from Type 2 Diabetes are possibly on a par or higher than that of HIV/AIDS..
Thankfully, it is possible to either prevent or improve the condition through healthy food choices, dietary changes, and exercise used in conjunction with medication suggested by your doctor or clinic.
Here are some suggestions:.
Cut down considerably or try to completely remove sugary foods from your diet.
This does not just mean reducing the number of spoons of sugar in your tea although that is a good start.
Sugar comes in many forms.
Most snacks and processed foods (even those which are not sweet) often contain sugar or corn syrup which is even worse.
Always read the label when buying food or drinks.
If you feel hungry eat fresh fruit, roasted peanuts, maputi, roasted maize or caterpillars (madora, amaximbi)..
Unfortunately honey and syrup are just as bad as sugar.
Alcohol also has a high sugar content and should be reduced.
Heavy drinkers are more likely to get diabetes than those who drink in moderation..
One of the main sources of sugar is fizzy drinks and sodas.
A study published in the British Medical Journal (http://www.bmj.com/content/351/bmj.h3576) found that drinking just one soda per day can increase your risk of getting Type 2 Diabetes by 22 percent.
In Zimbabwe we are fortunate to have many healthy drinks alternatives including mahewu, baobab juice and delicious herbal teas..
Reduce your meat intake and avoid processed meats such as polony, ham and bacon.
Instead, a couple of times per week, eat legumes (such as cowpeas, nyimo beans or sugar beans), fish and lean meats such as chicken without skin..
Lowered salt intake and eating smaller portions has also been shown to reduce diabetes risks and symptoms.
You should not take more than one 5ml teaspoon of salt per day in food.
Avoid adding salt to meals during cooking and cut down on salty snacks.
This will also help reduce blood pressure problems..
Use your hand to measure how much food to have in each meal.
Your fist represents the amount of energy-giving food (such as sadza, rice, pasta, potatoes or bread); the palm of your hand represents how much meat and the tip of your index finger represents the amount of fat or oil you need.
There are no limits on the amount of fruit and vegetables..
Increasing the amount of fibre (roughage) in your diet helps reduce the risks of diabetes as well as blood pressure, cardiovascular problems and some types of cancer.
Dietary fibre is contained in fruit, vegetables, legumes and whole grained cereals..
Eat at least five portions of fruit and vegetables per day such as a cup of rape, a banana, half a medium sized avocado, a five centimetre piece of cucumber and half a cup of pumpkin.
Remember that indigenous vegetables (such as amaranth, bonongwe, imbuya) and indigenous fruit (such as marula, baobab and masau) are rich in fibre and many nutrients often in higher concentrations than exotic fruit and vegetables..
Eat foods rich in Magnesium, Potassium, Zinc and Chromium such as spinach, potatoes, sweet potatoes, pumpkin, butternut, bananas, oranges, guavas, watermelons, sunflower seeds, pumpkin seeds, beans, onions and garlic.
Vitamin D which is produced in the body with regular daily exposure to sunlight is also important..
Exercising for at least 20 minutes per day has also been shown to help people with Type 2 Diabetes.
Regular movement helps regulate insulin and therefore less is needed to move sugar out of the bloodstream and into the cells..
There are also a number of herbal remedies which can be used to help control the condition.
These include cinnamon, fenugreek and ginger which can be added to food or taken as tea..
If you suspect that you may have Type 2 Diabetes, firstly go to your doctor or clinic to be tested.
Once your diagnosis has been confirmed you should start to reassess your lifestyle and dietary choices.
By making these changes, this common and dangerous health condition can be brought under control..
Source: Naturally Zimbabwean.
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
26 June 2019: Standard Chartered Bank today announced the official launch of its digital bank in Zimbabwe, making another pioneering innovation by the Bank in the market.
The launch of digitally-led bank follows launches in Uganda, Tanzania, Ghana and Kenya in the first quarter of the year and Côte d'Ivoire in 2018. .
Standard Chartered's digital bank comes with world-class digital capabilities, bringing greater convenience to clients enabling them to live their lives and passions whilst banking on the go.
With the bank digitising 70 of the most common service requests including blocking and ordering a debit card, adding/removing a signatory, requesting a visa support letter or opening an additional account, local and international funds transfer ,all without the need to visit a branch. .
Commenting on the launch, Lovemore Manatsa, Standard Chartered Bank Chairman, said: We are very excited to launch the digital bank in Zimbabwe.
This is a key milestone in our digital journey as a Bank and underlines our commitment to investing and growing in the market.
We have been steadily investing in and expanding our digital footprint in Zimbabwe – this will continue to be a priority moving forward.
Digitising banking in the country in line with global trends remains at the heart of our business strategy..
By digitising the entire banking experience, Standard Chartered is offering secure banking services via mobile devices to meet rapidly changing client needs at the right scale.
Clients will continue to enjoy exclusive benefits from an increased number of alliances and partnerships spanning travel, shopping and dining..
Speaking at the launch event, Head of Retail Banking, Valeta Mthimkhulu said, Our digital bank was developed with our clients in mind.
We have taken into consideration their feedback at each stage of the design process, and have incorporated innovative technology to allow them to execute all banking activities from a mobile phone via the Standard Chartered Bank App – SC Mobile Zimbabwe..
Valeta said she was delighted to see the progress that Zimbabwe has made over the past decade as far as digital banking is concerned.
We have seen how digital transformation has contributed to economic development and will continue to do so, in line with the country's National ICT plan..
Standard Chartered used the launch to unveil its Digital Banking Influencer – EXQ – who has partnered with the Bank to boost awareness of the new digital bank, and help to spread the word about how convenient, accessible and rewarding it is for clients to bank anywhere, anytime. .
The digital bank is available by downloading the Standard Chartered mobile app – SC Mobile Zimbabwe – for free via both Google Play Store and the Apple Store.
For more information or interview opportunities, please contact:.
The maximum pressure exerted by the US on Iran is the root cause of the Iranian nuclear crisis, Geng Shuang, spokesman for China's Foreign Ministry, told a press briefing in Beijing on Monday, according to Russia Today..
Shuang likened Washington's reintroduced sanctions to 'bullying' and said they've become a 'worsening tumor' for the global community.
While expressing regret at Iran's decision, the spokesman reiterated that the current discord over the country's nuclear program should be resolved diplomatically..
The facts show that unilateral bullying has already become a worsening tumor..
During a press conference in Tehran yesterday, at the end of Iran's 60-day deadline to the European countries, Iran announced the second phase of measures under the deal in response to US withdrawal and EU's lack of practical measures, and said that uranium enrichment level would surpass the 3.67% limit..
Iran stresses that the reductions in commitments do not violate the nuclear deal, but they are based on paragraphs 26 and 36 of the agreement..
In reactions to Iran's countermeasures, Russia's Permanent Representative to International Organizations in Vienna Mikhail Ulyanov said that Moscow understands the reasons behind steps taken by Iran.
According to Ulyanov, Iran's decision to increase uranium enrichment levels was not unexpected as Tehran is acting in a transparent manner..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
He said this in response to the claim by Nasir El-Rufai, Governor of Kaduna State, that Northerners are rarely arrested for advance fee fraud, popularly known in local parlance as Yahoo Yahoo..
Speaking at the Northern Youth summit organized by Northern Hibiscus Initiative in Kaduna on Saturday, El-Rufai said although North was the most backward and uneducated region in Nigeria, it was a thing of pride that Northerners are rarely arrested for Yahoo Yahoo and other financial crimes..
El-Rufai had said: Nigeria consists of two countries; there is a backward, less educated and unhealthy northern Nigeria, and a developing, largely educated and healthy southern Nigeria.
We have to speak the truth to ourselves and ask why is it that northern Nigeria has development indicators similar to Afghanistan, a country still at war?.
We have the largest number of poor people in the world, most of them in northern Nigeria.
Nigeria also has the largest number of out of school children, virtually all of them in Northern Nigeria..
We are being considered as the parasite of the federal economy, even though, that is not entirely true.
Because northern Nigeria still feeds the nation.
The richest business man in Nigeria is still Aliko Dangote, not someone from Southern Nigeria, thank God for that..
So, we still have a lot to be proud of.
We should be proud of our culture and tradition, as well as unity.
You hardly can find someone from northern Nigeria convicted of 419 or being a Yahoo boy.
That is something we should be proud of..
We are generally considered to be more honest and less corrupt than other Nigerians.
That is something we should be proud of..
However, Fani-Kayode, while countering El-Rufai's claim, tweeted: Put the EFCC, the Police and DSS in the hands of Southerners and see what happens.
Northerners have looted the treasury over the last 59 years of our nation's existence more than ANY other group of Nigerians..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
Jeffrey Epstein, a hedge fund billionaire with ties to top politicians and celebrities, was charged on Monday with sexually exploiting dozens of young girls..
Epstein, 66, was arrested at an airport in New Jersey on Saturday after returning to the United States from Paris on a private jet..
In an indictment unsealed in US District Court for the Southern District of New York, he was charged with one count of sex trafficking of minors and one count of conspiracy to commit sex trafficking of minors..
Epstein appeared in a Manhattan courtroom on Monday and pleaded not guilty to the charges which carry a maximum of 45 years in prison..
A bail hearing was set for Thursday..
Geoffrey Berman, the US attorney for the Southern District of New York, said he would ask that Epstein be detained until trial..
Members of a protest group called Hot Mess hold up signs of Jeffrey Epstein.
We think he's a significant flight risk, Berman told a news conference.
He has enormous wealth and the charges are very serious..
Berman said Epstein allegedly sexually exploited dozens of minor girls at his homes in Manhattan, New York and Palm Beach, Florida, between 2002 and 2005..
Some of the girls were as young as 14 years old and particularly vulnerable to exploitation, he said, adding that Epstein was well aware that many of the victims were minors..
The alleged behaviour shocks the conscience, Berman said.
And while the charged conduct is from a number of years ago, it is still profoundly important to the many alleged victims, now young women..
They deserve their day in court and we are proud to be standing up for them by bringing this indictment, he said..
The US Attorney said the girls were paid hundreds of dollars in cash to perform sexual acts and to recruit other girls..
Berman said a search had been conducted of Epstein's Manhattan mansion and agents seized nude photographs of what appear to be underage girls..
Berman and an FBI agent who attended the news conference appealed to any other women who were victims of Epstein to come forward..
Epstein, a well-connected financier whose friends have included President Donald Trump, former president Bill Clinton and Prince Andrew, was convicted previously of paying young girls for sexual massages at his Palm Beach mansion..
But he avoided federal prosecution in those cases with a 2007 plea deal negotiated by his lawyers with Alexander Acosta, now the labor secretary in the Trump administration..
Under the deal, he pleaded guilty to a state charge of soliciting prostitution from a minor and served 13 months in a county jail..
Acosta, who was the top federal prosecutor in Miami at the time, has been the target of a campaign demanding his resignation over the relatively light sentence handed down to the billionaire financier..
Berman, the US Attorney, was asked by reporters why the plea agreement negotiated in Florida did not apply to New York..
That agreement only binds the Southern District of Florida, Berman said.
The Southern District of New York is not bound by that agreement and is not a signatory to that agreement..
Berman also told reporters he would have no comment on speculation about any individuals other than Epstein whose names have been raised previously in the case..
Governor Willie Obiano of Anambra State on Monday urged the Federal Government to investigate the alleged murder of Obianuju Ndubuisi-Chukwu's in Johannesburg..
Don Adinuba, Anambra State Commissioner for Information and Public Enlightenment, in a statement advised the Federal Government to prevail on the South African government to act decisively over the murder of the Nigerian, who was the Deputy Director General of the Chartered Insurance Institute of Nigeria..
Ndubuisi-Chukwu was found dead in her Emperor Palace Hotel room on Thursday, June 13..
She was reported to have died while attending a meeting of the African Insurance Organisation in the South African commercial capital..
Obiano said: It has become necessary to request the SGF to personally wade into the killing..
The police in Johannesburg may be capitalising on the absence of a foreign minister in Nigeria to treat the case with levity..
According to him, there is report on death of 53-year old indigene of Anambra State, which suggest that the South African police are treating this murder as just another Nigerian's death..
He said:  It is disheartening that more than three weeks after the dastardly act, the South African police have not deemed it necessary to investigate the heinous crime with the seriousness it deserves..
Ndubuisi-Chukwu was not an ordinary person, but a top corporate executive who was billed to become chief executive of her organisation in 2020..
She was representing Nigeria at the meeting in Johannesburg where she met her untimely death..
He said that although the South African Department of Home Affairs had in an autopsy report said that Ndubuisi-Chukwu was strangulated, it was not true..
He described the autopsy report as contradicting an earlier version of the report that suggested that she might have died in her sleep or committed suicide..
Obiano suggested the South African Police should carryout investigation to unearth the person or persons who entered her room after her attendance at the farewell dinner held on Wednesday, June 12..
He said: The job has been made easier now because Emperor Palace Hotel has agreed to release the CCTV footage to them..
Obiano promised not to relent in quest for justice over Anambra indigenes whose life is wasted in Nigeria or abroad, saying that Ndubuisi-Chukwu's death has become subject of intense media scrutiny..
He, however, commended Prof. Chidi Odinkalu, past Chairman, Nigerian Human Rights Commission, on the effort being made to ensure justice is carried out in memory of Ndubuisi-Chukwu, mother of two boys..
The newly appointed Member of Mayoral Committee (MMC) for Community Safety, Clr Pheladi Frans Mmoko, took up the reins on June 13 following both the national and provincial government elections which took place in May.. Mmoko, who has been a member of the Community Safety Oversight Committee for a couple of years, is well-versed with the happenings in terms of community safety..
Community safety comprises two departments namely, Ekurhuleni Metropolitan Police Department (EMPD) and Disaster and Emergency Services Department (DEMS), and at the helm of these departments are chief of police Isaac Jabulani Mapiyeye and Sam Sibande, respectively..
EMPD operations pounce on drunken drivers, crime suspects.
Mmoko, who possesses an unquestionable passion and energy for service delivery and displaying intention to hit the ground running, invited the heads of department (HODs) of EMPD and DEMS, together with their divisional heads, to a meet-and-greet session in Bedfordview with the purpose of putting faces to the names he has never met before, as well as to get to know his team better..
The messages Mmoko delivered during the session were inspiring and invigorating; everybody agreed it augurs well for the team acquitting themselves for the work that lies ahead..
THREE hundred and thirty-two graduates are currently undergoing intensive training at Ecobank Academy in preparation for full employment into Ecobank Nigeria.
The programme combines the three categories of entry level, graduate and management trainees with a programme duration of two months, 12 months and 21 months, respectively..
Ecobank's development programmes are part of the bank's talent development strategy to continue to churn out excellently trained banking professionals at various levels of the industry to feed into her talent pipeline and the banking industry.
They are founded on global best practice that prepare the candidates for banking careers in positions aligned with their potential, competencies and experience at the entry point of functional pre-managerial roles..
As part of this plan, 100 fresh graduates recently joined the Entry Level programme – a two-month training ground for fresh graduates to prepare them to join the Bank's workforce at the entry point and rapidly gain experience to rise through the ranks.
These graduates will be exposed to classroom training, action learning as well as valuable mentorship to quickly prepare them for full employment in the bank..
In keeping with its talent development strategy, the first batch of 25 Graduate Trainees who recently passed out after 12 months of intensive capacity enhancement training have since been offered full employment with Ecobank Nigeria.
Their training combines classroom, on–the-job, book reading and action learning models which provides the candidates with global exposure and ability to compete internationally..
In his comment during the graduation ceremony, Patrick Akinwuntan, managing director, Ecobank Nigeria, congratulated the graduands and encouraged them to keep their vision of getting to the top of their career..
According to Akinwuntan, the trainee programme initiative is part of Ecobank's transformation agenda to make the bank a most preferred financial institution in the country..
This programme is our own way as a bank to invest in creating future leaders for the Nigerian banking industry.
We are investing in the people to accomplish our vision both as a bank and a country.
A key success factor of any bank is capital; and we must therefore train those who will be empowered to oversee this capital and put it to good use in the interest of depositors and investors.
Staff of banks must be well trained and knowledgeable so that they can ensure that funds in the banks are effectively deployed.
For us at Ecobank, we must also ensure that we deliver on our promise as a financial institution of choice not only in Nigeria, but the whole of Africa.
We therefore take the development of adequately trained manpower as a must do in striving to achieve our goals..
Akinwuntan also stated that Ecobank deploys top notch technology and innovation which are the platforms needed to drive its vision to be a leader in the provision of financial services across Africa.
In his words, we provide full service banking right from the wholesale business to the small, medium scale and to individuals.
To do this, we've built technology services that enable us deliver our services in a convenient, accessible and reliable manner.
This is affordable and sustainable to our customers, while also ensuring good returns to our shareholders..
– July 8, 2019 @ 19:29 GMT.
(Visited 6 times, 6 visits today).
Lionel Messi is facing a potential two-year ban from international football following his comments made after Argentina's victory over Chile in the third-place playoff at Copa America..
Argentina were beaten in the semi-final by fierce rivals Brazil who went on to go and beat Peru in Sunday's final..
Messi was sent off in the third-place playoff for a clash with Chile's Gary Medel, in which the former Cardiff midfielder appeared to be the aggressor. .
But the referee gave both players their marching orders and Messi spoke of his disgust after the match – suggesting the competition was set up for Brazil to win..
Messi said: There is no doubt the whole thing is set up for Brazil.
I hope the VAR and referees donot play any part in the final and that Peru can compete but it looks tough to me..
I did not want to be part of this corruption.
We shouldnot have to be part of this disrespect we suffered during the Copa America..
We could have gone further but we werenot allowed into the final.
Corruption, referees and all the rest stopped people from enjoying the football..
I always tell the truth and I'm honest, that is what keeps me calm, if what I say has repercussions that is not my business..
I think that what happened is because of what I said (against Brazil)..
What I said last time perhaps came back to haunt me.
With a yellow card that was the end of it..
CONMEBOL regulations prohibit 'insulting in any means or manner and carries a ban of up to two years..
A two-year suspension would see Messi miss qualification for the 2022 World Cup as well as the Copa America next year in Argentina and Colombia..
Messi scored 33 goals from 21 appearances during the '12-13 season.
He scored a total of 46 goals from 32 games that season.
However, his record of 21 games was halted by Atlético Madrid on May 12, 2013..
ABUJA – The Central Bank of Nigeria (CBN) says it has released N35.9 billion to 166 projects under its Commercial Agriculture Credit Scheme..
The CBN Governor, Mr Godwin Emefiele, made this known at a meeting with vice chancellors of University-based Poultry Revival Programme in Abuja on Monday..
Emefiele, who spoke through Dr Okwu Nnanna, the CBN Deputy Governor on Economic Policy, said the apex bank's interventions such as the Commercial Agriculture Credit Scheme and the Real Sector Support Facility had addressed the problem faced appreciably..
He said that N507 million was also released to 433 farmers and another N238 million to 112 projects under Agri-Business Small and Medium Enterprises Investment Scheme..
Emefiele said that apart from these interventions, CBN had recently financed the pioneer egg-powder production company in Nigeria to the tune of N2 billion under the Differentiated Cash Reserve Requirement-Real Sector Support Facility (DCRR-RSSF) window..
Speaking on the poultry revival programme, he said we have asked for information on the capacity of institutions and companies' poultry pens, hatcheries, feed mills, size of crop farm and number of tractors for grains production..
Others are commercially viable and bankable business plan; including processing facility as well as any other information that would enrich your participation in the programme..
We rely on the University based poultry production model because you have the existing Infrastructure, experience and human assets to enable production at reduced cost and in a competitive manner..
Let me emphasize that we have structured this Programme to ensure that they can be accessed by those who need them the most and are ready to operate their facilities in a commercially viable manner..
This programme is directly in conformity with our resolve to diversify the economy, be catalyst for job creation and inclusive economic growth.
While these are our ultimate goals, our main intermediate objective is to ensure that poultry production is increased as well as end the smuggling of poultry products into the country..
The CBN would be committing considerable human, material, and financial resources to monitoring both the disbursement and utilization of these funds in a robust and verifiable manner..
Participating institutions will be required to submit periodic returns on disbursements as well as an analysis of the impacts of the Fund they received he said..
Emefiele said that CBN would also undertake regular on and off-site checks to ascertain veracity of the reports received hence enjoined the institutions, to help the bank in achieving these goals by ensuring that these funds were deployed in an effective and efficient manner..
Mr Ezekiel Ibrahim, one of the participants and the President of Poultry Association of Nigeria, commended the CBN governor for the initiative..
Ibrahim said he was optimistic that this initiative would address the main challenge in the sub-sector, the problem of cost per capita..
According to him, this intervention will also go a long way in addressing smuggling of poultry products into the country..
Author: Tsuneo Akaha, Middlebury Institute of International Studies at Monterey.
Even before US President Donald Trump's inauguration in 2017, Japanese Prime Minister Shinzo Abe took steps to develop a personalised relationship with the new leader to put Japan–US relations on a sustainable trajectory.
He has since held  face-to-face meetings and phone conversations with Trump — but has little to show for it.. concerned about the shifting balance of power in Asia — China's spectacular rise, the United States' relative decline, and Japan's 'lost decades'.
Another element of change is Russia's 'pivot to the east', a reaction to its deteriorating relations with the West over Russia's annexation of Crimea.
Against this backdrop, Tokyo wants to ensure that the United States will be a stabilising regional force..
After gambling on Trump to help stabilise Japan's security environment and protect its foreign policy and national security interests, Abe now faces the disturbing consequences of Trump's unpredictable and disruptive character.
The Trump administration has undergone top-level personnel changes of unprecedented frequency.
The very legitimacy of his presidency is under question due to evidence of pro-Trump Russian interference in the 2016 presidential election and the Trump administration's attempts to obstruct justice during subsequent FBI investigations..
Trump's major policy decisions are equally unsettling.
Under the banner of 'America First', Washington has unilaterally withdrawn from the Trans-Pacific Trade Partnership, the Paris Climate Accord, the Intermediate-Range Nuclear Forces Treaty, and the Iran nuclear deal, as well as renegotiating the North American Free Trade Agreement — all international agreements supported by Tokyo..
Unilateralism also characterises Washington's approach toward Pyongyang, one of the most pressing problems for Tokyo.
Trump has held three meetings with Kim Jong-un — in Singapore in June 2018, Hanoi in February 2019, and Panmunjom in June 2019 .
A human resource service dubbed: Deliver My HR, has been launched in Accra to provide human resource support to small scale businesses with little or no internal professional expertise..
Launched by the International Human Resource consultants, OML Africa, on Wednesday, the initiative is intended to help grow the Ghanaian Informal and Small Business..
The provision focuses on helping entrepreneurs find the peace of mind to concentrate on their core business..
In an address, the managing consultant, OML Africa, Ms Anita Wiafe-Asinor, underscored the important roles informal and small businesses play in the socio-economic development of the country. .
She stated that with the explosion in youth population growth resulting from the annual increases in graduates coming out of our vocational, technical and tertiary institutions, the informal had become the main guaranteed and ready source of employment available for the majority of these youth..
Ms Wiafe-Asinor was quick  to add that many businesses were faced with  difficult and hostile business climate, which affected their growth, stressing that  If you meet any Ghanaian businessman or woman, you would hear a lot of worrying stories of how they ploughed through uncharted terrain, falling and rising before coming to where they are now with the greatest challenge being Human resource..
Shedding light on a report, the managing consultant said 70 percent of organisations in the country did not have HR as a strategic partner, with 20 percent out of the remaining 30 percent having their HR departments not working efficiently..
In addition,  she said, My long HR experience working across industries in Africa and beyond made me recognise that a business does not always require a permanent HR function just as long as it has access to expert support when it needs it..
Giving  his personal experiences, Mr Emmanuel Awunee, a start-up Business Development Consultant and the Chief Executive Officer  (CEO)  of SESIL Consult, disclosed how he lost huge sums of  money because he did not have in place good HR policies and structures..
Mr Awunee lauded the OML for their initiative in providing confidential services to small scale medium enterprises..
Considering how predictably comfortable this was, Nadal was asked afterwards whether he felt it was right that he opened up Centre Court while Ashleigh Barty was relegated to Court No 2..
Barty, beaten on Monday, was top seed and world No 1.
'I am the world No 2 and I won 18 Grand Slams,' Nadal said in response.
'My answer is not no or yes.
My answer is they make a decision..
'You are putting Ashleigh Barty in front of me.
For me, both decisions are good..
'In the world of tennis today, honestly, my feeling is today I am little bit more than Ashleigh Barty, even if Ashleigh Barty is the first player of the world and she already won in the French Open and she is playing unbelievable good..
'But we canot create polemics every single day about decisions that they have to take.
At the end of the day they have to make a decision.'.
World No 1 Ashleigh Barty lost to American Alison Rikse on Court Two in women's singles.
Right or wrong, the Centre Court crowd witnessed a masterclass from the King of Clay who is clearly enjoying the unusually slow conditions of the All England Club courts..
'Vintage Nadal on grass,' was how BBC commentator Boris Becker described it.
Indeed it was, and this was a message for Messrs Federer and Djokovic, the top two seeds..
'I am in quarter-finals, I have been playing good matches, and today was another good one,' said Nadal, who last won Wimbledon in 2010.
'That gives me confidence..
'Now starts the most difficult part of the tournament.
Querrey is going to be there in front of me.
That is going to be a big challenge.
I hope to be ready for it.'.
At 6ft 7in, Querrey will indeed be a 'big challenge'.
He is the only player at these Championships to have hit 100 or more aces, so you can guess how he could hurt Nadal..
Yet the Spaniard appears to be on a level of his own, and Sousa never stood a chance..
Nadal had a 4-0 lead inside the opening ten minutes of the match.
As one spectator on Centre Court shouted in jest: 'Serves him right for knocking two Brits out!'.
Sousa had seen off Paul Jubb in the first round then Evans in the third and looked leggy.
He lost the opening set 6-2 in 29 minutes, then the second set 6-2 in 38..
In the third and serving for the match, Nadal held to love, finishing with an ace and moving into Wimbledon's quarter-finals for the seventh time in his career..
Comeback Queen!
Jo Konta produces inspired win despite ankle...
Novak Djokovic through to quarter-finals of Wimbledon after...'My vote is for Murena': Serena Williams has the final word...'It's in the heat of the moment, it's an unfortunate comment....
Pogba and Lingard appear to clash on first day of United's pre-season tour in video released on club's Twitter account  .
'My feeling is today I am little bit more than Barty': Naughty Nadal belittles world No 1 over Centre Court row  KIERAN GILL ON CENTRE COURT .
'To play in front of a home crowd, you're always going to be spoilt': Konta looking to harness crowds  MIKE DICKSON AT WIMBLEDON .
'You need to be able to see Nelson's Column and the Queen from the track': Red Bull boss Horner's warning as F1 plan London Grand Prix   Silverstone will be saved  .
Neymar and PSG at war: Superstar fails to turn up to training and club brandish him 'deplorable' as he tries to force through move  Barcelona want him  .
Fury willing to face Miller despite failed drug tests... while Khan's fight against Dib is as meaningless as ME boxing Alvarez! .
Arsenal agree fee worth around £26m to sign 18-year-old French centre back Saliba from Saint Etienne  They could loan him back for the season  .
United 'pursue Chelsea midfielder Bakayoko' as Solskjaer looks to continue summer rebuild  Could Chelsea midfielder be right for United?  .
With just one month to go until the Premier League transfer window closes, here are 10 big deals that could go through .
United gambled by sacking Mourinho and backing Pogba... but it's now backfired as the Frenchman tries to leave Old Trafford  Wants Real Madrid move  .
'We wouldnot say it was handball': Liverpool's penalty against Tottenham in would NOT be given by VAR under PL laws  According to referee chief .
Here comes the £150m man!
Hazard reports for his first day of Real Madrid training as Zidane knocks his new-look side into shape  New season, new team  .
How do you follow that?
Guardiola arrives back at work for first day of City pre-season training as they look to top last season  Can he conquer Europe?  .
Walker 'canot stay away' from City team-mate De Bruyne as duo link up on holiday ahead of return for pre-season   Top players enjoying the last of the summer break .
United Down Under:  Stars touch down in Perth as Pogba and co begin tour of Australia, Singapore and China after 19-hour flight  Pre-season underway .
Parris reveals she's 'proud to sign for the biggest club in the world' after being unveiled at Lyon  Lioness puts World Cup woe behind her .
Dybala thanks Lionel Messi for lending him his lucky red ribbon before Copa America third-place play-off  It pays off as Juventus star scores his first goal .
Jesus wept!
Man City and Brazil star rages after sending off in Copa America final  Punched the VAR booth, blasted water bottle and then burst into tears .
Defoe dedicates goal to Bradley Lowery on second anniversary of his death as Rangers record pre-season win  Gerrard's side beat Oxford 5-0 at Ibrox .
Lampard signs autographs for fans in Ireland as new Chelsea boss puts his players through their paces in gruelling pre-season  First match this week .
Konta happy on centre stage!
Last Brit standing is channelling her inner Jodie Comer ahead of last-16 clash against Kvitova  She's a big Killing Eve fan .
PSG star Mbappe joins French President Emmanuel Macron to watch women's World Cup final in Lyon between US and Holland  American won it 2-0 .
Benitez gets off to perfect start in Chinese Super League as former Newcastle boss guides Dalian Yifang to routine win over Henan Jianye  Signed £12m-a-year deal .
Real Sociedad unveil Odegaard after signing on season-long loan from Real Madrid...
As SEVEN other new players are introduced at the Anoeta .
Pogba's on the plane!
United wantaway star joins team-mates for flight to Australia  The squad announcement was delayed due to uncertainty over future  .
Fury confirms Wilder rematch for February 22 and vows to 'knock him the f*** out...
I havenot been abusing alcohol this time'  Date in the diary  .
Masvidal stuns UFC 239 by delivering a brutal flying knee knockout within FIVE SECONDS  It even caught the ref off guard!  .
Milner leaves fan in disbelief after going to coffee shop with team-mate Lallana  The pair visited their local Starbucks and left one employee in awe .
'As a teenager I was yards from a bomb that blew up my club.
It's a miracle The Open is back!'
EXCLUSIVE BY OLIVER HOLT .
'Fingers crossed I can make it through the pain'  Former Open champion John Daly will try to play 'through the pain' at Royal Portrush .
Murray and Serena make strong start in quest for mixed doubles glory as they pick up straight sets win  MIKE DICKSON AT WIMBLEDON .
'It is a nonsense game': Neville dismisses World Cup play-off  He challenged England to return stronger from their World Cup heartache .
'Wish a bomb would explode on this club': Italian Fognini in astonishing on-court rant against Wimbledon  He went on to lose 3-6, 6-, 3-6 .
Murray crashes out of men's doubles in second round with partner Herbert after losing to Skugor and Mektic at SW19   Beaten 6-7, 6-4, 6-2, 6-3 .
Loftus-Cheek signs new £150,000-a-week Chelsea deal as Lampard ushers in new era   'I hope to win a lot more trophies with the team'  .
Top seed Barty outclasses Brit Dart on Centre Court to cruise into second week   World No 1 wrapped up a 6-1, 6-1 victory in just 52 minutes .
'My god, you're so tall': Klopp shocked by new-boy Van den Berg on return to Melwood - but will they hit new heights this season?
Pre-season begins  .
Pogba works out in Central Park as midfielder stays in shape ahead of potential United exit  Shared videos of himself performing sprints .
Lampard takes charge of Chelsea training for the first time since becoming Blues boss  He runs the rule over his squad during a session in Ireland  .
'I'd like to see him here': De Jong uses unveiling to urge former Ajax team-mate De Ligt to join him at Barcelona  The £75m midfielder presented at Nou Camp  .
'I was sitting in bed with the worst thoughts': Cardiff's Tomlin opens up on mental health torment  EXCLUSIVE INTERVIEW BY ADRIAN KAJUMBA .
'I'm going to get an early night tonight...'
The Barty party is OVER!
World No 1 and French Open champion Ash Barty is dumped out of Wimbledon on Manic Monday by unseeded Alison Riske... who faces Serena Williams in quarters .
Gone in just 45 words: West Ham cut ties with £23m troublemaker Marko Arnautovic with blunt two-paragraph statement as he quits for Shanghai SIPG after squad turned on him .
Liverpool 'beat off competition from Real Madrid and PSG to sign Fulham starlet Harvey Elliott' after teen rejects chance to stay at Craven Cottage .
Man United gambled by sacking Jose Mourinho and backing Paul Pogba... but it's now backfired as the Frenchman tries to leave Old Trafford and join Real Madrid or Juventus  .
'We wouldnot say it was handball': Liverpool's penalty against Tottenham in Champions League final would NOT be given by VAR under new Premier League laws, says Mike Riley .
Ander Herrera reveals he quit Manchester United because they took too long to offer him a contract before PSG swooped: 'They arrived late' .
'My feeling is today I am little bit more than Ashleigh Barty': Naughty Rafael Nadal belittles women's world No 1 over Centre Court row .
Jay Rodriguez to rejoin Burnley in £10m switch after they meet release clause in his West Brom contract .
'His behaviour is totally unacceptable, he should speak to the club if he has a problem over signings': Bayern Munich legend hits back at Manuel Neuer after his agent questions side's ambition  .
Real Madrid convinced Paul Pogba will snub Juventus return for Bernabeu move and they're set to dump James Rodriguez to fund £150million transfer .
Neymar and PSG at war: Superstar fails to turn up to training and club brandish him 'deplorable' as he tries to force through move to Barcelona  .
Mad Mario strikes again: Balotelli 'reported over instigation to commit crimes' after paying bar owner €2,000 to drive his moped into the SEA while on holiday in Naples .
Transfer news LIVE: - Deals and signings from Arsenal, Man Utd, Liverpool, Tottenham, Barcelona, Real Madrid and the rest .
Manchester United stars touch down in Perth as Paul Pogba and co begin pre-season tour of Australia, China and Singapore after 19-hour flight .
Here comes the £150m man!
Eden Hazard reports for his first day of Real Madrid training as Zinedine Zidane gets his expensively-assembled new-look side into shape for the season  .
Paul Pogba and Jesse Lingard appear to clash on first day of Manchester United's pre-season tour in video released on club's Twitter account  .
Steven Gerrard rejects approach to manage Newcastle and rebuffs Mike Ashley to stay at Rangers .
Arsenal 'close to £25million deal' for Saint Etienne defender William Saliba, but will still be able to keep most of their £40million transfer budget  .
West Ham want to make London Stadium bigger than Spurs' new home by increasing capacity by 2,500 seats .
New Chelsea boss Frank Lampard 'looking to add' old pal Ashley Cole to his coaching staff .
As you can imagine, more people are reading The Jerusalem Post than ever before.
Nevertheless, traditional business models are no longer sustainable and high-quality publications, like ours, are being forced to look for new ways to keep going.
Unlike many other news organizations, we have not put up a paywall.
We want to keep our journalism open and accessible and be able to keep providing you with news and analysis from the frontlines of Israel, the Middle East and the Jewish World. .
As one of our loyal readers, we ask you to be our partner..
For $5 a month you will receive access to the following:.
A user experience almost completely free of ads.
Access to our Premium Section.
Content from the award-winning Jerusalem Report and our monthly magazine to learn Hebrew - Ivrit.
A brand new ePaper featuring the daily newspaper as it appears in print in Israel.
RUGA: Ooni Of Ife And Wole Soyinka Tell Nigerians To Defend Their Ancestral Lands.
The Ooni of Ife, Oba Adeyeye Ogunwusi, and Nobel laureate, Prof. Wole Soyinka, have jointly called on Nigerians to defend their ancestral homelands against the Federal  proposed RUGA cattle settlements..
This was made known in a communiqué issued yesterday to highlight details of a meeting between the monarch and Novel Laureate at his (Soyinka's) home in Idi-.
The meeting was centred on the state of the nation..
Oba Ogunwusi and Soyinka, in the communiqué, said their call on Nigerians to defend themselves became crucial as the Coalition of Northern Groups gave a 30-day ultimatum to the Federal  to pass the Ruga project for Fulani herders despite being suspended after many Nigerians went against it..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Costa Rica's Attorney General has ruled solar panels, efficient bulbs and electric vehicles will maintain their tax exemptions..
We celebrate that this exemption is maintained.
The transport sector is key in our National Decarbonization Plan and the incentives of the electric transport law are key in the objectives toward electric mobility, said the Vice Minister of Energy, Rolando Castro..
These products are exempt from 13% sales tax by law 7447, in the case of bulbs and panels, and law 9518, in the case of electric cars..
With the July 1 change of sales tax for a value-added tax (VAT), the Ministry of Finance had consulted the Attorney General to determine what would happen to these exemptions..
The Attorney General, however, interpreted that the new VAT law does not repeal the previous tax law, but rather modifies it.
That is why, according to the resolution, it can not be understood that exemptions from the so-called sales tax granted by other laws have been tacitly repealed..
It should also be clarified that the exemptions from sales tax that were granted for terms determined under Law 6826 remain in effect, the Attorney General's Office said in its ruling..
The incentives for electric cars came into force less than two years ago, in February 2018.
After a year of exemptions, imports grew almost sixfold, according to data from the Treasury..
In 2018 alone, more electric vehicles entered the country than had entered over the previous seven years combined..
According to the President of the Environment Commission of the Legislative Assembly, Paola Vega, the resolution also gives the assembly the task to make an authentic interpretation to leave the picture even clearer..
We will proceed as soon as we return from vacation to make that authentic interpretation and everything will remain the same, the deputy said..
Haile Selassie, the former Emperor of Ethiopia and one of the most defining figures of the East African country, once said: Throughout history, it has been the inaction of those who could have acted; the indifference of those who should have known better; the silence of the voice of justice when it mattered most; that has made it possible for evil to triumph..
On Friday, July 5, 2019, the Supreme Court of Nigeria erred in the discharge of its sacred duty by giving in to fear – an alien element never known to the apex court- when it gave victory to the Governor of Osun State, Adegboyega Oyetola, in the election petition case before it.
The crux associated with the ruling was not based on the power of the apex court to determine the case but most importantly, its failure to determine such on merit, ending up with the convenient compass of technicality.
This sudden approach of convenience is an anathema to every known doctrine of justice.
If for anything, it negates good conscience.
But now, will there be a reoccurrence to this newly found travesty against Lustitia?.
On Tuesday, July 9, 2019, the Supreme Court of Nigeria will once again be put to test when the case between Ned Nwoko and Peter Nwaoboshi appears before it.
Will the apex court give in to convenience or stand on the footprints of many Justices of its making by adhering to its own stand of ensuring the prevalence of true justice? .
In its ruling in the case between Akeredolu vs Olusegun Abraham (2018) 10 NWLR Part 1628, the Supreme Court itself speaking on the travesty of justice stated: Technicality in the administration of justice shuts out justice.
A man denied justice on any ground, much less a technical ground, grudges the administration of justice.
It is, therefore, better to have a case heard and determined on its merits than to leave the court with a shield of the victory obtained on mere technicalities..
The case between Ned Nwoko and Peter Nwaoboshi beyond the pieces of evidence presented before the Federal High Court and Appeal Court is a case between impunity and integrity.
What is on trial is the integrity of the electoral process of Nigeria and the highhandedness of the political parties against the sanctity of law guiding the entire process of a free and fair election. .
It is a case between a man who contested for the Senatorial primary of his party- the Peoples Democratic Party, scored 453 votes and declared the winner of the Party primary against another who came second, scoring 405 votes but miraculously had his name forwarded to the Independent National Electoral Commission (INEC) as the winner of the primary. .
The Federal High Court in Abuja in protest to the crass impunity of the Peoples Democratic Party ruled that Mr Peter Nwaoboshi should never have been declared the winner of the Delta South Senatorial seat as he was not duly elected by members of the party at the primary.
It then ruled that the electoral commission should without further delay, issue Mr Ned Nwoko the certificate of return..
This is a déjà vu in the corridor of justice as the wisdom and heroism of the apex court was once tested in 2007 when it ruled on the case between Rotimi Amaechi and Celestine Omehia.
That landmark judgement checked the excesses of power mongers and emperors of political parties who have turned themselves to gods, cherry-picking which of the electoral laws to obey and disobey.
If these new categories of emerging gods are not shown the path of law, then we are a step towards enthroning dictatorship and burying our hard earned democracy. .
The new Supreme Court must stand and remain standing for the oath it took to promote all manner of men and most importantly, protect our institutions and laws which are the nucleus of our Federation. .
Party primaries are an integral part of the electoral process protected by laws and affirmed by the same.
Doing anything short of protecting its sanctity will be rewarding impunity and disregard for the electoral process. .
If results of primaries are no longer sacrosanct then maybe the Independent National Electoral Commission (INEC) should then simply ask political parties to write names of its candidates on a sheet of paper and forward same to it.
If party primaries are now shambolic symbols that hold no weight, then the electoral guide of having electoral officials, representatives of security agencies at party primaries is merely a coven for jollof rice feast and merriment..
Operatives of the Nigerian Navy Ship (NNS) BEECROFT have uncovered 3,181 25 litre kegs laden with Premium Motor Spirit (PMS) suspected to have been vandalised from Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation's (NNPC) pipelines at Akaraba Island..
The kegs which were discovered during a raid of the island by naval operatives on July 4, were said to have been concealed in makeshift structures built about 200 metres away from Inegbe Resort..
Leading reporters to the island where the kegs were handed over to the NNPC, Commander NNS BEECROFT Commodore Ibrahim Shettima said the products were valued at about N11.5 million..
Shettima said it was discovered that the products were sourced from several vandalised points on the NNPC pipeline on the Atlas Cove Island.
The discovery of such large quantity of PMS is as a result of the navy's aggressive patrols which has denied them the freedom of action..
He stated that the Nigerian Navy under the leadership of the Chief of the Naval Staff (CNS) Vice Admiral Ibok-Ete Ibas is determined to rid the Akaraba Island waterways of all forms of criminality.
The NNS BEECROFT is committed to assisting NNPC and other agencies of government in dealing with the issue of pipeline vandalism and crude oil theft..
The commander warned the pipeline vandals/thieves and other criminal elements, particularly in Akaraba Island maritime environment to desist from nefarious activities and pursue lawful means of livelihood.
Otherwise, they will surely be brought to justice..
On the next line of action, Commodore Shettima said the navy would await the evacuation of the products by NNPC within a time frame before destroying all illegal structures on the island..
Newsmen observed that the makeshift structures were located at places where boats or canoes can move alongside the Lagos anchorage and load them with ease for onward transportation.
It was also observed that the locations of the structures were same as those destroyed in 2015 and 2016 by the Nigerian Navy during operations to dislodge pipeline vandals and militants in the area..
At the handing over event was Commandant NSCDC Commandant Tajudeen Balogun, representatives of NNPC pipeline maintenance contractor, OilServe Limited and private security guards working for the contractor Pentagon..
It was reported that there was however mild drama in the island as officials of the NNPC who were to receive the recovered kegs initially refused to turn up.
But with the navy's insistence to handover the products in line with the Harmonised Standrad Operating Procedure (HSOP), the Manager Atlas Cove Terminal of the NNPC Rafiu Malik eventually came out and signed for them..
Join our twitter community : .
Follow @royaltimesng.
Urgent Message to Amara Elites: Speak Up Against The Ethnic Cleansing of Amara!
| Zehabesha – Latest Ethiopian News ProviderUrgent Message to Amara Elites: Speak Up Against The Ethnic Cleansing of Amara!.
If you keep silent during this ethnic cleansing of Amaras, you will be cursed by history and the coming generations.
Again, the Amaras are filling up the prisons and torture chambers!
It is a subhuman or worthless life to live a quiet and comfortable life while our source or base population is suffering from the endless massacre, incarceration, torture, displacement, hunger and preventable diseases.
The Amara People faced ethnic cleansing because it was falsely and purposely declared as oppressor of  the nations and nationalities.
As a result of these declaration, the Amaras have been subjected to systematic  massacre, incarceration, torture, sterilization, displacement, starvation, poor education and economical development.
As the testimonies, physical and mental status of Amara prisoners demonstrate, even the detention centers  were disproportionately harsher on Amaras..
No creature in the universe sits idle when its progenies face atrocities that lead to extinction.
Most Amara elites have been sitting idle when their progenies have been systematically subjected to ill-treatment in every corner of the country..
As humans,  we hope the world to be fair, compassionate and free of corruption and crimes.
In realty, the world is full of corruption, unfairness, injustice and murders..
Ideally, we want the globe to be free of racial, sexual, religious, social status or  other forms of discrimination.
In realty, the globe has been inundated with  any forms of discrimination since the birth of mankind..
Ideally, we wish the honest, the loyal and the just  govern nations.
In realty, the liars, the traitors, the hypocrites, the criminals rule countries..
Because the liars, the traitors and the criminals  rule countries, the earth has been Hell for the weak since the era of genesis..
As we know, the Jewish people were massacred by the Nazis because they were  weak and blamed for all the problems of that time Germany..
Similarly, the Amaras have been massacred,  imprisoned, tortured, displaced, sterilized,  and subjected to illiteracy and starvation because they are blamed for all the problems of the country.
The elimination of Amara has continued and a large number of them are currently imprisoned,  displaced  even from the outskirts of Addis Ababa and other parts of the country where their forefathers protected spilling their blood since the earth was created..
Despite this survival threat of the Amara , the Amara elites still  talk about empty love, unity, reconciliation, forgiveness  standing behind the  Ethiopian People's Democratic Front (EPRDF) appointed prime mister .
This  criminal prime mister is the leader of EPRDF that hanged water bottles on testicles  of men to sterilized Amaras.
This hypocrite prime mister is the leader of EPRDF that administered unique birth control programs to sterilize Amara women.
This prime mister is the leader of EPRDF that killed a son and forced his mother to sit on her son's dead body..
As many opportunist elites think, this hypocrite- pastor  prime mister is not a man of love and unity.
If he was a man of love and unity,  he could not have served the Tigre Peoples Libration Front for more than 20 years.
If he was a man of love,  he could not have built a breast monument based on fire- place folktales.
If he was a man of love and God,  he could have gone to a Monastery for redemption and repentance, not to palace to have more luxurious life and fame at the expense of martyrs  his party crucified..
Dear Amara Elites, please stop believing the preaching of the hypocrite and criminal pastors.
By the time criminal pastors preach about unity and love, the Amara People were being displaced even from the outskirts of Addis Ababa,  Begemidir,  Gojjam, Wollo and Shoa.
Despite these ominous dangers the Amara people is facing throughout the country , some of you are still beating the drums with  the criminal unborn again pastor,  who spits empty love words.
Empty love words come also from the mouths of monsters  that snatch believers from the hands of God.
As the book of books teaches, you identify monsters by their past and current deeds, not by their empty words..
Ideally, we want the whole world to be united, to be fair and just.
Unfortunately, the world has never been united, fair and just since Adam was through out to Earth from the Garden of Eden.
Hoping the world will be united, fair and just  one day, the religious and  the cultured Amara people suffered more than the Jewish People suffered in Europe  for the last 28 years..
The Amara people that has never been tricked even by the sophisticated European colonizers were deceived and betrayed by its on  elites.
Some  deplorable Amara elites  are serving Amara killers in different capacities, and majority others  have kept silent enjoying their luxurious lives.
It is past due for Amara elites to stand by their people and teach the victimized Amaras about survival facts in a hostile environment.
One of these  survival fact is to understand what  Richard Connell said in his beautiful writing, the Most Dangerous Game:  The World is Made Up of The Hunters and The Huntees..
For  more than 42 years, the huntees have been the Amaras.
Understanding this realty, the Amara elites shall stand in unison and support the struggle of the Amara for survival.
Living a quiet life at this juncture is living the lives of the fat pigs!
Let us not live the lives of fat pigs and die the death of the creeping soil bugs!.
If you keep silent during this ethnic cleansing of Amaras, you will be cursed by history and the coming generations.
Amaras, like your forefathers,  stand united and tall!
Thank you..
The writer can be reached at abatebelai@yahoo.com. 
Sustained inflammation may be involved in cancer.
Inflammation is the body's natural response to infection or injury.
Sustained inflammation is believed to be involved in many chronic diseases, including heart disease and cancer..
Moringa leaves, pods and seeds have been shown to have anti-inflammatory properties which may also be due to isothiocyanates..
Moringa can lower cholesterol.
High amounts of cholesterol in the blood have been linked to an increased risk of heart disease.
Both animal and human studies have shown that moringa oleifera may have cholesterol-lowering effects..
Moringa leaves may also contain high levels of  which can reduce the absorption of minerals and protein..
Taking moringa oleifera as a supplement in capsules wonot supply large amounts of nutrients.
The amounts are negligible compared to what you are already getting if you eat a balanced, real food-based diet..
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
JOHANNESBURG — Prince Kaybee was recently labelled as one of the worst celebs when it comes to blowing off fans' love after one hurt fan expressed his disappointment in Kaybee..
But as that thread blew up, many other local celebs were exposed for their uncalled rudeness..
Celebrities all over the world are confronted by mobs of adoring fans on a daily basis but they arenot always in the mood to engage, as most humans do, but fans donot always understand their idols' rude behaviour..
This particular fan took to Twitter to comment on the famous O jewa ke eng? tweet by Keabetswe to say that he was left hot and bothered by how Prince Kaybee blew him off like a fly.
In fact, the guy said he was pulling his fan membership..
I used to be a huge fan of Prince Kaybee until I met him outside centurion mall.
I gave him a really humble shoutout but he blew me off like I was a fly… our celebs though..
Others immediately jumped on the thread to defend him, saying he must have been having a bad day.
While others mentioned similar experiences they had at the hands of other celebs..
It wasnot all bad though, here's a few interesting tweets from the thread.
has yet again proven its commitment to support the growth of the creative sector, by organizing a 2-day interactive forum to promote and provide adequate support for the Creative Industry Financing Initiative (CIFI) loans, developed by the , in collaboration with the Banker's committee..
The Central Bank of Nigeria (CBN) initiative, CIFI, focuses on four sectors in the Creative industry namely, movies, music, fashion, and information technology.
The loans have a maximum interest rate of 9% per annum and a repayment period of up to 10 years and was set up to develop the sectors by boosting jobs, increasing capacity, encouraging entrepreneurship and revenue generation for the country.
The first tranche of the CIFI facility has over N20bn set aside to be disbursed..
The forum named the Access Bank Creative Loan forum took place on  July 2nd & 3rd 2019 at the Access Bank headquarters in Lagos, Victoria Island.
Each day of the forum held two interaction panel sessions..
The first day had movies and music while the second day had IT and fashion sessions.
All sessions were attended by industry leaders, stakeholders within the creative sectors and experts such as legal, finance and business consulting.
Also, present were Access Bank representatives who were available to educate all on the CIFI loan facility, the eligibility criteria and the process for obtaining the loan..
It was further revealed during the Forum that the CIFI facility loan will also aid in the development of infrastructure (Entertainment City) which include cinemas, large capacity auditoriums, and shared fashion facilities.
The Entertainment city will help improve the creative industry by creating jobs and also will become a center where creative skills can be developed, displayed and revenues generated.
This will help to further contribute to the country's GDP.. , Executive Director, Business Banking of Access Bank Plc. who explained that the loans will create jobs within the creative industry, as the forum was arranged to walk customers through the process of accessing the loans..
CBN's Creative Industry Financing Initiative (CIFI) was developed to support the creative sector and enable the sector to create more jobs.
Access Bank understands the necessary documentation needed to access this loan and that is why this forum has been put together to simplify and guide you, our guests and customers through the processShe reiterated during the forum..
Also, in attendance at the forum were prominent stakeholders in the creative space namely; , the President of the Movie Producers of Nigeria, , President of the Fashion Designers Association of Nigeria, veteran actors Chinenye Mba -Uzoukwu, the former General Manager (Anglophone West Africa) ,
(who is now the Managing Partner of , a prominent face in the fashion industry and a host of other key talents..
So, if you play in the creative arena, have big ideas that can attract talent and create more jobs, Access bank is ready to assist you to access the CIFI loan, while at the same time supporting you with the necessary capacity building needed to help you actualize your dreams..
To learn more about the Creative Sector Loans, visit .
Unit 6 has been down since March..
The addition of power from Unit 5, which is expected to ease the current heavy load-shedding, will take the total generation at HPS to 660MW..
Zesa spokesperson Mr Fullard Gwasira said the utility is currently engaging the Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe (RBZ) to help raise the £3,3 million (US$4,1 million) needed to refurbish Unit 6..
Hwange Unit 5 is expected to be back in service during the course of this weekend and it will inject 160MW.
Thus Hwange will generate an average of 500MW, said Mr Gwasira..
Unit 6, which has been out from March 2019 owing to the generator earth fault, requires up to £3,3 million to be fixed.
The Reserve Bank of Zimbabwe and the Ministry of Finance are making efforts to assist Zesa in raising this amount..
However, he warned that generation at Kariba Power Station might be further reduced by the continued decline of water levels in Kariba Dam..
Owing to the drought experienced in the upstream of the Kariba reservoir, the lake levels are now about 27 percent..
Kariba South Hydropower Station is expected to further reduce the plant's current average output from 580MW to the recommended 358MW..
Failure to adhere to the Zambezi River Authority (ZRA)-recommended 358MW may result in the plant shutting down by October 2019.
This is a situation we have to avoid by taking the correct remedial action in line with the noble recommendations..
According to the Zimbabwe Electricity Transmission and Distribution Company (ZETDC), load-shedding has increased outside the published schedule due to soaring demand in excess of 1800 MW against generation of about 1100 MW..
Zesa is failing to compensate the shortfall with imports as it owes significant amounts to suppliers in South Africa and Mozambique..
Meanwhile, Energy and Power Development Minister Fortune Chasi has said all Government ministries will be metered to ensure responsible use of electricity..
At national level, Mr Fullard Gwasira said 656 000 prepaid meters have been installed in domestic premises so far..
The installation of prepaid electricity meters is ongoing, although the rate of connection was affected by the current shortage of foreign currency..
Since the inception of the programme in 2012, ZETDC has connected 656 000 prepaid electricity meters in domestic premises and small institutions countrywide..
Mr Gwasira says the development has greatly empowered customers to manage their own consumption as well as guarantee the power utility's revenue collection..
Private players were licensed to supply meters to speed up the process, which resulted in 48 000 additional consumers being connected to the grid.
Zesa expects to connect a further 135 000 customers to the grid once the foreign currency supplies improve. .
The Ogun State Muslim Pilgrims' Welfare Board has announced the second phase of its medical screening and inoculation for new applicants for 2019 Hajj..
In a release signed by the Executive Secretary of the Board, Alhaji Abdul Hakeem Kalejaiye, the screening exercise would hold between Tuesday, July 9 and Wednesday, July 10, 2019, from 9.00am, at the Board's Secretariat, Oke-Mosan, Abeokuta..
The release added that the exercise was to ensure that intending pilgrims are in stable condition of health before embarking on the journey to the holy land, adding that, the information gathered during this exercise would guide the board in offering necessary medical attention to the Pilgrims in Saudi-Arabia..
Similarly, the Board has announced that the final Workshop and seminar for intending Pilgrims will hold on Thursday, July 11, 2019, from  prompt at the Valley View Auditorium, Government House, Isale-Igbein, Abeokuta..
According to the release, applicants should come along with their original payment receipts, adding that all intending Pilgrims are expected to be seated by 9.30am for special prayers..
It further indicated that Hajj forms are still available for new applicants for this year's Hajj operations..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Wilfried Zaha grabbed the only goal to settle a disappointing Africa Cup of Nations last-16 clash as Ivory Coast beat Mali 1-0 in Suez on Monday. .
Crystal Palace winger Zaha ensured the Ivorians remained unbeaten against Mali at the tournament as he squeezed home on 76 minutes to book a quarter-final showdown with Algeria. .
However, the 2015 champions will need to perform much better if they aspire to a second title in four years as Ivory Coast's talented attack of Zaha, Nicolas Pepe and Jonathan Kodjia largely failed to fire. .
The in-demand Pepe returned for the Elephants after sitting out the 4-1 win over Namibia along with Kodjia, while Mali recalled a host of regulars having rested key players after qualifying from their group with a game to spare..
Mali advanced as joint top scorers in the group stage with six goals alongside Algeria and had the Ivorians in trouble early here, although Lassana Coulibaly lost his footing after Moussa Marega attempted to square..
Sylvain Gbohouo had a lucky escape when he flapped at a corner with Abdoulay Diaby stabbing over before the Ivory Coast goalkeeper tipped behind his curling free-kick..
Mali were seeking a first victory over their fellow west Africans at the Cup of Nations after three losses and a draw, but Southampton recruit Moussa Djenepo stumbled as he bore in on goal at start of the second half..
Kodjia was denied at the other end as Djigui Diarra turned the Aston Villa forward's shot wide with his legs and an ineffective Pepe was withdrawn on 68 minutes..
Zaha made the breakthrough with a quarter of an hour remaining when Gbohouo's hopeful ball upfield skipped all the way through to the Arsenal target who snuck the ball past Diarra. .
Adama Traore created a late chance as Mali sought to send the game to extra time but his stinging drive was kept out by Gbohouo..
For more news your way, download The Citizen's app for .
Would you like to place a soccer bet?  to get started in 3 easy steps..
By Onyeananam Chidinma.
All is set for the annual Holy Ghost Congress of the miraculous Deliverance Gospel Mission (MDGM), under the spiritual leadership of his Grace, Prophet Dom Daniel Anyanwu, known among the circle of ministers, as the seer..
The congress, which is the 17th edition, will hold between Wednesdays 10 to Sunday 14 July, 2019 at the church auditorium by Basic Bus-Stop, Back of former infinity Hotel along Ihiagwa Road, Owerri, Imo State, with the theme: water from Heaven.
The camping program will include morning, afternoon and night session..
Briefing newsmen in Owerri over the weekend to herald the congress, prophet Dom Anyanwu, the General overseer said the program was inspired by God, to liberate the people of God from torment into the rightful place designed for them by God almighty..
He explained that the vision was given to him 17 years ago, precisely on the 13th of July,, 2002.
There and then, he decided to organize a solemn assembly, for God to intervene in the state and in the lives of individuals..
Prophet Dom said, Prior to the advent of the Holy Ghost congress, the miraculous Deliverance Gospel Mission started on October 30th 1999.
Since then, God has been doing wonders in our lives.
Personally, I faced hardship, I was trekking to town with legs, amidst hunger.
If God can change my condition, if people can have faith, God will answer their prayers.
All you have to do is to gather, pray and fast..
The Christian cleric expressed optimism that burdens will be made light at the forthcoming programme as the sick, the troubled and the oppressed will receive their deliverance..
The prophet opined, People in some part of the country hardly believe in God nowadays because there are a lot of pastors of diverse kinds who collect money and tell the people someone somewhere is killing them..
In such scenario, if the servant of God fail to harken to the voice of God or hear from him, they go by any means spiritual, that is not the will of God.
By the grace of God, we are expecting abundant blessings and prophecies at the programe..
If Imolites remain steadfast, I believe they will say, thank you Jesus, this time it will be greater than the former..
The Christian cleric lamented what he described as the untold hardship people are made to face throughout the history of the state and the country at large, noting that most of the victims of hardship have taken their situation as fate.
He wondered if such situations are meant to be, in the household of God..
Prophet Dom Beckoned on Imolites to come and fast during the programme for four days, saying that no matter the situation, those who, by faith, make it to the programe will not regret it as God in his infinite mercy will visit their cases and settle them beyond imagination..
In his words, I prayerfully chose this period for the programme because it tallied with the Jewish/Biblical culture of solemn assembly and this is my month of birth.
I pray for God's guidance in the life of our Governor, he should remain focused on his agenda and remember the roads around Federal Polytechnic Nekede and FUTO.
God will touch his heart the prophet submitted..
Yeoville SAPS spokesperson Capt Sifiso Mabizela told the EXPRESS Yeoville officers made 157 arrests during the month of June..
Five JMPD officers arrested for alleged corruption – AUDIO.
Mabizela said the suspects were arrested for charges ranging from business robbery, driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, assault with the intent to cause grievous bodily harm to shoplifting..
Some of the arrested suspects were released on bail, some paid fines and others are still in custody due to on-going investigations, or because of the nature of the charges against them.
Since the arrests, all of them have appeared before court, he said..
He added that the operations were successful through joint operations with various departments including Home Affairs , JMPD, the City of Joburg and other law enforcement agencies..
He said cooperation with community members also helped police in making the arrests..
There were also closures of illegal taverns, traffic violations handed out and the confiscation of dangerous objects, added Mabizela..
For more news and interesting articles, like Joburg East Express on .
Matcha is blowing up, taking over menus and Instagram feeds all around the globe.
People are going crazy for matcha drinks, matcha baked goods, and even matcha fountains..
The Academic Staff Union of Universities (ASUU) yesterday described President Muhammadu Buhari's policy on education as wicked and criminal against the needs of Nigerian youth..
The union accused the All Progressives Congress (APC) government of a deliberate plan to starve public education with funds in order to deny Nigerian youths the right to know and challenge misrule..
Chairman, University of Ibadan chapter of ASUU, Professor Deji Omole, in a statement made available to newsmen, lamented that the sacrifices of understaffed and underpaid Nigerian academic will be futile if President Buhari does not increase education funding..
Omole insisted that the University of Ibadan is presently groaning due to paucity of funds, insufficient staff, decayed infrastructure and bad laboratories..
According to the ASUU chief, education is not the priority of the Buhari government..
He lamented that over 500,000 Nigerian children who desire public university education are rejected annually due to poor funding, decayed infrastructure and reduced manpower..
Professor Omole said unless urgent steps were taken to cater for the needs of the Nigerian children, many of them would fight back with crime..
He said, APC Government failure to fund education was a design to kill public universities.
University of ibadan is groaning terribly due to paucity of funds..
Retired academics cannot be replaced because government deliberately refused to make budgetary provision for growth and development..
This crisis has led to the staff on ground being overworked leading to early deaths of many of our colleagues.
Education is not the priority of this government..
Due to paucity of funds many universities including university of Ibadan, the nation's premier university cannot admit many qualified candidates into the universities..
This is dangerous to the society as the rejected qualified and brilliant candidates may eventually take to crimes because the country has rejected them.
The policy is not only wicked but criminal..
Meanwhile, following recent appointments announced by the presidency, the Peoples Democratic Party (PDP) yesterday berated President Muhammadu Buhari and the ruling All Progressives Congress, APC, for alleged insensitivity to the welfare of the people of the country..
It also alleged that Buhari had abandoned Nigerians to their fate and was only interested in the appointment of aides to serve his immediate personal comfort and necessities..
This allegations were made by the spokesman of the opposition party, Kola Ologbondiyan, in a statement made available to newsmen, in Abuja..
Ologbondiyan added, The party described as highly unfortunate that at a time millions of Nigerians are hurting and suffering untold hardship due to lack of attention to critical sectors of our economy and national life, President Buhari is only concerned about his personal needs..
The PDP says such unpatriotic and self-centred acts, which is a direct slap on the sensitivity of the citizens, are only associated with leaders who do not have the mandate of the people but found themselves in office as beneficiaries of manipulated elections..
That is why at the time Nigerians expect urgent interventions on critical issues of national insecurity and uncertainties; kidnapping and bloodletting; high costs of food and essential services; lack of affordable healthcare, decayed infrastructure and excruciating poverty in the land, President Buhari and his handlers are more interested in appointing house keepers and managers of social events that has only to do with him..
Further, PDP urged Nigerians to note that this development and the alleged general lethargy in governance was a weighty effect of the validity challenge that confronts governance in the nation following the alleged rigging of the 2019 Presidential election..
The PDP spokesman claimed that such unseriousness further amplified the alleged insensitivity and incompetence of the Buhari Presidency..
Also, the party said the scenario as it portrayed was indications of the alleged deplorable situation that might further befall the nation under the All Progressives Congress (APC)..
The police have arrested a man suspected to be a ritualist for allegedly killing a woman after taking and overdose of tramadol..
Mojupa Bidemi, 33, said he took on overdose of the drug before committingthe act,The Nation learnt yesterday..
The suspect was arrested around 1:30am at 55A, Corporation Estate, Amuwo Odofin, Lagos, after residents raised the alarm on hearing the late Christy screaming in his apartment..
Sule, a petty shop owner, who allegedly sold him the drug was also arrested..
The suspects are at the State Criminal Investigation and Intelligence Department (SCIID) Panti, Yaba, Lagos Mainland..
About 17 women handbags were found in the apartment.
Bidemi has yet to explain how he came about them..
The apartment is said to belong to his relative, who lives abroad..
At the estate yesterday, security men at the gate insisted that visitors must first call their hosts before being allowed in..
Bidemi, it was gathered moved into the estate about five weeks ago.. Bidemi's relationship with Christy was hazy.
Some claimed she was a commercial sex worker he promised N10,000 for the night, others described her as his girlfriend..
He was said to have picked her up from a bar around Apple Junction on Monday night and took her to his apartment around 11:45pm..
Some neighbours were said to have been attracted by the late Christy's shout..
He was met coming out and when asked if he had any woman with him, he said no..
15 suspected killers of ex-CDS Badeh paraded in Abuja.
Dissatisfied, the neighbours followed him to the estate gate and instructed the security men not to allow him out..
He claimed he wanted to go and buy food.
The residents were not satisfied with his reply that he didnot have a woman in the house and so, they followed him to the gate..
At the gate, they asked the security men if they knew him and they said yes.
They also asked whether he was accompanied when he came in.
The security men confirmed he came in around 11:45pm with a woman.
That was when they dragged him back to the house..
On getting to his house, there was blood everywhere.
A search revealed the body of a young woman under the staircase… She was dead..
No part of her body was removed.
He confessed that he did it for rituals.
That it was his first time and he was sent by some people who were waiting for him around Second Gate in Festac.
Later he said the people were waiting for him at 22 Road Junction..
He didnot mention their names and claimed he didnot know their address.
The police came and took him away.
It was later they came for the corpse.
The house was searched and 17 women handbags were found inside, said a source..
People became more suspicious after he was asked to produce the woman but he could not.
He claimed they had a misunderstanding and she turned off her phone..
The woman's body was covered with rice sack.
The knife he used was found on the floor very close to the gate of the house..
He confessed that they are two and he was about leaving the estate to call his partner to come and carry body parts, added the source..
Police spokesman Bala Elkana, a Deputy Superintendent (DSP) said the suspect was high on tramadol, adding that the man who sold the drug to him was also arrested..
He denied being a ritualist..
The suspect said the woman was his girlfriend and she has been acting funny.
I killed because I was high on drugs, he said..
Elkana said a knife was recovered from the scene, adding that investigation was ongoing..
The Nation newspaper.
This unpromising national context is further reinforced by the recent disclosure that Nigeria intends to close as many as 80 out of its 110 diplomatic missions due to paucity of funds.
This was disclosed in early 2019 during the defence of the Foreign Ministry's budget in the Senate, where it was revealed that the 2019 appropriations would only sustain 30 missions thus leaving 80 missions with zero-budget for FY2019.
In actuality, the 2019 capital vote of N4.123billion for the missions reflected N7.209billion or 64 per cent reduction from the 2018 allocation of N11.333billion. Last May, four missions in Sri-Lanka, Serbia, Ukraine and Czech Republic were closed, in what appears to be the first step of Nigeria's retrenchment of its global diplomatic presence..
Pragmatic and cost-saving as it seems, such closures contribute to diminution of influence by reducing contacts, and trade representations since these missions serve a first line of interactions in the promotion of national strategic interests.
Additionally, mission closures translate into lesser effectiveness of ancillary foreign policy institutions and agencies, such as Technical Aid Corps (TAC), Foreign Service Academy (FSA), Institute for Peace and Conflict Resolution (IPCR), Nigerian Institute for International Affairs (NIIA) and Directorate for Technical Cooperation in Africa (DTCA), which are all under the supervision of the ministry..
Nigeria's active support for the liberation struggles in Southern Africa, in particular the fight against Apartheid, earned her a frontline status.
In the 1980s and 90s Nigeria was renowned for international peacekeeping.
In so doing, she played a critical role in consolidating peace in Africa and beyond.
Nigeria led and singularly funded the first OAU peacekeeping operations in Chad in 1980.
She played pivotal peacekeeping leadership and contingent roles in Namibia, Angola, Sierra Leone, Liberia and later on Sudan, racking up at its zenith in 2008 over 6000 military, civilian police and experts' deployment.
Whereas Nigeria once was placed among the top 5 troops, police and experts contributing countries to UN Peacekeeping Operations; as of May 2019, she was contributing a paltry 338 military, police and mission experts, in eleven UN missions placing it at the 43rd position.
The drastic reduction of Nigeria's contribution to UN Peacekeeping Operations was in response to its rising domestic security challenges. .
Nigeria retains her niche as Africa's largest economy with a GDP of $376.284bn, ahead of South Africa, ($349.299bn), Egypt ($237.037bn) and Algeria ($178.287bn).
However, she has failed to capitalize and translate such economic strength either in effective regional leadership or membership of growing blocs or economic networks.
By contrast, South Africa is a member of G20, BRICS, and IBSA (India, Brazil and South Africa).
It ought to be disconcerting that since the inception of the African Union in 2002, Nigeria has not managed to secure an election into any of the Commissioners' position at the African Union Commission. .
At a time when the regional and global contexts are marked by much uncertainty and myriad challenges, Nigeria's leadership role, especially in Africa, is all the more important and greatly needed.
However, Nigeria's regional hegemon position is under severe assault.
A combination of factors is driving the onslaught including, her deteriorating fiscal situation, weak economic growth, domestic insecurity, a lack of robust elite consensus on the desired direction for the country, and a regional environment in which several actors – regional and extra regional – are jostling for influence. .
Nigeria's status as a regional hegemon risks further regression, absent the restructuring of its governance arrangements, creatively tackling its myriad security challenges, promoting inclusive economic growth, making significant strides in adapting new technologies to enhance its development pathway.
The Africa in which Nigeria's leadership was automatically acknowledged no longer exists.
Nigeria will need to work much harder to re-assert its influence and be accepted again as a pre-eminent regional actor..
*Otobo is a Non-Resident Senior Expert at the Global Governance Institute, Brussels..
Obaze is MD/CEO Selonnes Consult – a policy, governance  management consultancy firm, in Awka..
MILAN (AP)
— The Latest on migration to Europe (all times local):.
Morocco says that the Royal Navy has rescued about 330 migrants trying to cross the Strait of Gibraltar in unseaworthy craft..
The official MAP news agency said that there were numerous attempts to reach Spain early Friday and late Thursday.
Those rescued were taken to the coastal cities of Nador and Ksar Sghir..
A military official said that women and unaccompanied minors were among the 330 rescued.
The official wasnot authorized to speak publicly, asking to remain anonymous..
With the route across the Mediterranean from Libya to Italy increasingly choked off, Morocco has become the major passage point for African migrants trying to get to Europe..
Morocco has stopped about 25,000 migrants trying to reach Spain so far this year, mainly via the Strait of Gibraltar.
There are no official death figures..
German humanitarian group Sea-Eye says one of its rescue ships has picked up 65 people who were found in a large dinghy about 34 miles (55 kms) off the coast of Libya..
Sea-Eye said on its Facebook page that the crew of the Alan Kurdi brought the African migrants on board their vessel early Friday.
It says Libyan authorities failed to respond to communication for more than three hours..
The Alan Kurdi is a German-flagged vessel, unlike the Dutch-flagged Sea-Watch 3 that became embroiled in an international incident with Italy last week..
The captain of the Sea-Watch 3, a German, forced her way into the Italian port of Lampedusa last week in defiance of Italy's anti-migrant interior minister..
It was unclear whether the Alan Kurdi will try to dock in Italy, too..
The Council of Europe is urging European governments to rescue migrants at sea instead of leaving the job to aid groups and Libyan authorities..
The continent's human rights watchdog released 35 recommendations to governments to balance the need to protect borders and prevent torture or other rights violations..
Council of Europe commissioner Dunja Mijatovic says member states must assume more responsibility for rescuing migrants at sea, protect migrants' rights and must avoid punishing NGOs.
Saving lives is not a crime..
Mijatovic assailed increasingly strict European migration policies and European countries' failure to share responsibility for migrants..
The statement came amid a new standoff between Italy's populist government and a humanitarian rescue ship.
Italy's government argues it has been unfairly stuck with the burden of managing arrivals from Africa to Europe..
Earlier this week, more than 100 migrants were killed in a drowning off Tunisia and an airstrike on a migrant detention center in Libya..
An Italian humanitarian group is refusing to bring 54 migrants rescued at sea to Malta because of the distance and psychological conditions of those on board one of its ships, which is being barred from docking in Italy..
Mediterranea Saving Humans tweeted Friday that its ship was off Lampedusa, just outside Italian territorial waters, and that it has been banned from entering Italian jurisdiction by ministerial decree.
The migrants were rescued from a rubber dinghy Thursday off Libya..
The NGO said the decree is unlawful because it canot be applied to a ship carrying people rescued at sea, and because Italy canot ban an Italian-flagged ship from entering its waters..
Malta says it will take the migrants in a deal with Italy to take an equal number already in Malta..
The Organised Private Sector (OPS) has lauded President Muhammadu Buhari for including Nigeria in the African Continental Free Trade Agreement (AfCFTA) at the just concluded Africa Union Summit on Sunday in Niamey..
The sector's chieftains told the News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) on Monday in Lagos that Nigeria had more to gain because it would have access to the larger market of the member countries..
Mr Muda Yusuf, the Director-General, Lagos Chamber of Commerce and Industry (LCCI), commended Buhari for following the recommendations of the Presidential Committee on the Assessment of AfCFTA..
According to Yusuf, Nigeria's access to African countries, whose population is estimated at 1.2 billion and a two trillion dollars economy, offers tremendous opportunities for our firms..
Not signing before now gave us the opportunity to put our views on the table to shape the structure of the agreement..
We, therefore, welcome the decision of the Federal Government to the agreement, he said..
The director-general, however, said though this would improve trade among African countries, appropriate safeguard measures should be put in place to protect vulnerable sectors of the economy..
He urged relevant agencies to effectively enforce the rules of origin of the agreement so as to build a competitive economy rather than having a disproportionate approach to the country's industrialisation..
Also, Mr Mansur Ahmed, the President, Manufacturers Association of Nigeria (MAN) said MAN was happy that the agreement had been signed after exhaustive consultations and analysis of the advantages and disadvantages of the agreement..
Initially, we (manufacturers) were not fully prepared, but right now, we are more than ready to benefit and exploit the framework of the agreement, he said..
Commenting, Mr Ayoola Olukanni, Director-General, Nigerian Association of Chambers of Commerce, Industry, Mines and Agriculture (NACCIMA), said signing of AfCFTA was a good development..
Olukanni said that it was a reflection of Buhari's fulfillment of carrying all along before signing the agreement..
Olukanni said the AfCFTA framework required that operational modalities of the Rules of Origin, Tariff Schedules, Tariff Concessions, Services, and Investment Rules, among others were strictly followed by the relevant agencies..
As Africa gears up for the implementation of this landmark agreement, a few issues deserve our attention..
The AfCFTA is designed for the economic integration of Africa along the lines of what is evident within the European Union (EU), the North American Free Trade Agreement (NAFTA), and the Association of Southeast Asian Nations (ASEAN)..
The reality is that AfCFTA is finally here, and the recent stakeholders' meeting organized by the Coalition for Dialogue on Africa (CoDA) in Addis-Ababa is a clear indication that we are on the margins of history on the emergence of Africa as a single and unified market..
However, only those who prepare for it will harness the full potentials, he said..
Olukanni added that before the agreement, most Nigeria's companies, including banks, operated in 18 African countries, while Nigeria practically dominated the entertainment and creative sector of the continent..
Nigeria airline operators, in spite of the the tough terrain of the domestic Aviation sector, provide services across the west and other parts of Africa..
Now is the time for other sectors to harness the potential of the agreement, he said..
In his remarks, Prof. Olukunle Iyanda, President, Nigerian Institute of Management (NIM), expressed worried that the agreement would not be beneficial to the nation due to the attendant infrastructure deficit of the country..
The agreement will not be too beneficial since the parameters to produce enough are not in place..
My advice is that we specialise in the production of higher value export like cars, equipment and machineries rather than exchanging small value goods among member nations, he said..
NAN reports that AfCFTA is to bring together all 55 member states of the African Union covering a market of more than 1.2 billion people, including a growing middle class, and a combined gross domestic product (GDP) of more than 3.4 trillion U.S dollars..
Meanwhile, only 26 countries have ratified the agreement.
They are Ghana, Kenya, Rwanda, Niger, Chad, Congo Republic, Djibouti, Guinea, eSwatini, Mali, Mauritania, Namibia, South Africa, Uganda and Ivory Coast (Côte d'Ivoire)..
Others are Senegal, Togo, Egypt, Ethiopia, The Gambia, Sierra Leone, Saharawi Republic, Zimbabwe, Burkina Faso, São Tomé and Príncipe and Nigeria, which joined on Sunday, July 7, 2019..
Download Daily Post App.
Subscribe to Daily Post Newsletter.
Send us enquiries, press releases..
Ajax defender, Matthijs de Ligt has agreed personal terms with Juventus according to the player's agent Mino Raiola but both clubs are yet to agree a deal. .
As things stand, If there is no agreement, De Ligt will attend training with the Eredivisie title-holders tomorrow, and wait for a transfer to happen. .
Mino shared that the player himself is hoping for an agreement to be reached so his future can be sorted. .
Mino said to De Telegraaf, Agreements have been made with Matthijs and it is up to Ajax how the club wants to deal with this. .
An arbitration case is out of the question for us, .
I also advised Matthijs, because it does not suit his style and his lifestyle. .
The player only hopes that Juventus and Ajax will show the will to work and that the deal is completed quickly. .
a Belgian – Moroccan international football player, has responded misogynistic comments made by Radio Mars' host, Adil El Omari.
In a video posted on her facebook page, the footballer challenges El Omari to a match. .
Bouharat started her international career in 2005, playing with Standard de Liège.
Over the course of her career she won both Belgian Championship and the Belgian Supercup.
In 2016, she retired from professional football having won prestigious awards includingAfrican woman of the year: Female sportswoman (2013), and Best player of African descent in Belgium (2014)..
Adil El Omari's sexist comments during his July 4 radio show, Bouharat posted a video on her Facebook account.
The video is a challenge to El Omari, and those present during his broadcast, to play a match against her female team..
The ex-footballer, addressing the host, said  I challenge you to play against my 100% female team and let us prove, on the field, that football is universal. .
To caption her video, Bouharat wrote, women's place to be is not only the kitchen; I strongly denounce your words.
Her comments were a direct response to the host's remarks to a female listener, telling her to take care of her kitchen, watch Choumicha's shows (famous Moroccan chef), and leave the national team alone. .
The retired footballer expressed her surprise that such comments can still be heard in 2019 on a sports radio, and asserted that football is a universal game and everyone has the right to express their opinion on the subject..
I stopped playing 4 years ago now, but it is with pleasure that I resume service for the occasion, she added..
Bouharat added a forfeit to her challenge, saying that the losing team would have to cook a Choumicha recipe for the victors..
A police officer has been removed from his post after video showed him on Friday forcibly pulling on the sidelocks of an ultra-Orthodox protester in Beit Shemesh. .
The police said the officer was immediately removed from his position, while investigators looked into the incident. .
Video shows the officer yanking on a protester's hair and dragging him by his sidelocks, on his feet, toward police vehicles.
The protester, identified by the ultra-Orthodox news outlet Kikar Shabbat as Beit Shemesh resident Mordechai Kreuzer, does not appear to resist. .
Get The Times of Israel's Daily Edition by email and never miss our top stories .
The incident occurred while police were accompanying municipal workers who had been carrying out a demolition order in a largely ultra-Orthodox neighborhood of the city..
Clashes broke out between the police and protesters who opposed the demolition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Sithembile Mbatha sits on the floor of her Lister Farm home..
The 34-year-old has a thin mattress that barely cushions her from the hard cement surface below.
As she suffers from asthma, her breathing comes out in rasps..
She moves around on her knees due to her disability..
Sithembile's plight was brought to the attention of the ArcelorMittal South Africa (AMSA) Foundation NPC on Wednesday last month, by social worker, Bongi Msezane..
The very next day, Rotary Majuba (Newcastle) and AMSA arrived at her door with a wheelchair, mattress, blankets and a pillow, as well as basic cosmetics to make sure that she would not have to spend another night on the hard surface..
This year seems to be one of the coldest winters we have had; we huddle in front of heaters and air conditioners, oblivious to the hardships facing Sithembile and many others like her in the rural areas of our district, said Joe Nowbath, Manager of Socio-economic Development at AMSA..
Residents who make use of near Hans Schoeman Drive during their daily commute may have noticed a large building where came to a halt a few months ago.. Some concerned residents have contacted the Randburg Sun wondering what the building is, why the construction work stopped, and what damage has been caused to the construction site as the building has no roof..
According to Ward 104 councillor Mike Wood, the building in question is the new Randburg offices for Johannesburg Water, which will allow for better municipal water management and projects to help the water infrastructure in the Randburg area..
Wood said, From what I understand, the contractor working on the building ran into financial difficulties and have moved off-site..
Ward 104 councillor Mike Wood.
Photo: Reuven Blignault.
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Image Source: www.pia.gov.phFive municipalities in Negros Oriental recorded the lowest malnutrition rate in 2018..
Provincial Nutrition Action Officer, Dr. Liland Estacion disclosed this during the Kapihan sa PIA forum held recently..
Estacion said the municipality of Pamplona registered the lowest malnutrition rate in the province with .5 percent, followed by Dauin with 1.8 percent, Sibulan with 2.4 percent, La Libertad with 3.6 percent, and Siaton with 4.2 percent..
The Provincial Nutrition Action Officer lauded these municipalities especially Pamplona town for their efforts in minimizing the malnutrition rate in their areas..
Estacion said Pamplona has different local support groups and cooperatives that help provide nutrition interventions for children..
On the other hand, the top 10 municipalities with high malnutrition rates are Tayasan, Vallehermoso, Manjuyod, San Jose, Mabinay, Sta.
Catalina, Basay, Bindoy, Ayungon, and Jimalalud..
For the component cities category, Canlaon City has the lowest malnutrition rate among the cities of the province with 2.1 percent, followed by Dumaguete City with 2.2 percent, and Tanjay City with 2.9 percent..
Meanwhile, Guihulngan City has the highest malnutrition rate with 9.5 percent, Bais City with 6.6 percent, and Bayawan City with 4.9 percent..
For 2018, the malnutrition rate in the province is 5.6 percent..
Estacion sees this as a huge improvement from the province's malnutrition rate when Negros Oriental Gov.
Roel Degamo stepped into office, which was then at 8.6 percent..
For 2019, I hope na kaning atong malnutrition rate mo-lower down pa because bag-o man mandate ang atong newly elected, re-elected officials (I am hoping that the malnutrition rate would drop further this 2019 especially with the new mandate given to our newly elected and re-elected officials),.
For now, the PNC's focus is addressing the problem in stunting..
Stunting occurs when a child's height is lower than the standard set for a child's age..
Estacion cited this nutrition concern starts at the conception of the child or in the womb of the mother..
She stressed the importance of providing nutrition interventions during the first 1,000 days of the infant..
Image Source: www.pna.gov.phAtleast 44 persons with disabilities (PWDs) recently completed the basic entrepreneurial development provided by the Department of Trade and Industry (DTI)-Isabela in partnership with the local govenrment of San Mateo, Isabela..
Romeo Panopio, Trade and Industry Development Specialist-DTI Isabela, said each PWD-participant received sari-sari store starter kits worth P20,000 from the Department of Labor and Employment..
Panopio said each starter kit consists of rice, instant noodles, coffee, sugar, condiments, laundry detergents, bath soaps, shampoo and other merchandise typically sold by sari-sari stores..
The Sari-Sari stores will be located at the respective residences of the PWD-beneficiaries, he added.
We will continue to harness the talents and skills of our PWDs here and provide the assistance they need to run their own businesses, the DTI official added.
(ALM/PIA-2/with report from Ellerie Mila Ramel, DTI-2 Supervising Trade and Industry Development Specialist).
Image Source: www.pia.gov.phThe Catanduanes State University (CSU) and The Kochi University of Japan signed a memorandum of understanding (MOU) on June 3, 2019 for a collaborative tie-up between the two institutions..
The CSU and Kochi University agreed to collaborate with each other in terms of exchange of faculty, students, researchers and other administrative staff, information materials and other academic mutual aid necessary to support internationalization initiatives..
The MOA entitles the CSU and Kochi University to not more than three exchange students for one academic year of studies, on condition that each institution shall accept the exchange students as non-regular students who do not aim at obtaining a degree from the host institution..
Under the MOA, exchange students shall not pay examination fees, matriculation fees or tuition to their host institution..
Morales said the agreement would also strengthen the internalization initiatives of the university as she reported that presently, the CSU has a faculty member, Prof. Kristian Aldea, who is pursuing his Ph.D. in Marine Science specifically on Benthic Ecology at the Kochi University..
The agreement was signed by Dr. Satoshi Kubota of Kochi University and CSU President Dr. Minerva I. Morales, with officials in the teaching and non-teaching department of CSU witnessing the event..
Also present were the personnel of the Research and Production Affairs Office headed by Dr. Lily P. Custodio, and Research and Development Services Director Dr. Jimmy T. Masagca..
In February 21, 2019, Kubota made a prior visit to the CSU for an orientation during the formal staging of the partnership. .
FAITH AS A PILLAR.
Why am I not afraid to do the job?
Newly reelected Pilar Mayor Necitas Cubrado said despite the suspension that interrupted her term, I have God and I have the people with me, why should i be afraid. she and other local officails took their oaths of office before judge Glenn Pergamino of the MTCT in the towns.
(PIA/Bohol)Pilar town mayor Necitas Cubrado took her solemn oath of office before Municipal Circuit Trial Court presiding judge for Sierra Bullones and Pilar Circuit Judge Glenn Pergamino as her family and supporters witness the rites held inside the municipal gymnasium, June 28..
The oath taking means so much to Cubrado, whom the Office of the Ombudsman recommended an unfavorable ruling for usurpation of authority of the Sangguniang Bayan..
With the new mandate, Cubrado now feels vindicated for performing a task she first professed to do as she promised to the town's constituents during her campaign and her first term..
In her second term, Cubrado, along with newly elected leaders and municipal government officials, earlier led the blessing and inauguration of the P19 million Evacuation Center and the P11 million water system which will serve 8 barangays and is now interconnected to the inset Pilar Waterworks, reported Gualberto Jaspe, information officer and SB secretary..
The people of Pilar have spoken, Cubrado, in wavering voice aired her earnest thanks to the people who gave her another chance to prove herself, as she started her inaugural address..
It is a memorable moment, she said as she recalled her first oath taking rites when there was visible division pervading in the crowd..
This might be the sign, she pointed out as she cites the unity that has swept the new and still ongoing covered court..
Nahiluna na ang atong katawhan, (Our people now are finally settled comfortably) she said as vice mayor Datahan quipped: if not for this covered court, we would be having this ceremonies under the sun, without chairs, maybe..
Cubrado has campaigned despite a legal baggage, threatened by cases, but she remained in her resolve for service..
Why am I not afraid to do the job, she said possibly hinting the suspension that interrupted her term..
I have God and I have the people with me, why should i be afraid, she declared..
Also taking his oath of office before judge Pergamino is Eugenio B. Datahan, elected Vice mayor of the town..
Datahan, also in his second term, has led the local SB in introducing amendments to the Revenue Code, a key development fund source and the town's defining Ecological Solid Waste Management policy..
Also taking their solemn oaths of offices as members of the new Sangguniang Bayan were Charito Arnado, Francisco Auguis, Jaime Ucab, Nicanor Mante Jr., Wilfredo Bernante Sr., Misael Hilot, Jaime A. Lusica and Carlos D. Cagape..
At the oath taking rites were Rev Fr. Chito Lozada, Board members Jone Jade Bautista, Congresswoman elect Kristine Alexie Tutor, representatives of Cong Yap, Gov Chatto and the Philippine Army. .
Image Source: www.pia.gov.phThe Negros Occidental Police Provincial Office's (NOCPPO) 2019 first semester accomplishments generally exceeded its accomplishments in the same period in 2018..
From January to June this year, its crime clearance efficiency (CCE) increased from 80.42 percent to 85.28 percent while the crime solution efficiency (CSE) hiked from 62.71 percent in the first semester of 2018 to 72.73 percent in first semester of 2019..
CCE refers to cases filed in court and the suspect is not arrested while CSE refers to cases filed in court and suspect is arrested..
Crime incidents recorded for the eight focus crimes which include murder, homicide, physical injury, robbery, theft, carnapping, motornapping and rape, reached 624 while there were only 456 incidents recorded..
Police Major Edison Garcia, NOCPPO information officer, who faced the media in in behalf of NOCPPO provincial director Police Colonel Romeo Baleros during its regular weekly press conference, attributed the lower crime incidence in their sustained implementation of the Integrated Patrol Deployment Plan (IPDP) and its Enhanced Managing Police Operations (EMPO)..
For the first semester, NOCPPO was able to seize 1,641.94 grams of suspected shabu with a total dangerous drugs board (DDB) value of P16,419,400 from 345 successful operations and 855 cases were filed in violation of the RA 9165 or the Dangerous Drugs Act..
NOCPPO was also able to conduct 200 anti-gambling operations that led to the arrest of 535 individuals with 106 cases filed in court..
Meanwhile, in June last month, five wanted persons with murder cases were arrested in Himamaylan City.
A total of 765 persons with warrants of arrest were arrested in the first six months of the year..
This is aside from the 112 individuals arrested from its 164 successful operations against illegal firearms and yielded 133 firearms confiscated and 106 cases filed in court..
Total crime volume decreased by seven percent from 1,491 reported crime incidents in January to June 2018 versus the 1,386 crime incidents recorded in the same period this year.
(LTP/EAD-PIA6 Negros Occidental).
– The Department of Petroleum Resources (DPR) in Ibadan said on Monday that it closed down 17 illegal LPG skid in Ibadan and issued warning to nine filling plants in the second quarter of 2019..
The News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) reports that Mr Oluyemi Olaonipekun, the Operations Controller of Ibadan Field Office of DPR, disclosed this in Ibadan on Monday while speaking with newsmen..
Olaonipekun said the DPR carried out its operations effectively in monitoring the operations of Retail Oil Marketers (ROM), Liquefied Petroleum Gas (LPG) retailers and depot operators..
He said: The exercise is continous and we will continue to improve as well as carry out the necessary assignments as stipulated by the regulations and oil guidelines..
In the other two areas, LPG and filling stations, we have been able to curtail people selling at forecourt below the required volume being paid for by the motorists and other buyers to a greater extent in Oyo State..
To this end, we have not been able to close down any filling station due to unnecessary under-dispensing of the pumps..
The only area we had closed down filling station is where they have installed skid without our approval..
In the last three months, we have been able to stop illegal installation of LPG skid and closed down 17 illegally installed skid from operating within our area of operations, that is Oyo State..
To forestall future occurrence during our routine visit and surveillance, we have gathered data of illegal outfits and their gas suppliers..
We believe that if they had not been supplied gas they will not be able to sell or have the products..
We now have the data of the licenced legal operators who are supplying the illegal operators..
We have thereafter written warning letters to nine major LPG retailer plant owners; if they further supply any unlicensed, unapproved LPG site we will close down their own plants too..
The law gives us the power to do that based on the conditions in which they got their licences..
They have some responsibilities and duties to perform and if they fail, we have the power to suspend or revoke their licences..
He, however, disclosed that DPR was planning to meet with LPG plant owners and stakeholders..
The meeting, he said, would seek ways to curb unnecessary supply of products to unlicensed and unapproved sites..
We will also go out on a road show to sensitise people on how to safely handle and use LPG..
LPG is friendly if it is handled carefully, he said..
BEVERLY HILLS, July 08, (THEWILL) – The Federal High Court in Lagos has restrained the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) from enforcing a fine of N89, 675,000 against Oando Plc and enforcing its decision to appoint an interim management team for Oando..
Justice Ayokunle Faji granted Oando's application for leave to file a motion for a judicial review of SEC's decision imposing the fine on it..
The judge made the order on Friday following an ex-parte motion filed by Oando through its counsel Olasupo Shasore (SAN)..
SEC Acting Director-General Mary Uduk, SEC and Mutiu Sunmonu, who was appointed as Oando's interim head, are the first to third respondents..
Justice Faji granted an order of certiorari bringing up to the Federal High Court for the purpose of being quashed, the decision of the first respondent (SEC) contained in its letter dated 31st May 2019..
An order of certiorari is a writ or order by which a higher court reviews a case tried in a lower court or administrative agency..
The court also granted an order for the quashing of SEC's directive to Oando to convene an extra-ordinary general meeting on or before July 1 to appoint new directors and articulate remedial measures for alleged corporate governance lapses..
The judge granted an order of prohibition and/or an injunction restraining and preventing the first and second respondents by themselves, agents, servants or whomsoever, howsoever from enforcing or seeking to enforce the decision contained in the letter dated 31 May 2019..
Justice Faji gave an order of prohibition and/or an injunction restraining and preventing the second respondent (SEC) from enforcing or seeking to enforce the decision of the first respondent contained in the press release made on Sunday, 2 June, 2019 appointing an interim management team to be headed by the third respondent to oversee the affairs of the applicant..
Justice Faji directed Oando to ensure service on the respondents of the order and the application for judicial review within 48hours and adjourned until July 22 for hearing of the application for judicial review before the vacation judge..
SEC had on May 31 announced the conclusion of an investigation of Oando and ordered its Group Chief Executive Officer, Wale Tinubu, his deputy, Omamofe Boyo, and other affected board members to resign..
SEC subsequently set up an interim management team headed by Sunmonu to oversee Oando's affairs and to conduct an Extraordinary General Meeting on or before July 1..
Police arraign Sen.
Abbo for assault.
The Police have brought Senator Elisha Abbo to the Zuba Magistrates' Court, Abuja, for arraignment for assault..
The lawmaker is expected to be arraigned on one count of assault today..
Our correspondent had reported exclusively on Sunday that the Police will, this week, file criminal charges against Abbo for assaulting a woman at an adult sex toy shop in Abuja earlier this year..
The Commissioner of Police, Federal Capital Territory Police Command, Bala Ciroma, confirmed that Abbo had been taken to court..
He said, They (Police officers) have taken him to the Zuba Magistrates' court for arraignment.
They are on their way now..
It was gathered that Police detectives had established a  case against the Peoples Democratic Party lawmaker representing Adamawa North Senatorial District in the National Assembly..
Our Correspondent had reported that, apart from the evidence deduced from the video which showed Abbo repeatedly slapping his victim for intervening in an argument between him and the shop owner, the admission by the senator in a Press statement he issued last week was also said to have added to the bulk of evidence against him..
The Federal Capital Territory Police Command had interrogated the lawmaker last Thursday and subsequently detained him for 24 hours.
The Petroleum and Natural Gas Senior Staff Association of Nigeria (PENGASSAN), has urged the new Group Managing Director of NNPC, Mr Mele Kyari to as a matter of urgency address fuel subsidy challenge..
The association in a congratulatory message signed by its General Secretary, Mr to address the challenge of obsolete refineries..
He described Kyari's appointment as well-deserved and recognition of his 27 years exemplary service in the NNPC group..
According to him, the nation's growing economy, which is majorly dependent on the oil and gas industry, needs a vibrant leader that will address the issues..
The new Group Managing Director of NNPC, Mr Mele Kyari [Twitter/@NNPCgroup] .
Okugbawa expressed optimism that Kyari as a typical crude oil marketer with prerequisite certification and outfield pedigree in petroleum economics and crude oil and gas trading, would reposition the sector..
GMD Sir, we agree that the nation's oil and gas industry is on a steady progression to the next level..
However, the challenges associated with pipeline vandalism, crude oil theft, inadequate infrastructure, pricing uncertainties, and the obsolete refineries must be addressed..
The contentious fuel subsidy issues and resting of the Petroleum Industry Bill (PIB) are issues the Nigerian masses expect the new NNPC Board to champion,'' the general secretary said..
Okugbawa said that having followed Kyari's career progression, he was optimistic that his appointment would further help in the development of the oil and gas industry and the nation's economy..
He commended the outgoing GMD, Dr  for his contributions to the growth of the industry..
The new Group Managing Director of NNPC, Mr Mele Kyari and his predecessor, Dr. Maikanti Baru[Twitter/@NNPCgroup] .
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
have added a Mexican flavour to their squad with the signing of Mexican midfielder  as they continue to build their squad ahead of their first season in the .
The NFD champions are also looking at adding more experience to the squad with , Marc Van Heerden and Kris Bergman all training with the team currently, and looking likely to sign..
Stellenbosch Coach Steve Barker says he's pleased to have on board Franco, who played for AmaTuks last season.
He has joked that Stellenbosch has one of the most diverse squads in the league now..
Having already signed Dutch goalkeeper , and the signings of Gould, Van Heerden and Bergman likely, Barker says he is only really now looking to possibly add a wide player or two..
Barker says he is pleased to have started his pre-season almost three weeks ago, as it has allowed him to virtually finalise his squad and build a good foundation..
<a href=https://iono.fm/e/715027>Content hosted by iono.fm</a>.
Barker has also brought in former Tuks Coach Evangelos Vellios as the new reserve team coach, while Pernell McKop joins as goalkeeper coach, and Dale Solomon has joined as data analyst..
Meanwhile, Angelo Kerspuy, who was part of last season's squad, has retired and will move behind the scenes.
Barker is pleased to keep the Stellenbosch-born player involved with the club..
Stellenbosch will continue their preseason next week with a short camp in Caledon, before playing friendlies against fellow PSL teams Orlando Pirates and SuperSport United, amongst others..
Meanwhile, it has been confirmed that Stellenbosch's opening league game against Chippa United, which was scheduled to be played at Coetzenburg Stadium, has now been swapped around due to stadium logistics, and Stellenbosch will now play Chippa away in the opening Absa Premiership fixture.
– Report by Rob Delport.
New signing Diego Franco to add Mexican flavour to Stellenbosch FCSABC News – Breaking news, special reports, world, business, sport coverage of all South African current events.
Africa's news leader..
The new Group Managing Director of Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation (NNPC), Mallam Mele Kyari, has vowed to continuously entrench Transparency, Accountability, and Performance Excellence across all NNPC operations..
He further promised to put the necessary structures in place to ensure compliance with these principles.
He disclosed that a new way of reporting its activities will be better aligned with its corporate reorganization and offer more insight into its business..
Kyari, who stated this on Monday at the Valedictory ceremony for the outgoing GMD, Dr. Maikanti Kacalla Baru, further promised that under his leadership, NNPC will strive to be a more credible, competent and accountable institution that manages the oil resources on behalf of the citizens of Nigeria, in accordance with its mandate and the core persuasions of President Muhammadu Buhari..
According to Kyari, for NNPC to maintain positive image, more transparency, shared values of integrity and professionalism must permeate every level of the Corporation..
He said: I would like to start by thanking His Excellency President Muhammadu Buhari, President and Commander in Chief of the Armed Forces of the Federal Republic of Nigeria, for entrusting me with this enormous task of leading NNPC..
Furthermore, I want to express my sincere appreciation to my immediate predecessor, GMD Emeritus, Dr. Maikanti Kacalla Baru.
We are proud of the laudable achievements and the accolades Dr. Baru brought to NNPC over the last three years of his stewardship.
It is our aspiration to continue on this journey to consolidate these achievements and take NNPC to the Next Level.
Going forward, we will seek to continuously entrench Transparency, Accountability, and Performance Excellence across all NNPC operations, and we will put the necessary structures in place to ensure compliance with these principles..
Further speaking, he revealed that in next couple of weeks, the COOs will join him to unveil the NNPC Roadmap towards Global Excellence.
The new GMD NNPC, added that the roadmap will guide the corporation's aspirations to achieve sustained outstanding performance to meet the short and long term growth objectives of the Corporation..
Kyari: We will continue to adopt technology and Innovation to refine our business processes in line with best industry practice, improve efficiency, block leakages and create desirable outcomes that will strengthen the NNPC brand.
To build this brand, there is need to improve the synergy of teams and commitment to business objectives towards a unified enterprise view.
It is painful that nearly all our petroleum products requirements are imported despite the existence of our three refineries, and the numerous attempts by successive governments to encourage the establishment of private refineries.
This has to stop.
We will see to the successful completion of the ongoing rehabilitation of our refineries within record time.
We will further encourage the establishment of private refineries either as independents or in some form of Public Private Collaboration..
This we believe will help in making our Nation a net exporter of petroleum products within the life of this administration.
He also promised to continue with the revamping and rehabilitation of all downstream infrastructure particularly NNPC pipeline network which has been subject of persistent attacks by vandals..
He stated: As a matter of responsibility, the NNPC will continue to ensure availability of petroleum products to our citizens despite the huge challenges associated with this task..
NNPC will seek to exploit the untapped opportunities in Renewable energy value chain to promote investment diversification in clean energy.
This aims at transforming the corporation from Oil and Gas entity to an Energy Corporation..
Fourth-century Buddhist terracotta heads probably hacked off by the Taliban and found stuffed in poorly made wooden crates at Heathrow are to be returned to  where they will be star museum exhibits..  gave details on Monday of one of the most significant repatriation cases it has dealt with relating to the illegal looting of artefacts from Afghanistan and Iraq..
Nine sculptural heads and a torso were intercepted at Heathrow in 2002 after a flight from Peshawar in Pakistan.
After a long legal process, they were sent to the  last year to be analysed, conserved and catalogued..
St John Simpson, a senior curator at the museum, said the heads would have been painted and had bodies and would have adorned the walls of Buddhist monasteries in the ancient kingdom of Gandhāra about 1,500 years ago.. They are stunning, he said.
These are quite outstanding.
We've returned thousands of objects to Kabul over the years but this is the first time we've been able to work on Buddhist pieces..
Simpson said the Gandhāran sculptures were most likely caught up in the most intense period of Taliban iconoclasm in early 2001, during which giant Buddha statutes in the Bamiyan valley .
A torso was also found with the sculptural heads.
Photograph: Trustees of the British Museum .
The sculptures tell a story of Buddhism's heyday in what is now Afghanistan.
Hundreds of monasteries were built and then abandoned after the arrival of the Arab armies in the 8th century and the establishment of Islam as the predominant religion..
The return of any object which has been illegally trafficked is hugely important symbolically, said Simpson.
But these pieces will form one of the largest groups of Buddhist art to be returned to the Kabul museum.
When you think what Kabul has been through since the 1990s, culminating in the atrocity of Bamiyan, this is a huge event..
The sculptures will be displayed for a short time at the British Museum before being given to officials at the Afghanistan embassy in London.
They will then go on display in Kabul..
Seeking to highlight work the British Museum does that often goes under the radar, its director, Hartwig Fischer, said war, conflict, climate change, globalisation, poverty and migration all played a part in threats to cultural heritage..
I am extremely proud of this deep and committed engagement, built collaboratively over many years … Sadly, this work is more essential now than ever and the museum will continue and increase its efforts to assist colleagues globally in the preservation and celebration of their cultural heritage..
London has long been the centre of a thriving black market in illegally traded ancient artefacts..
The museum also revealed details of a group of 154 Mesopotamian texts written on small clay tablets that were seized on entry to the UK in February 2011.
After investigations they will soon be returned to Iraq..
The work the museum does to facilitate the return of recently looted objects will inevitably raise questions of why it resists the repatriation of items in its collection that have been historically looted..
A group of 154 Mesopotamian texts will be returned to Iraq.
Photograph: Trustees of the British Museum .
Some of the best known examples include , which were taken from what is now Nigeria by British forces in the late 19th century..
A new museum is planned in Benin City and Fischer said the British Museum had been involved in talks about collaboration and loans as part of a consortium called the .
What we have managed to do over the past year is to establish a much closer dialogue, exchange, collaboration, confidence, trust with our colleagues, especially in Benin City but also Lagos, he said..
The museum's 2018-19 annual review revealed on Monday that it received 6.02 million visitors in the year to April.
That means that while Tate Modern was the most visited attraction in 2018, the museum was number one in the financial year..
Fischer addressed another contentious issue the museum faces: its continuing .
Dropping the oil company would not be a meaningful contribution to the world's environmental challenges, he argued..
It's looking to the ways we live and consume that will make a difference.
Ending a partnership which over the years has created extraordinary learning opportunities, for people from all walks of life, is not a vital contribution to solving the environmental challenges and problems in the world, Fischer said..
Middle East and North Africa .
South and Central Asia .
Turkey to push relations with Russia forward: Minister.
YEKATERINBURG- Anadolu Agency.
Ankara intends to push  relations forward through strong political will and close dialogue between leaders, 's industry and technology minister said on July 8..
Our goal [on trade volume between ] is to reach the foreign trade volume levels of $33 billion that we achieved before and then to increase this figure to $100 billion,  told Turkish-Russian Industry Forum in Yekaterinburg, one of 's important heavy industry centers.     .  highlighted the need for balanced expansion in trade between the two countries, with both complementing each other in ability.     .
He added that the Akkuyu nuclear plant and TurkStream gas pipeline projects showed the importance of cooperation between  at the forum organized by Foreign Economic  Boards (DEİK).     .
These strategic energy projects deepen our bilateral economic relations and provide solid foundations for our long-term cooperation.
I believe we need to increase our strategic projects, he said, underlining that these partnerships were satisfactory but not sufficient.     .
He noted that Turkish companies in many sectors, from woodworking to glass ceramics, from healthcare to textiles, have invested about $10 billion in .
'Great potential to develop relations' .
For his part, Russian Industry Minister Denis Manturov said Moscow prepared a number of packages to facilitate Turkish businesses' arrival to  and support long-term investments.     .  is also creating privileged conditions for Turkish business people, he added.     .
The giants leading Russian industry in 's market are doing successful business, as are Turkish companies in , he said, stressing the great potential to develop bilateral relations between Moscow and Ankara.     .
Over the past 2,000 years, Lebanon has experienced over 13 major earthquakes.
These tremors are a result of the country's location within an active tectonic system called the Dead Sea Rift, which divides the African and Arabian plates..
One of Lebanon's most devastating earthquakes occurred in 551 AD, a 7.5 magnitude quake along the Mount Lebanon Thrust (MLT) resulted in a tsunami, which, according to a 2007 , destroyed most of the coastal cities, drowned Tripoli, and caused damage so severe that Beirut did not recover for 1,300 years..
Seismologists predict that the MLT has a recurring cycle of every 1,500-1,750 years, meaning a major earthquake could fall anytime within the next 250 years.
The World Bank's Global Facility for Disaster Risk Reduction (GFDRR) puts Lebanon at a medium-risk level, estimating that there is a 1 for a potentially-damaging earthquake and tsunami to occur within the next 50 years..
Additionally, Lebanon's offshore oil and gas operations are scheduled to begin along the MLT, and could trigger a larger earthquake in a shorter time frame.
A 2016  highlighted that scientists are increasingly confident about the link between earthquakes and oil and gas production, while criticizing regulators for being slow to react. .
To mitigate these risks, the government, with the support of international agencies, has been working to improve the country's resilience to disasters.
The government established a Disaster Risk Management Unit in 2009, followed by the National Coordination Committee on Disaster Risk Reduction in 2013, the latter of which has been setting up a network of emergency control rooms, conducting drills and simulations, and raising awareness..
Despite these steps, the GFDRR  that Lebanon still does not have an operational disaster management plan.
With the overall risk of earthquakes in Lebanon coupled with the potential seismic tremors of the MLT and ongoing offshore oil and gas activities, it is time to begin the conversation and make a consolidated effort toward preparing for the worst.
In addition to saving lives, the World Bank  that every dollar invested in disaster prevention saves $4 in disaster damage..
The Sendai Framework for Disaster Risk Reduction outlines  and global best practices that aim to improve global resilience to natural or man-made hazards.
These range from governance structures to policies, tactics, and technology, as well as rescue guidelines.
One key aspect is insurance.
A 2015 OECD  finds that ability to mobilize finances quickly to pay for rescue operations, compensate victims, and rebuild destroyed property after a disaster is a key challenge most governments need to overcome. .
Similar to conventional insurance schemes, the system works by pooling financial resources from a large number of people in advance of a disaster, and then using these funds to compensate potential victims for natural or man-made hazards.
However, the technicalities of the scheme varies, which allows room for innovation. .
In some developed countries, insurance firms offer private disaster insurance cover.
These schemes, however, usually cover businesses and tend to be unaffordable for the more vulnerable lower-income households or companies.
Alternatively, government-supported insurance programs are becoming increasingly popular across developing countries.
In this system, stakeholders pay a mandatory—usually affordable—premium that is used to finance a common fund—usually reinsured on the global private insurance market—that is then accessible for disaster relief in case of a catastrophe..  seeks to add a compulsory, affordable tariff to existing car insurance policies to fully cover 5 million people against catastrophes.
The fees contribute to a national solidarity fund that will compensate uninsured victims in case a catastrophic event causes personal harm or damage to a family's primary residence..
In my opinion, Lebanon's caisse mutuelle (mutual fund) system provides an excellent infrastructure for citizens to voluntarily create a common pool disaster insurance autonomously from the government.
A group of stakeholders can band together, agree on the terms and conditions for payouts, and contribute directly to a mutual fund that protects against natural or manmade hazards.
The same funds can likely be reinsured on the private market as well, enabling access to more money when people might need it the most.
The current framework provides a good stepping stone that could pave the way—with the right reforms, control, and oversight—for a national one.
It is time to start the conversation, and ensure Lebanon will be ready when the time comes. .
The opposition MDC led by advocate Nelson Chamisa has argued that the remarks which were made by Job Sikhala that the party was planning to overthrow president Emmerson Mnangagwa's government before 2023 did not represent the position of the party.
Posting on Facebook, the party spokesperson, Luke Tamborinyoka said:.
MDC believes in non-violence, legality and constitutionalism.
The MDC notes with deep worry and concern that Hon.
Job Sikhala's statements made during a rally in Bikita East over the weekend have caused uproar and the party wishes to clarify its position regarding the same..
It is the party's view that Hon.
Sikhala's views as expressed at the rally and widely quoted in the press were his own personal opinions, which we believe have been misconstrued and misinterpreted..
For the record, the MDC believes in Constitutional, peaceful, democratic, non-violent and legal means of resolving the national crisis.
We have never been perpetrators of illegality and non-violence.
If anything, we have always been the victims..
The MDC is deeply worried about the escalating national crisis and to this end; the party will on Thursday this week launch the Roadmap to Economic Recovery, Legitimacy, Openness and Democracy (RELOAD) which is our blueprint to legitimacy and economic recovery in the country..
RELOAD does not in any way entail illegal and unconstitutional means of solving the national crisis..
Once again, the MDC wishes to state unequivocally that it has always submitted itself to the cardinal values of legality, constitutionalism and democracy.
Any attempt to portray the MDC in any other way is disingenuous and unfortunate..
His remarks are in resonance with those of the permanent secretary in the Information Ministry, Nick Mangwana, who described Sikhala's remarks as uncivilised and unconstitutional.
Mangwana added that the government will take necessary actions against anyone who wants to overthrow a constitutionally elected government..
The ruling ZANU PF and the Nelson Chamisa led MDC-A have been at loggerheads since the July 30, 2018 elections which the latter claims were manipulated in favour of the former..
Both parties have been agreeing on the necessity of institution a national dialogue to address both the economic and political crises.
However, they clash on the issue of legitimacy which Chamisa is saying has to be resolved since it is the root cause of all the issues.
ZANU-PF, on the other hand, is adamant that Mnangagwa won, hence no need for discussing the matter..
Last week MDC vice President Tendai Biti said Zimbabwe is ripe for another coup, that could depose President Emmerson Mnangagwa barely two years after he wrestled power from long time ruler Robert Mugabe with the assistance of the military in 2017..
Biti was speaking at a panel discussion hosted by local think-tank, Southern African Political and Economic Series (Sapes) Trust on Thursday..
We need a national transitional authority, we need to have a soft landing for our country.
If we do not do that, we are heading for an implosion, an Armageddon..
An Armageddon, in the form of another military coup and this is a point which I keep on seeing, that the signs are there just as they were obvious in 2017, said the Harare East legislator..
Mugabe was pushed out by the army after firing then Vice President Mnangagwa as an internal power struggle within Zanu PF boiled over, amid claims the once powerful State leader was setting up his wife for takeover..
Biti said he had warned about the 2017 coup although he was not spot on about the days..
If you look at some of the things we wrote, we were arguing as far back as 2013 that there will be a coup in this country.
Ofcourse we could not predict 14, 15, 16 November but all the material conditions of another coup are in existence in Zimbabwe at the moment, said Biti..
Remember if you study history, there is no coup which is a solitary coup, a coup always comes with a twin brother or multiple brothers..
Since taking charge and winning controversial elections last year, Mnangagwa has watched the country's economic fortunes nosedive with deadly protests twice in the past year alone in which over 20 people were gunned down by the army..
Mnangagwa announced a raft of austerity measures that have left citizens on the brink with threats of mass protests looming large..
To avert a crisis, Biti said Zimbabwe needed a quick solution..
We need to democratically coup-proof our country by finding a democratic solution to our problems and avoid a vacuum that makes military intervention inevitable, the MDC vice president said..
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
Iranian Foreign Minister Mohammad Javad Zarif condemned a recent move by the British government to capture an Iranian oil tanker in the Strait of Gibraltar, saying, It sets a dangerous precedent and must end now..
Iran is neither a member of the EU nor subject to any European oil embargo, Zarif said on his Twitter account on Monday..
Last I checked, EU was against extraterritoriality.
UK's unlawful seizure of a tanker with Iranian oil on behalf of #B_Team is piracy, pure and simple, he wrote, adding, It sets a dangerous precedent and must end now..
The British Royal Marines seized the giant Iranian oil tanker in Gibraltar on Thursday for trying to take oil to Syria allegedly in violation of EU sanctions..
Iran's Foreign Ministry maintains that the oil tanker was not bound for Syria and its seizure has taken place at the behest of the US..
(Reuters) - Starbucks Corp () on Sunday apologized after an employee at one of its stores in Tempe, Arizona asked six police officers to leave or move out of a customer's line of sight, triggering social media backlash. .
The officers had visited the store on July 4 and had paid for the drinks, before one company employee approached them about a customer not feeling safe because of the police presence, the Tempe Officers Association said on Twitter. .
This treatment of public safety workers could not be more disheartening.
While the barista was polite, making such a request at all was offensive, the association added. .
Following the incident, users took to Twitter to support the police, tweeting comments along with the #boycottstarbucks hashtag. .  addressed to the Tempe Police Department and posted on its website, Starbucks said the treatment of the officers was completely unacceptable. .
On behalf of Starbucks, I want to sincerely apologize to you all for the experience that six of your officers had in our store on July 4, Rossann Williams, the coffee chain's executive vice president, wrote. .
What occurred in our store on July 4 is never the experience your officers or any customer should have, and at Starbucks, we are already taking the necessary steps to ensure this doesnot happen again in the future. .
Last year, the company was mired in a racial profiling incident that involved the arrest of two black men in a Philadelphia store.
Starbucks later settled with the men privately, and temporarily closed 8,000 U.S. stores for anti-bias training. .
Reporting by Shubham Kalia in Bengaluru; Editing by Lisa Shumaker.
KINGSTON, Jamaica, Monday July 8, 2019 – Minister of Science, Energy and Technology Fayval Williams, says Petróleos de Venezuela (PDV) has brought a compensation claim against the Government of Jamaica over the retake of the company's 49 per cent shares in Petrojam..
She made the disclosure following the tabling of the Report on the strategic review of the State-owned oil refinery..
We have been notified of one claim from PDV, and it's in keeping with the provisions of The Compulsory Acquisition (Shares in Petrojam Limited) Act.
The claim has been made in the Supreme Court all the documents are being reviewed [by] the Attorney General, Williams said in response to questions posed by Opposition Spokesperson on Energy, Phillip Paulwell. .
She said she would make a statement to the House, after being fully briefed on the issue by Attorney General Marlene Malahoo Forte..
Legislation to retake ownership of the 49 per cent shares in Petrojam held by the Venezuelan State-owned oil and natural gas company, PDV Caribe, was passed in both Houses of Parliament in February..
The move was taken in a bid to safeguard the country's energy security..
Meantime, the Petroleum (Amendment) Act, 2019, which seeks to transfer the rights and obligations of the PetroCaribe Development Fund (PDF) to the Government has been passed in the Senate.
Under the amendments, the PDF's functions and a small amount of liabilities will be integrated into the Ministry of Finance and Public Service, and the Fund, as a separate entity, will cease to exist..
Legislation to allow for this new arrangement had become necessary given that the Fund, which was established as a public body in 2006, has now fulfilled its mandate..
The PDF had the responsibility of managing the proceeds, which accrued to Jamaica under the Energy Co-operation Agreement entered into between the Governments of Jamaica and Venezuela..
It was charged with lending to self-financing public bodies for human capital development, offering assistance to the Ministry of Finance for domestic debt refinancing as well as lending to reduce Jamaica's dependence on fossil fuel..
Minister without Portfolio in the Ministry of Economic Growth and Job Creation, Senator Pearnel Charles Jr., who piloted the legislation, said that transfer of the Fund to Central Government is crucial in light of the Standby Agreement with the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and is also in keeping with good public financial management..
He noted that the inflows to Jamaica under the PetroCaribe Agreement have been negligible since financial year 2015/2016 and the prospects for any improvement in inflows appears to be unlikely given the clear outlook on Venezuela's economy and the sanctions that have been imposed by the United States and other Governments..  to receive news via email from Caribbean360.
They were talented footballers, but a clash with the law saw them confined at Kamiti Maximum Security Prison for life.
Now they can only watch Africa Cup of Nations from the correctional facility.
Such is the story of, among others, midfielder Tedium 'Teddy' Rogers and a young prolific forwardEric 'Spring' Salim . ust like he has heard prison warders shout (squat) for the past 19 years, Tedium 'Teddy' Rodgers can, with a snap of a finger, pick talented footballers from block A to G of Kamiti Maximum Prison who can easily make two complete football teams.
This is without going to the Isolation, Terror and VIP wing..
There is Byron Robert Otieno, a former Kenya Premier League (KPL) striker and Eric 'Spring' Salim, another prolific young forward.
They are both serving life sentences.
These are footballers who could have solved Frenchman Sebastian Migne's dilemma in attack in the ongoing Africa Cup of Nations (Afcon) in Egypt..
While not in any way disputing the Kenyan team that was recently sent home after they failed to make it to last 16, the inmates believe had they been free, just maybe the head coach could have been faced by a selection dilemma.
But now they can only watch the game from the correctional facility..
In Kamiti, we have extremely talented footballers, some who have played in the KPL and some who were in youth academies before they found themselves on the wrong side of the law.
We jokingly say prison is the hotbed of talent, says Teddy..
Tedium 'Teddy' Rogers was lured into crime while nursing a knee injury that saw him take a break from football.
Photos/AMOS ABUGA.
Having played in the same team as current KPL CEO Jack Oguda, former national team head coach Francis Kimanzi and another top coach Salim Ali to name but a few, Teddy mulls that his carelessness never allowed him to reach full potential..
He was at the climax of his football career playing for former KPL champions Mathare United, when he was arrested and later handed a death sentence.
His identity has since changed to mere numericals, 22/04, and may just remain that for the rest of his life.
He has Kenya's third President Mwai Kibaki to thank for having commuted his death sentence to a life sentence in 2009.
But the 43-year-old is hopeful he will one day walk out of the dreaded prison walls..
But where did he go wrong?
The urge to make an extra quick buck for a budding 20 something is what brought Teddy to his current predicament.
Had he been contented with what he was earning from his club, then maybe the end game could have been different. .
I was weak and vulnerable, therefore, when I picked a knee injury, friends introduced me to a side hustle that was to keep me going until I got back on my feet.
I had a young family, my wife and a child and my mum depended on me.
The job was crime—I wish I never took up their offer, he recalls..
Long hand of the law.
There were a couple of 'successful jobs, but then again there is .
I was nabbed during an attempted robbery that went wrong on Nairobi's Thika Road in early 2001.
Together with my two accomplices, we were arrested fleeing a crime scene with stolen goods, leading to a trial that lasted close to seven years, he recalls..
His mentors and accomplicesin crime were freed after spending only seven years in remand while he was convicted and sentenced to death.
While he has since learnt to live with it, he believes the justice system in the country tends to curve towards the haves..
As a firstborn son, he regrets that his actions might have contributed to early deaths of his father, two sisters, his wife all who died after his conviction and subsequent sentence.
Not being there for their final send-off hurts to date.
Being an absentee parent to his now 25-year-old son is arguably the biggest regret for the former midfielder. .
I am lucky to be alive today.
Many of my former footballers died by the bullet back then, some couldnot stand life in prison and for a reason or another are not with us today.
I live to fight knowing one day I might walk out of prison a free man, says the recently-turned grandfather. .
I want to help raise my grandson, to try and compensate the time I lost with my son.
I know it's not even comparable, but for me it's still a win, says a remorseful Teddy..
During Teddy's stint at Kamiti, former KPL winning coach Ezekiel Akwana, former Tusker FC forward Shem Nyaberi and Thika United's playerPaul Ochieng have been some of his colleagues at the facility for varying durations..
While his team Alaska might have not been among the top teams in the just-concluded first edition of the seven aside Inmates Premier League, Teddy's colleague in prison, Spring, was the running away winner of the Golden Boot Award after scoring 70 goals from 24 rounds of matches played in a murram and gravel surface..
Naivety and ignorance caused me a promising career, recalls a former star at Musa Otieno Foundation Academy.
I was a minor when I was lured into crime by bad company.
I wish I never took that route, adds the former Ofafa Jericho Secondary School student in Nairobi..
Spring was condemned to death in 2019 while still a minor.
Though his charges have since been reduced to life sentence,the 27-year-old is hopeful his case that has since been revisited will get a fair ruling..
I was a minor who wanted things easy and flashy just like my friends and peers who later introduced me to their means of sustaining the high-end lifestyle, recalls Spring who in 2007 had travelled to Norway for a football tournament..
He is relieved his case is being heard again.
I want them to know the 17-year-old of 10 years ago is no more.
I lacked guidance, something that landed me in prison, hopefully I can be a living example of how drastically things can change, Spring says..
SOE declared for St Andrew South Police Division – Bes 100 FM Radio | Simply Da Bes!SOE declared for St Andrew South Police Division.
Prime Minister Andrew Holness on Sunday announced that a state of emergency (SOE) has been declared for the St Andrew South Police Division..
Violence is at epidemic proportions in Jamaica and we should treat it as an epidemic, Holness said at a press briefing at Jamaica House..
Government has as its first responsibility, the preservation of life.
It is important for Governments to ensure that the average citizen feels safe and secure, Holness added..
He said the measure that is being implemented is necessary, and he had advised the Governor General, Sir Patrick Allen, to issue the documentation authorising the SOE..
Flanked by National Security Minister, Dr Horace Chang; Police Commissioner, Major General Antony Anderson; and Jamaica Defence Force (JDF) head, Lieutenant General Rocky Meade, Holness said 70 per cent of all murders being committed in Jamaica are gang-related..
As it relates to deaths, as it relates to criminal activities, there are three factors we have to attend to – dons who lead gangs and those who use guns.
That is the feature – dons, gangs and guns, he said..
In St Andrew South, the main cause of death is gang-related, he elaborated..
He made a case for the SOE by citing that despite measures like the Suppression of Crimes Act and the Gun Court, murders still rose exponentially in the country.
The SOE, he said, has been the only measure that has shown to be able to cause a (significant) decline in murders..
In St James since the state of the tri-parish state of emergency, there have been 17 murders, of which eight are related to domestic interpersonal reasons, he said..
In describing the overall crime situation nationally, especially relative to murders, Holness declared that, This is an epidemic and no one should tell that the country should be satisfied with it..
He pointed to the high murder rate and stated that if those number of persons had died due to a disease, that there would have been emergency measures taken would be a no-brainer..
The truth is that the level of crime is above the capacity of law enforcement to (effectively) respond.
There have been 11,000 murders in the last eight years, and we do not have enough investigators, said Holness..
The Government is employing not just one strategy, but a raft of strategies that must complement each other, he added..
The St Andrew South Police Division encompasses the lower western section of Maxfield Avenue, Spanish Town Road going west from Maxfield Avenue to Washington Boulevard and north towards Molynes Road..
The division has some traditionally volatile communities, including Greenwich Town, Majestic Gardens, Tower Hill, Compound, Waterhouse, Goat Island, Bell Rock, Sherlock Avenue, Brooke Valley, Payne Land and Mongoose Town..
Another person who visited the townhouse last year remembered Mr. Epstein doing work at the mansion while seated at a large dining table in the rear of the house that fit 20 people, with multiple computer monitors and a phone alongside Behind him was a table covered with framed photographs of celebrities and dignitaries, including a signed photograph of former President Bill Clinton..
The visitor to the mansion was greeted by a woman who spoke with an Eastern European accent and led guests up a marble staircase to a study on another floor.
A wall of the room was covered with photographs of famous people, including Woody Allen, and another that Mr. Epstein pointed out was of Crown Prince Mohammed bin Salman of Saudi Arabia..
Mr. Epstein, 66, is accused of engaging in sex acts with young girls from 2002 to 2005 during naked massage sessions and paying them hundreds of dollars in cash, according to an indictment unsealed on Monday..
During the search of his townhouse on Saturday, investigators seized nude photographs of underage girls, federal prosecutors said.
The alleged behavior shocks the conscience, Geoffrey S. Berman, the United States attorney in Manhattan, said on Monday..
Prosecutors said they were moving to seize Mr. Epstein's townhouse. .
Mr. Epstein, however, was not even supposed to become the owner of the opulent stone house on the Upper East Side. .
In 1989, Mr. Epstein's mentor, Leslie H. Wexner, the founder and chairman of L Brands, the parent company of Victoria's Secret and Bath & Body Works, bought the seven-story Beaux-Arts home for $13.2 million.
At the time, it was the highest recorded sale price for a townhouse.
Mr. Wexner then spent at least that much on artwork — including multiple works by Picasso — Art Deco furnishings, Russian antiques, rosewood tables and doors and a gut renovation of the home.
Security devices, including a network of cameras, were installed.
A cellar was divided into separate spaces, one for red wines and another for white.
The renovation was featured on the cover of the December 1995 issue of Architectural Digest.
The townhouse had been a longtime private school and Mr. Wexner spent years converting it into a lavish estate. .
Mr. Wexner, however, never moved in; he decided to stay in Columbus, Ohio, where L Brands has its headquarters. .
But another person did move in: Mr. Epstein.
Les never spent more than two months there, Mr. Epstein told The New York Times in 1996.
The home has a history of going unoccupied by its owner.
Herbert N. Straus, an heir to the Macy's fortune, commissioned the 40-room mansion in the early 1930s and hired the prominent architect Horace Trumbauer to design it.
But Mr. Straus died in 1933, leaving the property unfinished and unoccupied. .
The Straus family gave the residence to a hospital in 1944.
In 1962, the private school, , bought it and converted it into a schoolhouse.
The school, which was started in 1921 with an emphasis on the arts, relocated after Mr. Wexner bought the house.
(It later merged with another private school to start the Birch Wathen Lenox School.).
While Mr. Epstein has tried to maintain a private life, he did allow a reporter for Vanity Fair magazine to visit the mansion , The Talented Mr. Epstein..
The article describes a main hallway that was covered with rows of artificial eyeballs from England that had been made for wounded soldiers. .
The room connected to the hallway was a marble foyer adorned with a painting that resembled works by the French artist Jean Dubuffet.
The host coyly refuses to tell visitors who painted it, the reporter, Vicky Ward, wrote..
The article was published around the same time that he started to recruit underage girls to the mansion, according to the indictment unsealed on Monday. .
Matthew Goldstein and Sarah Maslin Nir contributed reporting..
International Prosecutor Seeks War Crimes Charges Against Mali Suspect.
The prosecutor of the International Criminal Court on Monday asked judges to approve war crimes and crimes against humanity charges against a man suspected of committing atrocities in Timbuktu in Mali.
Al Hassan Ag Abdoul Aziz Ag Mohamed Ag Mahmoud is suspected of crimes including destroying cultural monuments and enforcing policies that led to the sexual enslavement of women and girls, allegedly committed while he acted as the de-facto chief of Islamic police in Timbuktu during a 2012-2013 rebel takeover of the city.
In a hearing to determine whether her case against....
Toa Maoni yako hapa - Add your comment.
ICC Convicts Ntaganda On War Crimes (Today) - The International Criminal Court found former Congolese rebel leader Bosco Ntaganda guilty Monday of all...
The Most Hilarious and Outrageous Fake News About 5G.
Humanity has a history of inventing new and amazing things – and an equally long history of naysayers, critics, and dogmatic thinking.
Back in the day, the dogma said that the Earth is the centre of the universe – the scientists providing evidence for the contrary were routinely burned at stake, stoned or terminated in a similarly horrible fashion.
Later, those who dared to contradict the scientific dogma (yes, it exists) were routinely ridiculed by its representatives – the so-called luminaries of their times.
It was said that aeroplanes will never fly, that trains will shake the uteri out of women's bodies, that watching television makes us stupid, and that mobile phones fry our brains.
You donot need to be a  to see that each new invention brings out hordes of fearmongers and naysayers spreading fake news and lies about pretty much any major new technology that's being implemented.
Today, it's 5G's turn to be on the receiving end of this treatment.
Here are some of the most ridiculous and outrageous claims some people have made about the next generation mobile network..
It is going to microwave your brain.
The myth of mobile phones flooding our bodies – especially our brains – with radiation that will microwave it has emerged at the time 2G – in 1991.
This is a persistent rumour that re-emerges whenever a new generation of mobile communication standard is rolled out. .
The fact is that the frequencies at which mobile phones work have no way of producing any heat in your body.
Actually, a tanning booth is much more dangerous than even the strongest radiation emitted by a mobile phone – no matter if it's 2G, 3G, 4G, even 5G..
It's a CIA/Government conspiracy.
Some groups in the United States see 5G as a conspiracy backed by Google and the US government to conduct mass surveillance of the public not only in the United States but all over the world where this new standard is rolled out.
This is an argument that routinely shows up in Alt-right discussion groups that claim that Google is a communist entity that, hand in hand with the so-called deep state, plans to steal our most cherished secrets through this new mobile technology..
Some have even gone as far as to call a CIA plot that aims to endanger not only human health but the environment, as well.
Oh, and democracy..
Cancer, sickness, death.
While corporations paying off scientists to produce favourable reports and studies is not unheard of, it is becoming increasingly hard to pull off in today's connected world.
Still, there are many who claim that all the studies conducted all around the world that have proven that the radiation of the 5G towers will cause no harm whatsoever are all bought and paid for by Big Telecom – the biggest telecommunication companies around the world..
And that, in fact, radio waves cause cancer, destroy our health, and lead to premature deaths..
Actually, there is a strong scientific consensus on the safety of these frequencies, backed by international organizations like the WHO, and local regulators in every country, that are constantly monitoring all the new technologies being introduced. .
At least nobody says that 5G will cause women's uteri to fall out of their bodies, right?.
$150,7m trade deficit for Zim.
The Naira on Monday traded at N359.3 to the dollar at the parallel market in Lagos..
The Pound Sterling and the Euro closed at N463 and N407 respectively..
At the Bureau De Change (BDC) segment, the naira exchanged at N360 to the dollar, while the Pound Sterling and the Euro closed at N463 and N407, respectively..
Trading at the investors window saw the naira closing at N360.89 to the dollar as market turnover stood at 98.03 million dollars..
The News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) reports that the naira had remained stable at the foreign exchange market due largely to the interventions of the CBN..
The Apex bank has not relented in its weekly injection of Forex to the market in the defence of the naira..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Mitsubishi Motors Corp. said Monday it will invest in Indonesian ride-hailing and on-demand delivery service startup company Gojek, hoping to capitalize on its competitive edge in automobile businesses in the region..
The investment in Gojek group, which is expanding its business not only in Indonesia but other Southeast Asian countries, will be made along with trading house Mitsubishi Corp., the Japanese automaker said.
The three companies have signed a memorandum of understanding to discuss joint projects on new services..
While details of the investment and services have not been disclosed, Mitsubishi Motors Chairman Osamu Masuko said in a press release that Mitsubishi group's long and strong presence and brand power in Southeast Asia, as well as Gojek's diversified and unique business potentials are expected to bring big synergies and innovation that boost growth of the three parties..
Gojek, an on-demand multi-service platform technology group, was established in 2010 and has evolved through the launch of its mobile phone application in 2015 that provides motorbike delivery and ride-sharing services..
The company, which offers a wide range of services including food delivery and logistics, now operates in over 50 cities across Southeast Asia, according to its homepage..
According to Reuters Arabic, French President Emmanuel Macron's top diplomatic adviser will travel to Iran on Tuesday in an effort to de-escalate tensions between Washington and Tehran..
This will be the second visit to Tehran by the French diplomat, Emmanuel Bonne, after his June 19 and holding talks with Iranian officials..
Iran's step-by-step actions to reduce its JCPOA commitments came after the Europeans did not meet Iran's legitimate demands under the nuclear deal..
This is while Iranian Foreign Ministry Spokesman Abbas Mousavi said in his presser today that the visit of the French official is likely to take place in the coming days..
A statement by the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) published on Monday evening confirmed that Iran had enriched uranium beyond a 3.67% purity limit set by its deal with major powers, confirming a move previously announced by Tehran..
The spokesman for the Atomic Energy Organization of Iran (AEOI) Behrooz Kamalvandi said earlier on Monday that the level had passed 4.5%..
Iran stresses that the reductions in commitments do not violate the nuclear deal, but they are based on paragraphs 26 and 36 of the agreement..
Rivers State Governor Nyesom Ezenwon Wike has triumphed once again, as the Rivers State Governorship Election Tribunal, sitting in Port Harcourt, has dismissed the petition filed by the African Action Congress (AAC) governorship candidate in the 2019 general election, Biokpomabo Awara, against the Rivers State Governor, his party the Peoples Democratic Party ( PDP) and the Independent National Electoral Commission..
The Tribunal presided over by Justice K.
A. Orjiako dismissed the petition on the ground that it was deemed abandoned on the ground of Paragraph 4 of the First Schedule of the Electoral Act..
According to the Tribunal, the petition was deemed to be technically abandoned because the AAC and its Candidate failed to meet key procedural requirements as to applying for pre-hearing information..
The three man panel led by Justice K.
A Ojiako declared that petition number EPT/RS/GOV/03/2019 was incompetent and therefore, dismissed it..
Earlier, the tribunal struck out applications by the AAC Governorship Candidate, Engr.
Biokpomabo Awara, seeking that he be separated from all joint applications previously made with the party..
Recall that the AAC recently adopted Mr Henry Bello to represent it at the tribunal after the former counsel, Tawo Tawo, a Senior Advocate of Nigeria withdrew from the matter, with a notice of change of counsel filed the tribunal..
This application came in after the AAC brought in another counsel to handle its matter at the tribunal..
The three man panel led by Justice K.
A Orjiako, after going through arguments in the Awara, AAC suit against Governor Wike, ruled that all applications filed by the 1st Petitioner (Tawo Tawo, former AAC counsel) are struck out..
Justice Orjiako further noted that the application by the petitioner (counsel for Awara; Mustafa Ibrahim) has been found to be an abuse of court process and the panel also struck out the application filed by the petitioner for pre-hearing of the matter..
The grounds for the dismissal of the AAC Governorship Petition against the re-election of Governor Wike by the Rivers State Governorship Election Tribunal is not new under the present dispensation, as the Lagos State Governorship Election Tribunal also dismissed Petitions One and Two against the election of Lagos State Governor on similar ground..
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window).
Click to share on WhatsApp (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Telegram (Opens in new window).
Click to share on LinkedIn (Opens in new window).
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window).
Click to print (Opens in new window).
Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window).
On 16 July 1969, astronauts Neil Armstrong, Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins lifted off from Launch Pad 39A at 's Kennedy Space Centre in Florida on a journey to the moon and into history..
Four days later, while Collins orbited the moon in the command module, Armstrong and Aldrin landed Apollo 11's lunar module, Eagle, on the moon's Sea of Tranquility, becoming the first humans to set foot on the lunar surface..
On 20 July 1969, with the simple words the eagle has landed, John F. Kennedy's dream of seeing man walk on the moon before 1970 came true.
Unfortunately, JFK did not live long enough to hear Neil Armstrong say those famous words which calmly came over the static filled speakers at NASA's Mission Control in Houston, as he had been assassinated in 1963..
The phrase, The eagle has landed, was second in importance as far as the world was concerned, to Armstrong's famous words, That's one small step for man; one giant leap for mankind.
But as far as the mission was concerned it was really his announcement of landing the module in the Sea of Tranquility that was important due to the difficulty in landing the craft.
Had they not managed the landing successfully, there would not have been anyone walking on the moon, planting a flag or making any statements at all..
Highlights of events in which NASA is participating.
On 16 July, Apollo 11 Launch Reflection at Pad 39A will air live on NASA Television and the agency's .
Apollo 11 astronauts Buzz Aldrin and Michael Collins will reunite at the historic launch pad where Apollo 11 began its mission 50 years ago for a question-and-answer session with Kennedy Centre Director Bob Cabana, beginning at 9.15 am EDT.
This will be followed by a visit to the Launch Control Centre and Firing Room 1 to connect with Apollo-era launch controllers and those who will launch the  missions that are part of America's Moon to Mars approach for human space exploration..
NASA and the Smithsonian National Air and Space Museum are hosting the , a free three-day event on the National Mall in Washington from July 18 to 20.
The event will include exhibits, speakers, demonstrations and fun activities for families.
NASA researchers, scientists and engineers will showcase NASA's newest technologies and innovations that will take space exploration to the Moon and on to Mars..
Dedication of U.S. Postal Service's 1969 Moon Landing Stamps.
The U.S. Postal Service will celebrate the 50th anniversary of Apollo 11 and humanity's first steps on the Moon with two Forever stamps..
NASA's Giant Leaps: Past and Future on NASA TV.
Giant Leaps: Past and Future will air at 1 to 3 pm EDT on NASA TV and the agency's , and will be simulcast on the Discovery Science Channel.
Hosted from the agency's Kennedy Space Centre, the show will salute the heroes of Apollo and discuss the agency's future plans..
Nobel Laureate, Prof. Wole Soyinka and Ooni of Ife, Oba Adeyeye Ogunwusi, Ojaja II, have called on Nigerians to defend the sanctity of their ancestral land..
They urged the people to recognise that the internal colonisation project is ever recurrent, as there are backward, primitive, undeveloped minds that have failed to overcome delusion belief in sectarian domination as the key to social existence..
In a communiqué jointly issued and made available to The Guardian yesterday after the visit of the Ooni to Soyinka's home in Abeokuta on July 4, 2019, the duo asserted that the country deteriorated to unprecedented levels of barbarity, contempt for human lives and a defiant trampling on civic entitlements..
The colonial contraption known as Nigeria cannot survive another upheaval in the nature of the civil war of Biafran secession.
All efforts must therefore be made to anticipate and douse socio-political flare-ups that advance the chances of a recurrence of such a conflict, no matter how reduced in scale, its devastating effects on Nigerian humanity, and erosion of the prospects of continuance as a cohesive entity..
We must stress that the present development is not new.
Numerous times, voices have been raised, and resistance mounted against the evolution of internal heirs to external colonialism, the communiqué stated..
They, however, charged Nigerians to convoke a series of frank encounters, across various interests and concerns, to debate and determine in full freedom the future structure of their nation, most especially with a view to attaining a genuine, decentralised functional governance arrangement, adding: We propose a structure that enables the constitutive parts to progress at their own pace, determine their own priorities, and encourage creative exploitation of their resources for the benefit of their peoples.
Such encounters will simultaneously address the numerous anomalies that plague the nation..
Johannesburg Central Police Station, in partnership with various organisations, embarked on an anti-drugs awareness campaign on 26 June.
The campaign was led by Foundation for a and, along with community patrollers, they distributed anti-drugs booklets to Joburg communities..
They visited transport facilities such as the Bree Taxi Rank, MTN Taxi Rank better known as Noord and proceeded to the Fontana SPAR before ending at the Hillbrow Police Station..
Police also reached out to the displaced people in the Johannesburg CBD and sent a strong warning to drug peddlers saying their day will soon come..
Johannesburg Central Police Station's members together with their partners, Foundation for a Drug-Free World and community patrollers, distribute anti-drug flyers in the to raise awareness about the effects of drugs in the community. .
A private legal practitioner has urged agitations against the construction of a new Parliament House to continue despite attempts to jettison the project following public uproar..
I support the demonstration; it helps.
It will ensure that next time before people come out with such expensive and unnecessary projects, they will think twice, Martin Kpebu said on Newfile, a Joy News current affairs programme..
Last week the Parliament of Ghana courted public anger when it suddenly announced plans to erect a much comfortable multi-purpose 450 seater capacity chamber at a cost of $ 200m..
Sporadic agitation which greeted the announcement has seen three protesters arrested after screaming from the public gallery drop that chamber..
The three are all members of pressure group Economic Fighters League – Ernesto Kofi Yeboah, Abeiku Adams and a third who is yet to be identified..
A social media movement # dropthatchamber has announced future demonstrations.
This is notwithstanding the fact that parliament said the idea has been shelved..
Martin Kpebu has urged them on.
A sustained demonstration, he said, will also sure that the project is nipped in the bud properly.
We just want to make it clear to the parliamentarian that they should put that idea aside for now, He added..
Wesley Reece van der Merwe (16) is a talented rugby player from Ladysmith who has been selected for the U/16 VKB International Rugby Tour to be held in Italy in December..
Currently a learner at Voortrekker High School in Bethlehem, Wesley was selected by a panel of professional selectors based on his exceptional performances during a recent rugby tour in Frankfort, where he played for Oud Skoliere Rugby Club..
Wesley will have the opportunity to travel to Venice, Lignano, Treviso, Trento, Ronchi and Maranello on the upcoming rugby tour..
The tour will offer him not only sporting opportunities outside of South Africa, but also an experience of life abroad.
Being selected for the tour is something very big indeed for young Wesley, as he is the only learner to be selected from his school..
Landile talks about running being her sacred place.
Ladysmith runners take on the Comrades Marathon.
Wesley, now in Grade 9, started playing rugby in Grade 1.
He was lucky enough to receive a bursary to attend Voortrekker High School..
Wesley now needs help to get to Italy and make his dream a reality.
Any funding and assistance will be appreciated so he can cover the expenses of the tour.
Wesley says he is hardworking and dedicated, and also willing to assist anyone at their business so he can raise the money to go on this life-changing tour..
For more information on Wesley and the rugby tour, feel free to contact Gustav Meyer on 0826432809 or Correlie van der Merwe on 0833716432.
Click to receive news links via or the latest news, visit our .
Tennis legend Serena Williams may never get a better chance of equalling Margaret Court's Grand Slam title record of 24 with the Wimbledon quarter-finals bereft of the leading lights in women's tennis.
The 37-year-old seven-time champion is moving into something resembling her best form after an unconvincing first week but will not take Tuesday's quarter-final opponent Alison Riske lightly..
That would be wise after the 29-year-old American ousted world number one Ashleigh Barty in the last 16.Barty was then followed out of the tournament by third seed Karolina Pliskova, two-time champion Petra Kvitova and the people's favourite 15-year-old Coco Gauff..
It leaves the women's title wide open but Williams carries more than just talent onto the court despite her ageing legs she still appears to hold a fear factor over most of her opponents..
Riske, who is due to get married after Wimbledon, did not seem to fall into that category when she said: Bring it on!.
However, it is one thing to say it after a famous victory and quite another when facing Williams over the net..
Williams, though, knows Riske relatively well — they have played doubles together — and is aware on grass she can hold her own as well as the fact the last time she faced a relatively unheralded American, Sofia Kenin at the French Open, she lost..
She's (Riske) a fighter on the court, said Williams..
She's playing really great, especially on the grass.
She's attacking that ball really well.
She doesnot let anything limit her..
Williams is ominously talking up her improvement as the tournament has gone on after a knee problem affected her clay court campaign..
The rust is definitely wearing off, she said..
Most of all I feel confident that I can actually move and I donot have to, like, go for winners so soon because I'm in pain..
It's like, Oh, now I can just play my game, hit shots, not have to worry about anything else..
It's good when your mind is clear and you can just play..
'Life is so nice to me' .
Waiting for Williams or Riske could well be Britain's French Open semi-finalist Johanna Konta, who must beat Czech veteran Barbora Strycova to reach her second Wimbledon semi-final..
Strycova, who beat Konta in their only previous meeting, had been talking of retirement prior to her 17th Wimbledon campaign..
The rest of the quarter-finals have just two seeds involved — number seven Simona Halep and eighth seeded Elina Svitolina..
Former world number one Halep — who has never been beyond the quarter-finals at Wimbledon — plays China's Zhang Shuai, who was close to retirement in 2015, whilst Svitolina takes on Pliskova's conqueror Karolina Muchova of the Czech Republic..
Zhang's change of mind over retiring was down to advice from her doubles partner and close friend Australian Sam Stosur..
That got me to thinking maybe, okay, I'm going to the Australian Open one more time, one more try, she recalled of the chat with Stosur..
I'm really, really happy I tried one more time, and also we won this year in the Australian Open doubles..
So life is so nice to me.
Of all the players to go out on Monday, Barty's is undoubtedly the biggest boon for Williams..
Having looked so assured in the first week — and a decent bet to end nearly four decades of Australian being without a women's singles champion she lacked the answers when required as Riske fought back to win 3-6, 6-2, 6-2..
There was one consolation for Barty as Pliskova could have taken her number one spot but the Czech third seed went out as well in a marathon duel, beaten by Muchova 4-6, 7-5, 13-11..
It is a tough one to swallow but I lost to a better player, said Barty, who had been hoping to become the first Australian champion since Evonne Goolagong Cawley won her second title in 1980.However, the Australian added: The sun's still going to come up tomorrow..
Some U.S. congressmen are upping the pressure on Lebanon to cut its connections with Hezbollah after years of U.S. policy that has neglected the issue..
The rapper has already had to cancel shows in Norway, Poland, Ireland and Britain. .
Sweden's Supreme Court on Monday rejected an appeal by US rapper ASAP Rocky against his detention over a Stockholm street brawl despite his lawyer's plea that the star was not a flight risk and protests by fans and leading hip-hop stars..
On Friday, a Swedish district court decided the 30-year-old, whose real name is Rakim Mayers, should be kept in custody while prosecutors investigate a June 30 brawl, thereby putting on hold the artist's current European tour..
Mayers' lawyer Henrik Olsson Lilja immediately challenged the decision but it was rejected by the court of appeals..
The lawyer told AFP his client subsequently lodged an appeal at the Supreme Court..
The Supreme Court only accepts a fraction of cases submitted, taking only those it thinks will provide guidance for the lower courts..
The district court had agreed with prosecutors that Mayers was a flight risk and so should be kept in custody during the investigation..
But Olsson Lilja said the prosecutor had not justified the flight risk argument, and the continued custody also needed to be weighed against the consequences for his client — both issues that could interest the Supreme Court..
They havenot tried this issue in this way before, he added..
However the request was promptly denied on Monday afternoon, with the Supreme Court stating that it found no reason to review the case, local media reported..
The district court's decision means Mayers can be held in custody for two weeks, while the case is investigated.
After that, it would require another hearing to extend his detention..
The rapper has already had to cancel shows in Norway, Poland, Ireland and Britain..
Fans, as well as fellow musicians, have publicly urged Swedish authorities to release the American entertainer..
Rapper Travis Scott shouted Free Rocky during his performance at the Wireless Festival in London, a festival where ASAP Rocky was scheduled to perform..
Others have taken to social media under hashtags like #FreeRocky or #FreeFlacko, invoking one of ASAP Rocky's nicknames..
American hip-hop duo EarthGang, who have a concert in Stockholm planned for September, tweeted #FreeFlacko or we boycotting Sweden..
Mayers was detained last week following an incident on June 30 which was partly captured in a video published by US celebrity news outlet TMZ..
The rapper, who was in Stockholm for a concert, can be seen throwing a young man into the street then aiming several punches at him while he is still down..
On July 2, Mayers posted his own videos on Instagram, which he said showed the lead-up to the clash..
In those, the young man can be seen arguing with the musician over a pair of headphones, and the artist repeatedly asks that the man and his friend stop following them..
Mayers was born in New York and had a breakthrough in 2011 with the release of the mixtape Live.
In celebration of Mandela Day and Month, the Bedfordview and Edenvale NEWS has once again teamed up with Karaglen Shopping Centre and Karaglen SuperSpar to help two community organisations in dire need..
The partnership aims to help animals and people in need by collecting much-needed donations..
Donations for Edenvale SPCA and Khanyisa Soup Kitchen can be dropped off outside the entrance to Karaglen SuperSpar during shopping hours..
Angel Mdlalose, manager of the Karaglen SuperSpar, who has assisted the NEWS in previous Mandela Day projects, said she is very excited about the initiative..
On Mandela Day, the donations will be taken to the two organisations..
Stevie Wonder says he will undergo a kidney transplant later this year.
The 69-year-old music legend disclosed the news to a concert crowd in London on Saturday night, the BBC reported..
The winner of 25 Grammy Awards addressed his health after playing his song Superstition, the report said..
I'm all good, I'm all good, all good, I have a donor and it's all good, he said, according to the BBC.
I want you to know, I came here to give you my love and thank you for your love.
I love you and God bless you..
Last Wednesday, the Detroit Free Press reported that Wonder was battling a serious but manageable health issue, citing information from sources close to the Michigan-born singer..
He's got some health challenges, but he doesnot want a big PR thing out of this, musician Joan Belgrave, a longtime friend of Wonder, told the Free Press..
Wonder said he planned to do three more concerts then take a break before he undergoes surgery in September, the New York Post reported..
The singer, who has been blind since just after his birth, in part because he was born prematurely, has been performing since childhood and has sold more than 100 million records over his long career.
The office of the Governor of Lagos State has denied withdrawal of $470 million to finance Federal Government's delegation to watch the Nigeria-Cameroon match at the ongoing African Cup of Nations( AFCON)..
Lagos State chapter of the People's Democratic Party (PDP) had issued a press release claiming that the State Governor, Mr. Babajide Sanwo-Olu withdrew the sum of $470m to take himself and some persons including APC Chieftains to watch the Nigeria-Cameroon match at the ongoing African Cup of Nations (AFCON)..
The Lagos State Governor's Deputy Chief Press Secretary Mr Gboyega Akosile in a statement said there is nothing farther to the truth than this statement, which follows the same pattern of falsehoods usually dished out to the public by the PDP and its mouthpiece..
He noted that for the avoidance of doubt,  His Excellency, Mr. Babajide Sanwo-Olu did not make any withdrawal for the purpose of attending the AFCON in Egypt..
It is a public knowledge that Mr. Sanwo-Olu was named among some other dignitaries to attend the ongoing African football fiesta in Egypt,he explained..
Members of the Federal Government delegation to AFCON 2019 according to him are Dr. Ahmed Lawan, as leader of the delegation, Speaker of the House of Representatives, Mr. Femi Gbajabiamila and the Secretary to the Government of the Federation, Mr. Boss Mustapha..
He added that governors nominated and approved by President Muhammadu Buhari are His Excellency, Mr. Babajide Sanwo-Olu and Dr. Ifeanyi Okowa of Delta State..
Also on the list are Central Bank of Nigeria (CBN) Governor, Mr. Godwin Emefiele, President of the Nigeria Olympic Committee (NOC), Mr. Habu Gumel and a Representative of the Presidency; Captain Hosa Okunbo..
The Permanent Secretary in the Federal Ministry of Youth and Sports, Olusade Adesola and Muhammad Gambo, the ministry's Director of Facilities, are also members of the delegation, which include a former Minister of Youth and Sports, Solomon Dalung, to complete the 11-man list..
He arguedIs it not laughable therefore that PDP will resort to issuing press statements based on fake news on social media?
Does it not stand logic on its head to allege that Governor Sanwo-Olu spent $470m to fund a trip that he was nominated as a delegate? .
Akosile warned:As we have always stated, we will again suggest to the Lagos state PDP and her spokesman to always fact check before putting pen on paper.
Opposition politics is not built on lies and fake news..
Source: Nigerian NewsDirect.
A shocking violent brawl between a family broke out at Disneyland in  this weekend, and the entire fight was caught on camera.  .
Two men and two women got into a heated fight where they threw punches, dragged hair and spat in each other's faces while perusing Toontown in Disneyland with children in strollers on Saturday afternoon..
In the four-minute video a man in a pink shirt says, 'Donot disrespect my daughter...I donot give a f**k b***h', leading a woman in a white shirt to spit in his face. .
Her spitting insult leads the man to repeatedly hit her and a man next to her in the face, igniting the fight. .
A violent fight between family members broke out at California's Disneyland on Saturday afternoon and it was all caught on camera.
The fight started when the woman in white spat in the face of the man in pink.
The woman then screams 'Hold my daughter!' and pushes her double stroller to the side as the two men jump around each other with their fists raised. .
As the two start punching each other children are heard crying in the background and another woman enters the scene yelling 'Stop it!
Then the woman in white with the braids gets into a tiff with a woman in a brown shirt, pulling on her hair.
As the two fight they push the elderly woman who was sitting in a motor chair earlier to the ground. .
The man in pink returns and says 'You got what you wanted...
Let's go momma'  referring to the woman on the ground. .
Then he continues to slap the woman in braids, swinging her around until she falls to the ground. .
'I donot care about no video!
I'm ready to go to jail tonight' he yells, his pink T-shirt visibly torn up from his fight. .
Bystanders then flock to the woman sprawled on the ground and keep the man in the pink shirt at bay. .
Kim Kardashian considers renaming her figure fixing brand...
Melania Trump takes 'Be Best' trip to West Virginia in....
Then the man in pink starts to hit the woman in brown saying, 'You hit my momma?' and throws punches to her face and body until she falls to the ground and pulls her hair. .
Three men then pull him away and bring him to the ground and keep him there until Disney guards arrive on the scene.    .
Anaheim police are investigating the incident after it was flagged to them Sunday and are interviewing family members portrayed in the video. .
Officers say none of the victims were cooperative and were escorted away from the park. .
Authorities say they are pursuing a criminal case. .
Disney confirmed to DailyMail.com that the brawl took place on Saturday and said 'We do not condone this behavior'..
Love Island's Amy has QUIT the show and left the villa after Curtis broke her heart and started flirting with Maura .
Wimbledon 2019: Alexandra Burke, 30, makes first public outing with footballer beau Angus Macdonald, 26...
THREE WEEKS after split from fiancé  .
Katy Perry and Orlando Bloom PICTURE EXCLUSIVE: Superstar wows in a floral swimsuit as she and her shirtless fiancé relax on French beach .
Love Island: Danny and Jourdan are AXED from the villa in shock dumping... but eliminated couple insist they WILL continue dating away from show .
Love Island's Lucie breaks down in TEARS and is comforted by Jordan after crush Tommy asks Molly-Mae to be his girlfriend .
Love Island's Amy blasts ex Curtis for not being a 'manly man' in last final dig... ahead of her quitting the show  Had a savage dig at her ex .
Kendall Jenner showcases her supermodel figure in a sunshine yellow bikini as she soaks up the sun on the beach in Mykonos  .
A global first fake tan that protects you from the sun: The must have beauty product this summer that all the stars love .
Ruth Langsford returns to social media after her sister Julia's death... as she congratulates Gemma Atkinson and Gorka Marquez on their baby .
EXCLUSIVE: Meghan Markle in talks with Vogue to have column focusing on charity work, as Amal Clooney 'encouraged Duchess to promote  philanthropy' .
Kerry Katona PICTURE EXCLUSIVE: Singer wears 'I'm trying my best' badge as she is seen with daughter DJ for first time since girl's father died of overdose .
Kevin Spacey PICTURE EXCLUSIVE: Actor hugs diners at London restaurant after man who accused him of sexual assault refuses to give evidence .
Sarah Jessica Parker relaxes in the Hamptons... after revealing harassment from a 'big movie star' almost drove her to quit a production .
Kendall Jenner does the Bottle Cap challenge while on a jet ski in Greece... as bikini clad model reveals pal Hailey Bieber 'asked for it' .
Pregnant Myleene Klass goes topless in her back garden as her boyfriend Simon Motson helps make a plaster cast of her baby bump  .
Love Island USA: Inside the stunning villa in Fiji where Islanders will search for love... with the iconic hideaway designed by Jonathan Adler .
Amanda Holden reveals Hollywood star Thomas Haden Church saved her husband Chris Hughes' life after he choked on pasta while dining out .
Wimbledon 2019: Ant McPartlin and Eleanor Tomlinson jump out of their seats as they enthusiastically cheer on British number one Johanna Konta .
'It gives me anxiety': Tearful Kourtney Kardashian questions her life ahead of turning 40 on Keeping Up With The Kardashians  Showed her vulnerability  .
Angelina Jolie looks elegant in a negligee as she models on a balcony in Paris for picture-perfect perfume advert .
Game Of Thrones star Maisie Williams looks loved up as she holds hands with her boyfriend Reuben Selby after enjoying a day of tennis at Wimbledon .
Kim Kardashian flaunts her cleavage in low-cut strapless top with a blonde wig to announce her new KKW Beauty Sooo Fire Collection .
Kourtney Kardashian, 40, wishes her daughter Penelope Disick a happy 7th birthday with sweet throwback photos .
Kendall Jenner sizzles in a skimpy silver bikini as she parties up a storm with newly-single fellow model Shanina Shaik on Mykonos beach .
Kris Jenner, 63, shows off her swimsuit in a statement sheer dress as she holds hands with Corey Gamble, 38, during picturesque Portofino break  .
Amber Rose tenderly pats her baby burgeoning bump while out with boyfriend Alexander Edwards  Was glowing as she stepped out on Sunday .
Victoria Beckham shares a sweet picture of daughter Harper behind the scenes from her new shoot after teasing fans with a 'secret project'  .
Chloe Ferry 'QUITS Geordie Shore again in protest after boyfriend Sam Gowland is suspended over violent bust-up in the house' .
Love Island SPOILER: Shock twist set to rock the villa as TWO couples will be booted off the show in dramatic dumping .
Jeremy McConnell is set to become a father again with girlfriend Katie McCreath... as reality star says he feels 'sickened' by his former drug use  .
Kim Kardashian poses with son Saint, three, in sweet throwback snap from their Costa Rica vacation  Posted snaps from her tropical vacation  .
Love Island SPOILER: Furious Amy accuses 'dishonest' Maura of warning her off ex Curtis to 'swoop in' for herself in tense showdown .
Pretty in pink!
Pippa Middleton dons a £725 Stella McCartney dress and matching hat as she joins brother James for her first Wimbledon outing this year .
EXCLUSIVE: David and Victoria Beckham look glum as they watch Barbra Streisand's BST show (but the Spice Girl at least tries to have a bop in her seat) .
Georgia Harrison THROWS A BOOK at Stephen Bear and PUNCHES him as the couple are seen having a blazing row while on holiday in Thailand .
Wimbledon 2019: Ant McPartlin falls into fits of laughter as he and Anne-Marie Corbett enjoy a very public date at Centre Court .
Wimbledon 2019: Will Poulter holds hands with his girlfriend Yasmeen Scott as close couple enjoy rare public outing .
Wimbledon 2019: Myleene Klass displays her baby bump in a patterned wrap dress as she visits Centre Court with partner Simon Motson .
Wimbledon 2019: Emily Atack looks effortlessly glamorous in a poppy print summer dress as she is reunited with I'm A Celeb star Ant McPartlin .
Wimbledon 2019: Frank Lampard's ex Elen Rivas turns heads in belted jumpsuit as she joins lookalike daughter Luna on day seven of the tournament .
Wimbledon 2019: Rebel Wilson is chic in a red tie-waist shirt dress as she makes a stylish return to the tennis tournament  .
Wimbledon 2019: Sienna Miller tucks into a bowl of strawberries and cream as she joins pal Poppy Delevingne on day seven of the tournament .
Wimbledon 2019: Felicity Jones wears all-white as she joins husband Charles Guard on day seven of the tournament .
Ferne McCann flaunts her washboard abs in a pink crop top and leggings as she heads to a workout  Working up a sweat .
Teresa Guidice, 47, and her daughter Gia, 18, could pass for SISTERS as they pose side-by-side... while husband Joe has yet to be released from ICE .
Kim Kardashian reveals her Met Gala corset left her with indentations on her stomach and back: 'I have never felt pain like that in my life' .
Emily Ratajkowski sizzles in low cut crop top showing off abs while out for walk with husband in NYC  Caught the eye on Monday  .
Diane Kruger dresses down in a leather jacket and jeans as she films a high octane scene for her upcoming all-female espionage thriller 355 on the streets of Paris .
Disney Channel star Cameron Boyce suffered from epilepsy and was struggling to cope with seizures before he died from a spasm in his sleep .
Beyoncé is majestic in new Lion King cast photo ... but fans demand to know what happened to missing Mufasa as James Earl Jones is absent .
Sarah Paulson will not be starring in season nine of American Horror Story: 1984 after working on the show since the premiere .
Renee Zellweger transforms into Judy Garland in the first full-length trailer for the biopic about the Wizard Of Oz actress during her 1968 concert .
Poldark meets Fleabag or the first female Timelord we SHOULD have had...
Suranne Jones gave the performance of the year in Gentleman Jack  .
Charlize Theron and Helen Mirren will return for Fast & Furious 9, Vin Diesel reveals in Instagram video  On Monday the star took to social media .
Lily James sports blonde cropped wig to transform into a naive narrator as filming for period drama Rebecca gets underway in Devon .
Kevin Spacey's accuser speaks publicly for the first time: Man who accused star of groping him appears in court to explain why his cell phone is missing  .
Wendy Williams diagnosed with swelling condition lymphedema which requires her to sit at a decompression machine for 45 minutes a day .
Whoopi Goldberg, 63, blames herself for her three failed marriages: 'I tried it but it wasnot for me...
I was never really in love' .
Celebs Go Dating's Anna Williamson announces she's pregnant with her second child   .
Abbey Clancy shares sweet snap of her five-week-old 'little pudding'... as model continues to keep the baby boy's name a secret .
Mario Lopez proudly shares photo of 'healthy and beautiful' baby boy after wife gives birth to third child  Named Santino Rafael Lopez .
Victoria Beckham teases 'secret project coming very very soon' as she showcases a 'clean' look on set of photo shoot for long-awaited venture .
Vanessa Hudgens plants a loving kiss on boyfriend Austin Butler on romantic cruise   Captured the romantic moment as they sat oh the front of a powerboat .
Sofia Vergara flaunts her flat midriff in strapless crop top and bikini bottoms while on holiday in Italy .
Ashley Tisdale poses in her bra as she kisses husband while saying 'I love you' after he made her 34th birthday 'special' .
Shannen Doherty, 48, looks better than ever on the set of Beverly Hills, 90210 reboot with Brian Austin Green, Jason Priestley and Ian Ziering .
Love Island: Ofcom will not investigate 700 complaints over Maura's 'predatory' pursuit of Tommy    Fans complained the  model 'crossed the line' .
Love Island star Anna's lookalike sister Mandi brands jilted Ovie 'bitter' as viewers slam her as 'toxic' and a 'hypocrite' amid 'gaslighting' row .
Rio Ferdinand looks all partied out as he jets out of Bacelona clutching doll bearing fiancée Kate Wright's face after fun-filled stag do .
Angelina Jolie wields her power as she takes on Michelle Pfeiffer after Elle Fanning gets engaged in new Maleficent: Mistress Of Evil trailer .
Little Women: Emma Watson bonds with on-screen sisters Saoirse Ronan and Florence Pugh as they engage in prayer in new film stills .
Tamsin Greig canot contain her laughter between scenes as films new ITV drama Belgravia in Edinburgh .
Party girls!
Newly-single Shanina Shaik dances on tables with Kendall Jenner in Mykonos after filing for divorce from husband of one year DJ Ruckus .
'I'm so freaked out': Phillip Schofield is left in shock as Rochelle Humes falls into a TRANCE during mind reading segment on This Morning .
'The response was so weird': Simon Pegg addresses THAT shirtless picture of his ripped torso and insists it wasnot meant to be 'aspirational' .
Gary Lineker, 58, looks in high spirits as shirtless star enjoys a beach day on family holiday in Ibiza .
Adrien Brody hilariously turns a blind eye to a nude paddle-boarder who confidently sails past as he hits the beach in Ibiza .
Professor Green is 'dating Deep State actress Karima McAdams' after quietly splitting from ex Milly Gattegno .
Adriana Lima wears stunning cut-out coral dress as she holds hands with Turkish businessman Emir Uyar as they continue their getaway in Greece .
Love Island SPOILER: Tommy asks Molly-Mae to be his girlfriend thanks to heartfelt romantic gesture as they become first official couple  .
Love Island SPOILER: Anton is terrified to discover Belle's father is gangster-movie star Tamer Hassan as the pair go on their first 'cheesy' date together .
'Shut your mouth, Marvin!': Peter Andre left in stitches as wife Emily MacDonagh does impression of Love Island's Maura .
Wimbledon 2019: Yesterday star Himesh Patel cosies up to mystery brunette on day seven... three years after his EastEnders departure .
Wimbledon 2019: Nicole Richie looks stylish in floral maxi dress as she and husband Joel Madden arrive for 'Manic Monday' .
Wimbledon 2019: Spencer Matthews risks awkward run in with his Made In Chelsea ex Lucy Watson and her boyfriend James Dunmore .
Lewis Hamilton puts on a tactile display with stunning Instagram model Zahra Elise during night out in LA .
Cristiano Ronaldo's girlfriend Georgina Rodriguez plants a kiss on the footballer as he sleeps in sweet social media snap .
Katie Price GAGS as she finds her I'm A Celeb rucksack from 2004 while clearing out... as she admits she canot remember kid's birthdays .
Amanda Holden flashes some thigh in a plunging lemon yellow wrap dress after her radio hosting gig .
Baby Archie Harrison makes his first appearance in the official Court Circular following his top secret christening. .
Melanie Griffith, 61, exhibits her incredibly toned physique in an orange striped bikini as she enjoys a luxury yacht ride in Ibiza .
Joely Richardson reveals she helped save a man's life when filming new series The Rook after he 'jumped off a bridge into the river Thames' .
Olympic rower James Cracknell and TV presenter Beverley Turner officially end 17-year marriage - with divorce expected to be granted next month  .
Ricky Gervais blasts 'absolute filth' Spanish festival where horses are wrestled, dragged around by the tail and have manes hacked off in front of a crowd  .
Love Island: Viewers claim the show is FIXED as former flames Curtis and Amy are spotted holding hands just days after bitter split .
Love Island: Maura's family BEG fans to keep her in ahead of imminent dumping as they reveal the Republic of Ireland canot vote for 'our girl' .
Zendaya pays tribute to Grown Ups star Cameron Boyce, 20, following his tragic death  'Absolutely heartbreaking' .
Kim Kardashian renames her figure fixing brand Solutionwear after insisting she 'had really innocent intentions' calling the line Kimono .
Christie Brinkley, 65, models blue gown in behind-the-scenes photos from a magazine shoot: 'I feel like Cinderella'  She's a vision in blue .
Alessandra Ambrosio shares a passionate kiss with boyfriend Nicolo Oddi as they stock up on wine and snacks in Ibiza .
Bethenny Frankel radiates glamour in a tasteful one piece swimsuit in Nantucket... after modeling a red bikini on the 4th Of July  Relaxing holiday getaway .
Emma Roberts takes a walk on the wild side in leopard print T-shirt and oversized red sunglasses after date with new beau Garrett Hedlund .
Rylan Clark-Neal looks completely unrecognisable as he posts a 10-year old throwback picture of himself during a sunshine break in Ibiza .
Gemma Collins oozes confidence as she poses in a white strapless swimsuit to promote body positivity .
Boris Becker's treasured tennis memorabilia including Wimbledon trophy he won in 1985 attracts auction bids after star was declared bankrupt  .
Harry and Meghan's Instagram following leaps to 9M after Archie's christening - and they've almost caught up with Kate and William .
Harry Maguire puts on a VERY giddy display as he playfully wrestles his mother Zoe into the sea during fun-filled family holiday in Ibiza .
Michelle Obama admits she is 'surprised Malia and Sasha have any friends' after growing up in the White House surrounded by armed Secret Service  .
Priyanka Chopra sets pulses racing in sultry swimsuit photos taken by hubby Nick Jonas during Tuscany vacation .
Kate Moss EXCLUSIVE: Model hangs out by the VIP toilets as she watches Barbra Streisand storm the stage at British Summer Time  .
'I could have been the first Jewish princess': Barbra Streisand references THAT relationship with Prince Charles... years after 'affair' claims .
Elizabeth Hurley, 53, displays her enviable assets and toned midriff in skimpy yellow swimwear to celebrate National Bikini Day .
Inside Ant and Dec's property hell: 'Dream villa' complex that TV duo invested £2.5million in before firm went bust stands unfinished and decaying .
Sarah Jessica Parker says a 'big movie star's' inappropriate and sexually-charged behavior almost caused her to walk off set .  Freeform sticks by Grown-ish star Halle Bailey's casting as Ariel in The Little Mermaid in pointed open letter to critics  Penned open letter to the 'poor, unfortunate souls' .
Queen Letizia of Spain recycles her favourite £75 ASOS dress for the third time as she attends a cancer research workshop in Madrid .
Halsey calls fan a 'whiny baby' after they accuse openly bisexual singer of using the LGBT community as a 'marketing strategy' in offensive post   .
Shay Mitchell strikes a pose as she conceals her baby bump during vacation in Italy as she states she wants to be cast in Little Mermaid film .
Kris Jenner, 63, beams as she indulges in a spot of retail therapy alongside boyfriend Corey Gamble, 38, during their idyllic Portofino getaway .
Wendy Williams reveals she is dating a doctor who she is 'crazy about' as she returns to her TV show after taking a hiatus following her divorce .
Amber Heard goes braless in a tight black top as she enjoys lunch with pal at a gourmet food market in LA .
Archie's royal rescue dog: Meghan 'plans to tour Windsor animal adoption centres with Harry to find loyal pet for their baby son to grow up with'  .
Louis Walsh CONFIRMS he and Nicole Scherzinger will return to X Factor as judges... and that past winners will compete in All Stars show .
Michelle Heaton looks leggy in a plunging scarlet lace mini-dress as she heads to summer garden party  The former pop star, 39, enjoyed a child-free day  .
Richard Bacon thanks the medics who saved him from a near-fatal lung infection as Susanna Reid reveals he 'called Soho House  tell them he couldnot take meetings' .
Will the Queen 'hand power' to Charles in TWO years?
Royal expert predicts the monarch will relinquish the 'majority of duties' when she turns 95, but will retain her title .
Relaxed royals!
Lord Frederick Windsor puts on an affectionate display with BAREFOOT wife Sophie Winkleman as they enjoy a night out in Fulham .
Celebrity super nanny dismisses rumours she's been hired by Harry and Meghan - but would love 'opportunity to help' raise Archie  .
Kourtney Kardashian beams as she enjoys girls' night out with niece North and daughter Penelope ahead of her seventh birthday .
Love Island: Viewers compare Maura and Lucie to 'immature' schoolgirls as they break up with Marvin and George TOGETHER .
Love Island's Maura is slammed by viewers for 'breaking girl code' as she makes her move on Curtis... despite slating Elma for doing the same thing .
Shawn Mendes and Camila Cabello fuel relationship rumors while seen holding hands and cuddling after Sunday brunch .
Dele Alli flies his barber Justin Carr out to St Tropez for a 20-minute trim as he holidays on £40,000-a-week yacht with girlfriend Ruby Mae .
Lauren Goodger is bleary-eyed as she exits a London club after putting on a cosy display with Pete Wicks during VERY boozy brunch  .
Grantchester star Morven Christie says she is prepared to tackle British TV's enduring sexual harassment issues head on .
Jenson Button's pregnant fiancée Brittny Ward displays her blossoming bump in gym leggings as they head out on a hike .
Adriana Lima puts on a stunning display in an eye-catching pink dress as she enjoys Italian getaway with Turkish businessman Emir Uyar .
Rapper G-Eazy joins list of stars in the running to play Elvis Presley in Baz Luhrmann biopic after 'pitching himself' to director .
Alexandra Daddario and Emma Watson's ex boyfriend Brendan Wallace pack on the PDA as they go sightseeing in Rome .
David and Victoria Beckham continue their 20th wedding anniversary celebrations with a visit to British Summer Time Hyde Park .
Ciara shows off her curves in plunging swimsuit in Fiji... after promising Russell Wilson 'however many babies' he wants on third anniversary .
Gentleman Jack viewers are left swooning as lovers Anne and Ann reunite in the series finale - and hail the show the 'best thing on TV' .
Sir Paul McCartney, 77, sends his love to wife Nancy Shevell, 59, as he puts his hands in the shape of a heart during Vancouver gig .
Kylie Minogue THANKS Kylie Jenner for introducing her to a new audience in America after winning trademark war over shared name .
NFL star Baker Mayfield posts 'corny' video on social media announcing marriage to Emily Wilkinson .
Disney actress G Hannelius looks somber as she stop by farmers market after Jessie co-star Cameron Boyce found dead at 20 .
Brigitte Nielsen, 55, looks like a model mom as matches outfits with husband Mattia Dessi, 39, and their daughter for a trip to the farmer's market .
Zendaya promotes new Euphoria episode... following last week's One Direction 'Larry' controversy .
Dakota Johnson shows off her lithe figure in hoodie and leggings as she heads to workout in LA .
Kendall Jenner shows off her toned tummy in a summer chic purple ensemble as she soaks up some sun on a boat with friend Justine Skye  Topping up her tan .
Myleene Klass cradles her baby bump in a black maxi dress at the British Summer Time festival... after revealing she's having a BOY at her baby shower .
Claudia Winkleman sports her trademark heavy eyeliner and fringe as she arrives for British Summer Time Hyde Park festival .
Love Island: 'I went with my gut as that's what people do nowadays' Amy takes sly dig at ex Curtis during French food challenge after split .
Gorka Marquez shares sweet congratulatory messages from his Strictly co-stars after Gemma Atkinson gives birth to their baby daughter .
Fear The Walking Dead: Victor Strand makes good on rescue promise to Luciana Galvez and Alicia Clark .
Kodak Black shares first photo from Florida prison as he remains incarcerated over weapons case  In the shot, theperformer cracked a smile  .
Love Island star Megan Barton Hanson exudes glamour and style in a plunging wrap dress as she enjoys a night out in Mayfair .
Hailey Baldwin posts sweet tribute to her husband Justin Bieber as the couple celebrate their one year engagement anniversary .
Vinnie Jones' wife dies of cancer: Football hardman-turned movie star mourns his partner of more than 20 years after she passes away aged 53 .
Brendan Cole suggests the Strictly Come Dancing curse will never end...
15 years after he became its first victim .
Once, Bananarama battled sexism and big hair disasters.
Now, nearing 60, it's all about hot flushes, HRT and ageism - as they reveal in a hilarious interview .
'I promise to send a message from heaven': Kerry Katona posts poignant video of Dylan-Jorge, 5, dancing as it emerges girl's dad George Kay has died  .
Dele Alli's gorgeous girlfriend Ruby Mae flaunts her phenomenal physique in an olive bikini as she enjoys yacht trip in St. Tropez with footballer .
'Savoring every moment': Real Housewives of Potomac's Ashley Darby gives birth to baby boy .
Love Island: 'You have taken the p**s!'
Joanna confronts Michael over feelings for Amber... as his ex admits she's caught him 'staring' at her .
Rio Ferdinand parties hard and cuddles inflatable doll of fiancée Kate Wright as he jets off to Barcelona for raucous stag do .
Westlife's Mark Feehily reveals he and fiancé Cailean O'Neill are expecting a baby girl during concert... as they prepare to welcome their first child .
Love Island: Maura fancies Curtis EVEN MORE after awkward dance lesson in front of Amy... as she distances herself from Marvin following row .
Nicola McLean sizzles in a racy bikini for a photoshoot snap as she shows off the results of her 32FF boob job and liposuction .
Ethan Hawke praises daughter Maya Hawke for her work on Netflix's Stranger Things, calling her the 'real deal'  Has taken to social media .
Mariah Carey shocks fans as she triumphs Bottle Cap Challenge in the most iconic way  Successfully completed the ongoing viral craze on Sunday  .
Ariel Winter is a doting dog mum as she takes her five-year-old pup to the vet with Levi Meaden in LA   Took her her dog Casper to a local practice  .
Big Little Lies Season 2 Episode 5 recap: The Monterey Five brace for more trauma as Mary Louise goes after Celeste's kids and Ed ponders divorce .
Celebrities shower Team USA in compliments and messages of support for the American squad after an fourth FIFA Women's World Cup win .
Meghan wears the same £12,000 Cartier earrings to Archie's christening as she did at her wedding to Harry to 'link the two events together' .
Lady Gabriella Windsor reveals she feared her diamond tiara would fall off on her wedding day after her bridesmaids stepped on her veil  .
Martin Charnin, Tony Award-winning lyricist and writer best known for Annie, dies aged 84  His daughter Sasha Charnin Morrison, announced the news .
Gigi and Bella Hadid sport crop tops and shorts while enjoying a day at Disneyland with friends  At the happiest place on earth .
TOWIE's Yazmin Oukhellou puts on a passionate display as she smooches beau James Lock before heading for brunch with pals in London .
Tess Daly exudes summer chic in pretty tangerine co-ords as she makes rare public appearance with husband Vernon Kay at Celebrity Cricket Day .
Kelly Brook says gorging on pies and pints of Guinness caused her to gain two stone... before shedding the pounds with a healthy diet .
Kris Jenner, 63, and boyfriend Corey Gamble, 38, live it up in Portofino as they head on a boat trip and enjoy a toast with pals  Holidaying in style .
Cat Deeley reveals she fears for her children's safety in the US following shooter scare - as she considers returning to UK after 13 years in Hollywood  .
Warwick Davis, 49, looks in high spirits as he joins daughter Annabelle, 22, for Horrible Histories film premiere in London .
CHRISTOPHER STEVENS reviews last night's TV: Humour and quiet courage of a heartbreaking medical battle  .
A shamanic rite, rave music... and lawyers!
PATRICK MARMION reviews the first night of Tree   Includes a guide to South Africa's racial tensions. .
Dua Lipa 'CONFIRMS' romance with Anwar Hadid as they put on a VERY cosy display before enjoying a wild dance party at British Summer Time .
Geordie Shore's Chloe Ferry accentuates her curves in gymwear as she tucks into a greasy snack before putting on a VERY giddy display at the fairground .
Lucy Mecklenburgh sizzles in a gold bikini as she posts throwback snaps from engagement getaway with new fiancé Ryan Thomas in Capri .
Forces' sweetheart Vera Lynn is still smiling at 102 as she waves to fans during a rare appearance with family in Brighton .
Ben Affleck enjoys some family time and treats his children to a Sunday morning donut run in Los Angeles  Enjoyed some quality time .
Emma Roberts and Garrett Hedlund cut a casual figure as they enjoy romantic lunch date  Fans first saw them out in April .
Lottie Moss flaunts her cleavage in a tiny satin bra and baseball jacket as she heads on a night out with model pal Daniel Mickelson in Beverly Hills .
Eva Longoria and her son Santiago play with bubbles while on vacation in Spain  The little one didnot know what to make of the floating bubbles .
Jack Fincham confidently showcases his two stone weight loss as he flashes his toned torso during Ibiza getaway with pals .
The Wanted's Tom Parker and wife Kelsey welcome 'beautiful' baby girl Aurelia Rose...  as the first-time dad shares adorable snap of newborn .
Alex Rodriguez comforts Jennifer Lopez as she cries after a 'tough' show: 'You donot see how great you are'   Her knight in shining armor on Saturday .
Reese Witherspoon and co-star Adam Scott are picture perfect while on set of their show Big Little Lies  On-screen couple isnot out of the woods yet .
Tracee Ellis Ross and Evan Ross step out in style for Kevin Hart's 40th birthday party in Hollywood  The famous family pulled out all the stops  .
Dwayne 'The Rock' Johnson is 'excited and proud' to showcase Samoan culture in Hobbs & Shaw  Admitted 'culture' was key to his appearance .
Spider-Man: Far From Home snags $185.1M to rule the six-day holiday weekend US box office  Dominated the July Fourth holiday weekend in the United States .
Avril Lavigne angers Christian community with her single I Fell In Love With the Devil after dropping dark promo imagery .
Love Island: Anna lathers her chest and bum in pancake mix as she goes to great lengths to win VERY filthy challenge in hilarious unseen clip .
Lily Allen dazzles in pink tiered dress and sports bold wig as she scoops the Pop prize at the South Bank Sky Arts Awards .
Camila Cabello returns to support rumored beau Shawn Mendes for a SECOND night at his concert in Los Angeles... following very cosy display  .
Kevin Hart looks worse for wear as he stumbles out of 40th birthday bash with wife Eniko after partying with Le Bron James, Usher and Gabrielle Union .
Olivia Culpo sends pulses racing as she flashes enviable physique in a gold bikini and matching sheer dress .
Stacey Solomon shares sweet snaps of herself coordinating with baby son Rex... after admitting she is battling with anxiety following birth .
Real Madrid star Gareth Bale marries his childhood sweetheart in secret as couple snub the elderly grandparents who helped bring her up .
Jamie Oliver and his family move into their new £6m Tudor mansion just two months after 1,000 of his staff lost their jobs when 22 of his restaurants closed  .
Love Island's Laura Anderson shows off her gym-honed figure and long legs in a yellow bikini during Dubai break .
James Corden enjoys a boat trip with his wife Julia in St Tropez... as he takes a family break after successful Gavin and Stacey read through .
Disney Channel star Cameron Boyce found dead at 20-years-old: Actor who starred with Adam Sandler in Grown Ups dies from a 'seizure'  .
Anna Kournikova reveals Pilates was the key to losing her baby weight after having twins - and how fame at 14 made her 'so anxious she couldnot move'  .
Emilia Clarke says she was 'exhausted' by the pressure she put on herself to 'feel normal' after two brain aneurysms .
Zoe Kravitz and her new husband Karl Glusman are seen for the first time since their Paris wedding as they enjoy romantic dinner in Positano .
'I've been waiting for so long': Love Island's Anton asks Belle to take their relationship 'to the next level' as he gets his bum shaved in hilarious unseen clip .
Ethical designer Stella McCartney reveals people donot wear leather around her - and advises women not to wash their bras every day .
'Our girl made quite the entrance!'
Gemma Atkinson gives birth to her first child as beau Gorka Marquez praises actress for 'being his hero' .
Wayne Rooney escort Helen Wood tells all: She claims he had a fling with another vice girl who pretended to be a cleaner to sneak into his home .
Solange Knowles showcases her low-key look in an oversized black T-shirt and loose trousers as she jets out of Paris .
Lil Kim, 44, shows off her very smooth complexion as she dons purple wig and neon fishnet dress for Essence festival .
Terry Crews thinks he would be perfect to play King Triton in Disney's live-action Little Mermaid  He wants to be where the mermaids are.  .
Simon Cowell rang Amanda Holden to reassure her job was safe after critics called for her to be SACKED amid Phillip Schofield spat .
Kerry Katona's ex George Kay dead at 39: Star 'heartbroken' as father of daughter Dylan-Jorge, 5, passes away after suspected drug overdose  .
Iman Bowie, 63, makes a rare public appearance as she exudes glamour in monochrome maxi dress at New Orleans bash .
Jessie J sizzles in sexy red gown fashioned into a blazer as she shares Instagram mirror shots  Stunned in the unusual garment .
Love Island's Wes Nelson 'hit with flying GLASS during explosive row with ex Megan Barton Hanson after she accused him of cheating on her' .
Amber Le Bon leads the way in pretty floral tea dress alongside stylish Victoria Pendleton at Cartier bash during Goodwood Festival Of Speed .
ITV's Dr Ranj reveals he felt suicidal before coming out as gay and only plucked up the courage to tell his family about his sexuality last year .
Love Island's Danny 'dumped his girlfriend to go on show and told her he would fake romances to be famous'... as she's left 'devastated'  .
Frostiness of the fab four!
Body language expert claims William appeared 'furtive' and Kate looked 'ready to flee' at Archie's closed-doors christening  .
Kim Kardashian shares adorable video of her daughter Chicago playing hairdresser for her patient older sister North .
Kendall Jenner's July Fourth mystery man revealed as Los Angeles Lakers player Kyle Kuzma  Linked to another NBA player  .
Hugh Grant opts for comfort in navy shorts as he joins leggy wife Anna Eberstein for a low-key stroll during romantic getaway in Capri .
Kate Beckinsale enjoys a giggly chat with close pal David Walliams as they lead second day glamour at British Summer Time Hyde Park festival .
Khloé Kardashian called out over 'worthless materialism' after posting video of daughter True Thompson playing in pink toy Bentley .
Gabrielle Union looks radiant in a sparkling white ensemble as she joins a host of famous faces at Kevin Hart's 40th birthday .
REVEALED: Heather Mills 'dating a toyboy 25 years her junior after meeting him on a train and slipping him a love note that said I think you're hot.
Email me' .
Harry and Meghan  'feel fortunate' to have enjoyed the day with Archie's (unidentified) godparents as they release images of the closed-door christening  .
Laura Whitmore sports leopard print coat and 70s style flared jeans as she arrives at BBC Radio studios .
Secretive Harry blasted for 'acting like A-lister' over cloak-and-dagger christening as 'wingman' Charlie van Straubenzee thought to be among godparents  .
Kim Kardashian puts on an electric display in a VERY sheer orange mini skirt and matching nude blouse for dinner in Beverly Hills .
Cardi B posts clip of baby girl Kulture in her purple wig... after tossing her hairpiece into crowd at London gig .
Cheryl candidly reveals she went to therapy for a year after 'struggling in silence' because she didnot want to battle anxiety while raising son Bear .
Stevie Wonder, 69, reveals he needs a kidney transplant and will undergo surgery later this year after finding a donor .
Love Island: Amy Schumer throws her support behind 'homie' Maura in a special Aftersun message... as the grid girl turns her attention to Curtis .
Sofia Vergara tucks into some gelato as she soaks up the sights on Italian getaway with husband Joe Manganiello to mark fifth anniversary .
Robbie Williams set 'to sign six-figure Las Vegas residency deal after impressing with a series of sell out shows' .
Nene Leakes flashes knockout curves in busty one-piece suit after signing on for new season of Real Housewives Of Atlanta  .
Wimbledon 2019: Andy Murray's wife Kim Sears looks crestfallen as her tennis star beau crashes out of men's doubles tournament on Super Saturday .
Mary J. Blige owns the stage in leopard print alongside Nas and H.E.R. at Essence Fest in New Orleans  Joined by Nas and H.E.R onstage .
Chris Brown's ex Nia Guzman denies he is behind on child supportf for their daughter Royalty, five, saying 'All is great on our end!' .
Police launch probe amid claims Katie Price's son Harvey was 'sent abuse from police officers' as friends say model, 41, is 'sick to the back teeth of trolls'  .
Angelina Jolie cuts chic off-duty style as she steps out with her twins Vivienne and Knox, 10, in Los Angeles  .
Bikini-clad Olivia Munn shows off her amazing figure as she celebrates 39th birthday with pals at luxury villa in Turks and Caicos .
Patrick Schwarzenegger shows off muscled summer body while walking shirtless through iconic Kennedy hot spot Hyannisport .
Madonna's daughter Lourdes Leon beams as she rides a bike through NYC wearing skintight white mini skirt and matching tank top .
Love Island's Anna Vakili saved her friend from homelessness after his relationship with his family broke down when he came out as gay .
Ciara and Russell Wilson share sweet kiss in video celebrating 3-year wedding anniversary: 'To more years of love, fun, joy and kids!' .
Looks like Archie is a ginger!'
Thrilled royal fans are quick to point out a family resemblance as Harry and Meghan finally show their son off to the world  .
Who knew they were friends?
Khloé Kardashian gushes over Australian model Shanina Shaik in a heartwarming exchange .
He really is the Greatest Showman!
Hugh Jackman dazzles with silver trousers and maracas during The Man.
The Music.
The Show concert in Miami .
Matt Damon looks every inch the Hollywood hunk as he leaves BFF Ben Affleck's house in ultra-casual outfit .
Gigi and Bella Hadid enjoy luxurious Disneyland trip in honour of lucky gal pal Leah McCarthy's birthday .
Alesha Dixon admits she 'finally respects' her body at 40 and feels more 'womanly' than she did in her twenties .
April Love Geary shares topless shot FOUR months after giving birth... as she enjoys vacation with Robin Thicke  .
Pregnant Myleene Klass reveals she's having a BOY as she's joined by family and celebrity pals at her blue-themed baby shower .
Chris Pratt enjoys a day at the beach with Katherine Schwarzenegger and his son Jack as they celebrate the 4th of July weekend with the Kennedys  .
Pride London 2019: Renée Zellweger rocks a chic checked trouser suit and waves the rainbow flag as she leads the celebrity  festivities .
Khloé Kardashian shows off her toned abs ahead of new Revenge Body episode featuring mom Kris Jenner .
Sam Smith admits he's 'never felt prouder to be queer' as he shares striking selfie before celebrating London Pride in style .
Madison Beer steps out for a cool beverage with a pal ...as on-off ex Zack Bia gets handsy with mystery blonde .
Love Island viewers SLAM Molly-Mae for 'stirring' and 'planting seeds of doubt' in Joanna's head about Michael's relationship with ex Amber .
'I had a brain tumour the size of a golf ball': Nicki Chapman could have died without major surgery.
Here she reveals how she coped with the crisis  .
Kim Kardashian shares sultry throwback vacation photos as she 'cleans out' her camera roll    Went through her camera roll  .
Halsey stands out in a bright neon green tracksuit as she rushes past adoring fans upon arrival at Sao Paulo airport .
Travis Scott sends fans wild as he puts on an explosive performance at Wireless festival  The rapper lit up the stage  .
Cardi B jumps off the stage to twerk with fans after tossing off her wig into the crowd at London's Wireless Festival .
Joaquin Phoenix and girlfriend Rooney Mara match in all black as they enjoy a couple's pedicure over Fourth Of July weekend .
Kate Mara and Jamie Bell cut a casual figure as they take their baby daughter out for a stroll in LA .
'Red wine and weed is a good recipe for sensual adventures': Adam Lambert reveals how he tapped into his 'soulfulness' for new record  .
Villanelle HELPING MI6 was the quickest, dumbest, way to ruin Phoebe Waller-Bridge's series.
The clue was in the name on Killing Eve, by Jim Shelley .
Teen Mom OG couple Mackenzie Standifer and troubled Ryan Edwards expecting baby No.
2 .  Pixie Lott puts on a VERY leggy display in sizzling leather hot pants as she attends House Festival in London .
'I refused to let the Curse of Strictly kill my marriage' ...says Faye Tozer, the singer from Steps who's now the star of a West End musical .
Wimbledon 2019: Mollie King gazes lovingly at beau Stuart Broad as they make a rare appearance together during day six of the tournament .
RHOC's Kelly Dodd flirts with police officer after getting pulled over in the back of an Uber in the Hamptons  The 43-year-old reality star .
Selena Gomez cradles new dog Winnie in her arms as she enjoys summer hike in Los Angeles with pals .
Newlywed Katherine McPhee Foster shares 360-degree view of her wedding gown in BTS video .
Sinitta strips off her top and suffers an EPIC wardrobe malfunction as she puts on an energetic performance at Pride World .
Idris Elba makes a bold statement in a 'donot stab your future' slogan T-shirt as he takes to the stage ahead of Skepta at Wireless festival .
£1.75million-a-year Gary Lineker is the BBC's 'biggest waste of cash' says new poll...but only because Chris Evans has already left his £1.25million Radio 2 job .
TALK OF THE TOWN: Working Girl star Melanie Griffith, 61, shares gruelling exercise video before showing off toned bikini bod on holiday in Spain .
Kris Jenner is 'proud' of Khloe Kardashian's 'fitness journey' after reality star admitted she gained 40lbs while pregnant with daughter True .
Chrissy Teigen goes TOPLESS for sultry shot as she continues lavish European vacation with her family .
Fashion Special: Trinny's guide to ageless style  Fashion rule book?
Rip it up, says YOU's Contributing Editor Trinny Woodall .
Mission Possible: Lorraine Pascale's go-to gadgets to help you make healthy meals from scratch in a fraction of the time .
'Bikinis and babies!
A few of my favourite things!'
Eva Longoria, 44, showcases her sizzling physique while posing with son Santiago, 12 months .
Move over, Adele!
A fresh wave of lyrical superstars is winning millions of fans online and helping fuel a £12 million market.
Karen Yossman explores the rise of the 'Instapoets' .
Hailey Baldwin Bieber marvels at how her 'beautiful' mother-in-law Pattie Mallette 'looks 21'  Gave birth to Justin age 17 .
Lucy Hale looks summer-chic in short jean overalls as she pays a parking meter before a sweat session  Best known for her role on Pretty Little Liars .
'Hollywood stopped calling': He starred with Julia Roberts, was friends with Madonna and wanted to be the next Tom Cruise.
Rupert Everett reveals how it all went wrong .
TALK OF THE TOWN: Gwyneth Paltrow swaps smoothies for martinis as she lets her hair down at Paris Fashion Week .
Inside Nelly's 5th birthday party: Billie Faiers and Greg Shepherd throw lavish Greatest Showman themed bash complete with circus tent .
Have Soho House pair who went to Royal Wedding landed key role of godparents to Archie alongside Harry's cherished nanny Tiggy Legge-Bourke?  .
Trinny's beauty reboot   Time to rethink your routine?
Here are my tips for shaking things up .
TALK OF THE TOWN: Adele on a hot date with married man!
Fans got excited at the idea that newly single Adele had fallen in love again .
The Duchess of Cambridge stuns in pink Stella McCartney dress and red headband while wearing Princess Diana's earrings as her nephew Archie is FINALLY revealed at his christening .
David Walliams cuts a low-key figure as he embarks on helicopter ride with a bevy of pals in London   The Britain's Got Talent judge .
Natasha Kaplinsky decided to 'conquer the fear' by returning to spot in Corfu where 'biblical' boat explosion one year ago nearly killed her family and left daughter with burns .
Melissa McCarthy gets behind the wheel of her custom purple golf cart to run errands with her family .
Kevin Spacey is quizzed in the US by Scotland Yard detectives over sex assault allegations in the UK .
Love Island fans go WILD for Ovie and Amber's date... as viewers urge her to reunite with cruel Michael, win the show and STEAL the £50K .
Ian 'H' Watkins CONFIRMS new romance as he shares a kiss with mystery beau after court battle with ex over Range Rover .
Is this Archie's godmother?
Harry's childhood nanny Tiggy Legge Bourke is spotted arriving for secret christening after Kate and William were spirited into Windsor .
Emmerdale: Fans are left disgusted as David Metcalfe 'grooms' his son Jacob online... after the teen's abuse by paedophile Maya Stepney .
Wimbledon 2019: Charli XCX puts on a very cosy display with a mystery man as they step out together for the first time during Super Saturday .
Patsy Kensit looks sartorially savvy as she slips into a frilly floral dress during Paris Haute Couture Week .
Vicky McClure cuts a casual figure in a denim jacket and jeans as she attends British Summer Time festival .
Sarah Hyland snaps makeup-free selfie before sharing sexy shots taken by her beau Wells Adams while the couple enjoy beach holiday .
Sofia Vergara flashes toned physique as she continues lavish European vacation with Joe Manganiello .
Mary-Kate Olsen continues her expert foray into horse-riding as she competes with her prized steed in the Longines Global Champions Tour in Paris .
Love Island: Maura receives a dance lesson from Curtis after admitting he's the 'full package'... as his FUMING ex Amy looks on  .
Irish man, 19, 'is raped by two men in Magaluf after being kicked out of a brothel for having no money' .
EXCLUSIVE: Teenage daredevil spent MONTHS scoping out cameras, sensors and security at The Shard before epic 1,000ft climb to achieve a 'GODLIKE feeling' standing at very top  .
Day of the white envelopes: Deutsche Bank staff leave London and New York offices holding letters after being 'told to clear their desks' as German firm cuts 18,000 jobs worldwide .
Indiana toddler falls 150ft to her death after being 'dangled out of window' by her grandfather from 11th deck of a Royal Caribbean cruise ship docked in Puerto Rico .
Woman, 52, suffers heart attack at 'Europe's biggest sex festival' - which is being held in a field in Worcestershire - after she 'overdid it during group activities'  .
Inside Ant and Dec's property hell: 'Dream villa' complex that TV duo invested £2.5million in before firm went bust stands unfinished and decaying - as they bring in lawyers to claw back their cash  .
Retired jockey, 60, died when she fell onto an eco-friendly metal drinking straw which impaled her eye in a freak accident, inquest hears .
Father-to-be who Googled 'How to get rid of unwanted pregnancy at one month' then hired his cousin to kill his unborn child by pouring detergent down pregnant 17-year-old girl's throat is jailed for 11 years  .
PICTURED: Toddler daughter of Indiana cop who fell 150ft to her death after slipping from her grandfather's arms on 11th deck of a Royal Caribbean cruise ship docked in Puerto Rico .
EXCLUSIVE: Parents of lesbian British mother arrested in Jersey after taking her children and running away with sperm donor claim it was 'based on love' - and say 'the public can judge' her Canadian wife who celebrated when she was caught by police  .
Angry cyclists lash out at Peugeot because they think its driver got too close when they tried to overtake - but viewers are divided over who's in the wrong .
Coco's dream is over!
Tearful 15-year-old sensation Gauff admits 'I wasnot feeling 100%' as she is knocked OUT of Wimbledon after suffering stomach cramps and losing in straight sets to former world number one Simona Halep .
Kerry Katona PICTURE EXCLUSIVE: Singer wears 'I'm trying my best' badge as she is seen with daughter DJ for first time since girl's father died from an overdose - as his friends say he was heartbroken at not seeing his daughter .
The secretive workaholic who brought 'cheap chic' to Britain: Primark founder Arthur Ryan, who turned a Dublin shop into a £2bn-a-year business, dies aged 83 four years after drowning tragedy killed three of his family  .
Traffic wardens give the SAME car 119 tickets in past year to rack up £8,000 in fines but they cannot trace the owner .
The happiest place on earth?
Brutal brawl breaks out between a family at Disneyland in shocking video which captures a man beating a group of women after one spits in his face .
Police officers' son, 18, who killed two men in his father's Audi after smoking cannabis tells inquest 'just because something's in your blood doesnot mean you're under the influence' - as coroner rules deaths were an accident  .
Heart-wrenching footage of international mountaineers' final moments before they were swept away in Himalayan avalanche in May is released by authorities .
Baby Archie Harrison makes his first appearance in the official Court Circular following his top secret christening... but there's still no mention of who Harry and Meghan picked to be his godparents .
Lesbian asylum seeker deported to Uganda after being found in bed with a man must be brought back to the UK at taxpayers' expense in case she is discriminated against, court rules .
Musician, 21, drops dead from a caffeine overdose after drinking a protein shake - as his devastated family issue a desperate warning that one TEASPOON can kill .
Terrifying moment giant cruise ship 'loses control', scrapes along boats and nearly crashes into a Venice dock sending crew running for their lives during brutal storm .
Meghan Markle is in talks with Vogue to have a regular column in both the magazine's US and UK editions focusing on her charity work, after Amal Clooney 'encouraged Duchess to promote her philanthropy projects' .
'I was 14.
I had braces': Jeffrey Epstein victims recall how pedophile forced them to perform sex acts ahead of his bail hearing, as prosecutors fight to keep billionaire flight risk behind bars  .
Olympic rower James Cracknell and TV presenter Beverley Turner officially end 17-year marriage - with divorce expected to be granted next month  .
UAE millionaire planning to drag an ICEBERG to the country announces he will carry out test run with smaller iceberg towed to South Africa or Australia later this year  .
Married couple are killed when husband drives into the path of a train at a railway crossing in Austria a day after wife said she was moving to Monaco  .
Terrified mother, 36, says she is too scared to leave her home after her lorry driver ex-fiancé began stalking her after she dumped him and secretly planted a GPS tracker under her car .
Labour civil war explodes as party braces for bombshell TV probe into anti-Semitism and John McDonnell tells Jeremy Corbyn to back a second referendum on Brexit  .
Jeffrey Epstein will spend three more nights in jail pending bail hearing after claiming underage girls were 'prostitutes' - as FBI reveals trove of nude images of minors and a massage table with sex toys found at his $77M mansion     .
Serial drink driver, 30, who was twice limit when pulled from horror crash is spared jail 'because she's a WOMAN'  .
Nurse is fighting for her life in hospital 'after anaesthetist boyfriend injected her with a drug during exorcism' .
Bodybuilder, 27, 'stalked his terrified teacher ex-girlfriend, 25, for 10 months and forced her to move house'  .
EXCLUSIVE: Dumped husband of sex fetish Bumble bride whose marriage collapsed two months after they wed in Vegas is now broke, living in a CARAVAN... and wants his ring back .
'The good news is that Britain will soon have a new Prime Minister': Trump ridicules outgoing PM Theresa May for Brexit 'mess' and says White House will no longer deal with British ambassador who called him 'inept'  .
British Airways faces a £183million fine after the personal details of more than 380,000 customers may have been stolen when hackers attacked the airline's website last year .
'I'll see them in court!': Britain's 'most hated cyclist' boasts how he uses headcam footage to get drivers prosecuted - and how he wears body armour to protect himself against road rage attacks  .
Labour Brexiteer Kate Hoey says she will QUIT at the next election - and top Momentum chief who said anti-Semitism complaints were just 'mud-slinging' among the favourites to replace her .
Nick Candy accuses businessman of trying to con him out of millions of pounds as property tycoon WINS £1.5bn court battle over 'sale' of Hyde Park penthouse .
Police charge man, 44, with four counts of attempted murder after a mother and her three daughters were stabbed in their north London home  .
Bankrupt Boris sells his tennis treasures: Becker auctions off 82 items of his prized memorabilia- including his Wimbledon trophy, jewellery... and even his SOCKS - as he faces divorce bill  .
Ecobank Nigeria Academy is currently training 332 graduates in preparation for full employment into Ecobank Nigeria..
The programme combines the three categories of Entry Level, Graduate and Management Trainees with a program duration of 2 months, 12 months and 21 months respectively..
Ecobank's Development Programmes are part of the Bank's talent development strategy to continue to churn out excellently trained banking professionals at various levels of the industry to feed into her talent pipeline and the banking industry.
They are founded on global best practice that prepare the candidates for banking careers in positions aligned with their potential, competencies and experience at the entry point of functional pre-managerial roles..
As part of this plan, 100 fresh graduates recently joined the Entry Level programme – a 2month training ground for fresh graduates to prepare them to join the Bank's workforce at the entry point and rapidly gain experience to rise through the ranks.
These graduates will be exposed to classroom training, action learning as well as valuable mentorship to quickly prepare them for full employment in the Bank..
In keeping with its talent development strategy, the first batch of 25 Graduate Trainees who recently passed out after 12 months of intensive capacity enhancement training have since been offered full employment with Ecobank Nigeria.
Their training combines classroom, on–the-job, book reading and action learning models which provides the candidates with global exposure and ability to compete internationally..
In his comment during the graduation ceremony, the Managing Director, Ecobank Nigeria, Patrick Akinwuntan congratulated the graduands and encouraged them to keep their vision of getting to the top of their career.
According to Mr Akinwuntan, the Trainee programme initiative is part of Ecobank's transformation agenda to make the bank a most preferred financial institution in the country..
This programme is our own way as a bank to invest in creating future leaders for the Nigerian banking industry.
We are investing in the people to accomplish our vision both as a bank and a country.
A key success factor of any bank is capital; and we must therefore train those who will be empowered to oversee this capital and put it to good use in the interest of depositors and investors.
Staff of banks must be well trained and knowledgeable so that they can ensure that funds in the banks are effectively deployed.
For us at Ecobank, we must also ensure that we deliver on our promise as a financial institution of choice not only in Nigeria, but the whole of Africa.
We therefore take the development of adequately trained manpower as a must do in striving to achieve our goals..
Mr Akinwuntan also stated that Ecobank deploys top notch technology and innovation which are the platforms needed to drive its vision to be a leader in the provision of financial services across Africa.
In his words, we provide full service banking right from the wholesale business to the small, medium scale and to individuals.
To do this, we've built technology services that enable us deliver our services in a convenient, accessible and reliable manner.
This is affordable and sustainable to our customers, while also ensuring good returns to our shareholders..
A spokesperson for Customs that Dalhatu was questioned about his action and he replied in a manner indicating he is mentally challenged.
Attah said:.
It was obvious that he was not in the right frame of mind from the question and the answer he gave..
What happened was that, an Assistant Superintendent of Customs came to the office today wearing the rank of a Deputy Comptroller-General..
From questions and answers that followed, it was obvious that he was not in the right frame of mind, so a Doctor was immediately invited..
He is presently under going medical examination at the medical unit of the service..
The Chief Medical Director of the facility, Dr Adetokunbo Fabamwo, gave the assurance during a ward visit with the Permanent Secretary, Ministry of Health, Dr Titilayo Goncalves, to some of the victims admitted at LASUTH..
Fabamwo said: The assurance is that we have a responsibility to give care to the victims free of charge and the Ministry of Health has been supporting us immensely..
We have not lacked funds or any other thing that we needed to give care to these patients..
Until they leave the hospital, none of them is going to spend a Kobo in their care and they will have all the supply that they need..
He said that about five patients were currently receiving treatment at the hospital and were responding well..
He said: We expect a very good outcome for them..
Also, Goncalves said that all the victims received prompt and fast treatment and had the very best of care..
She said, We have used the most expensive materials to make sure that the victims got the highest level of quality in terms of healthcare and out of no cost to the patient..
Responding, two relatives of victims including minors, aged five and 10 confirmed that they did not pay for the treatment..
One of them, Adenike Fatai, said that all tests carried out at the hospital's laboratory were free..
Fatai said: We also got our drugs free and the doctors and nurses are attending to us; I appreciate what the hospital management is doing and also the state government..
Also, an aunt to one of the victims, who did not give her name, said her niece was responding to treatment, which according to her, was free..
She said: Unfortunately, we lost the mother to the sad event..
I am appreciative that the hospital management is giving us the care we need..
The July 4 pipeline explosion at Ijegun, a Lagos suburb, had claimed no fewer than 10 lives, while several houses and property were destroyed..
The cause of the explosion had been attributed to the activities of pipeline vandals..
LOCAL beauty queen Leruo Nape is off to Orlando, Florida in the USA, to take part in the International Junior Miss (IJM) pageant which is one of the most prestigious pageants for teens in the world..
The reigning Miss Teen Inspire SA is no stranger to representing her country overseas..
At the age of 11, she and her brother, Mmoke, represented SA at Little Miss and Mr Galaxy in Bulgaria..
In 2016 they won the much desired title of Little Miss and Mr SA and went to take part in a modelling competition organised by Beyond 2000.
Leruo did well, returning with two gold and silver..
IJM finals will take place on July 13 but the whole competition will begin on July 8..
We wish Leruo and the entire SA team all the best.
Four female students who were caught having lesbian sex of Kebbi state College of Science and Technology have been expelled from the collage..
Mr. Aminu Dakingari, school provost, who disclosed this while addressing newsmen said that a disciplinary committee set up by the provost found the girls guilty after they were caught by cleaners and security officers in their hostel..
He said that the girls have also confessed to the act..
They accepted that they committed the crime and we just have to expel them from school and they later resorted to threatening my life by sending me text messages, but the security agencies were able to rescue me from them, Aminu said at a press conference in his office.
He stated that two of the expelled students are from Kotangora in Niger State while the others are from Sokoto and Kebbi states, respectively..
However, after the extreme recent rains, as a nation we are sorely lacking in this regard..
Anyone walking any South Coast beaches would have been more than aware of the plastic debris carried down our waterways, spewed into the ocean and then cast ashore by tidal forces..
Plastic bags, bottles and straws being the main culprits – really?
Social commentator, Reno Omokri has clapped back at Kaduna State Governor Nasir  over his comment that Northern youths are honest in their dealings..
Governor El-Rufai over the weekend stated that no Northern Nigeria youth has ever been prosecuted for Yahoo Yahoo because they are honest in their dealings..
However, Reno Omokri while responding to the statement, pointed out that Sanni Abacha who is from the north is the biggest thief in world history..
No, Facebook will never be completely private..
If that is what you are after, close this browsing window, open Facebook and delete your profile.
(Note: deleting your profile wonot wipe your Facebook information from the web.).
Most of us have grasped and are comfortable with the idea that the content we post online may be floating around in 'the cloud' forever.
However, this does not mean that we do not want to keep certain Facebook posts more private than others..
This week, Clicklaw introduces nine steps you can take to make maximum use of Facebook's privacy settings.
First things first: where do I find Facebook's settings?.
In the image below, we have marked Privacy and Blocking..
This serves to remind you that you may always block someone who bothers you on Facebook.
That said, back to privacy settings..  is up next.
Here you can indicate who should be seeing your future posts.
You can choose between Public, Friends and Friends of friends.
With the friends except and friend list tools, you can make the content available to certain friends only..
– incredibly handy and very important.
Step 5 allows you to enable tag review.
This means that, when someone tags you in a post, you will not be publicly associated with that post before you have seen it and agreed to be tagged..
Click on Use Activity Log..
You will be directed to Timeline Review.
You can now enable timeline review..
Go back to privacy settings and tools.
Note that there are various options to choose from when it comes to the details of protecting your privacy.
This includes who can see your friend requests, friends list and who can track you down using your Facebook e-mail.
This is where you permit applications or platforms like Twitter and Instagram to link to your Facebook profile..
Let's move on to Timeline and Tagging, another division of Facebook's settings.
This video illustrates which options you may choose from when it comes to your timeline and tagging..
Once you have finalised your timeline and tagging settings, you should have an increased privacy expectation.
Please remember, however, that everything you place online can be accessed – even if it happens at the hands of a cyber criminal.
Rule of thumb?
If you donot send it to your mother, donot post it!.
Lastly, it is a good idea to disable your location settings..
Click on Location under Settings and ensure that no stalker will be able to get hold of you..
These youngsters have been having some froggy fun in school..
The Grade 2s at The Bridge Assisted Learning School in Beverley have been learning about ponds in life skills this term, particularly focusing on things that live and breathe in a pond.
The children learnt about the life cycle of a frog, how a tadpole transforms itself into a frog and how to sequence when learning about the life cycle..
The kids were asked to put the stages of development in the correct order to help develop language skills, executive function skills like working memory and reading skills..
We spent the week learning about in the pond, explained Kayla Keating, one of the Grade 2 teachers.
Each day we learnt a different stage of the life cycle, Monday to Thursday.
Thursday we put together the whole cycle..
Besides learning facts about nature, the lessons helped develop other skills in the children, including sequencing skills and how to have fun while learning..
The children love learning about nature and we often teach them the life cycle of the butterfly.
This time we decided to do the frog just for something different, concluded Keating..
6 hacks to help you become a social butterfly.
Justice Kafarati Unveils Federal High Court Civil Procedure Rules 2019.
Federal High Court Civil Procedure Rules.
Chief Judge of the Federal High Court of Nigeria, Justice A. Abdu Kafarati on Friday unveiled the Federal High Court Civil Procedure Rules 2019..
In his opening remark, Justice Kafarati said the current Federal High Court Civil Procedure Rules came into force in 2009, exactly 10 years ago.. He further stressed that it was the responsibility, as a court, to ensure that it is not left behind and the court has continued to adapt to that modern trends..
The only way we can achieve this is by regular review of our laws and procedures to ensure we are able to deliver justice to not only the common man but everybody that approaches the court seeking justice, Justice Kafarati said..
British Fashion Council CEO, Caroline Rush, For GTBank Fashion Weekend.
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
The National Youth Service Corps (NYSC) in Lagos State, on Monday said there was no riot by corps members at its orientation camp in Iyana-Ipaja, Lagos on Sunday..
Mrs Joyce Madaki, NYSC Public Relations Officer, spoke to the News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) in Lagos, while reacting to the report of alleged riot at the NYSC Orientation Camp, Iyana-Ipaja, on Sunday..
Madaki described the report as false that should be disregarded..
She explained that the management of NYSC had on July 7 received information about activities of some cult groups on camp and took preventive measures to forestall any attack..
The NYSC spokesperson said the state coordinator, Mr Sunday Aroni, had on Sunday morning briefed the corps members and business owners operating in the camp market of the security threat..
She said the camp market was then closed at 8:30p.m as against the usual 10:00p.m on Sunday..
Today, our attention was drawn to a report on the social media that there was riot at Lagos NYSC camp on Sunday, because the camp director reduced the time for light-out from 10:00p.m to 8:30 pm..
The corps reviewed the time for light-out yesterday, Sunday based on security report we received that cults were having a programme..
We acted accordingly so that the corps members can go to bed early enough..
When the bell was rang for the light-out, some corps members wanted to resist and there was little uproar which was controlled by security men on ground..
During the process, there was an incident of a female corps member, who was hit on the forehead by a ceiling fan, while trying to come down from her bed to join others..
When we got to the hostel, we saw them trying to take her to the clinic, and we were told that she was hit by a celling fan while trying to come down from her bed..
Yes, a lady was injured while trying to get down from her bed, but there were no other casualties as reported..
The NYSC Lagos dismisses any report about a riot on the camp.
There was no riot on the camp whatsoever..
The problem started because we told them to go to bed earlier than they expected, she said..
Madaki said activities on the last night on camp was always very busy, thus the announcement to go to bed early was not welcome by some corps members..
She said NYSC usually have security officers among corps members for security purposes, saying that the report received would be better managed if the corps members go to bed early..
Also, do not forget that the last night on camp is usually a busy night and we donot want anything to go wrong..
We got information that July 7 was World International Axe Day and some groups were planning a meeting, so it was based on that we asked them to go to bed early and the camp market should be closed down at 8:30p.m..
Apparently, some of the corps members were not happy with our decision and wanted to resist it, in the process the said corps member was injured on the head, she said..
Download Daily Post App.
Subscribe to Daily Post Newsletter.
Send us enquiries, press releases..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Iran's Foreign Ministry announced on Monday it would implement, in 60 days, its third deliberate violation of the nuclear deal if the remaining parties do not find ways to counter US sanctions against Tehran..
The West should not criticise the legitimate decisions of Iran, but find practical solutions to convince us to stay in the deal,'' Foreign Ministry spokesman, Abbas Mussawi, said..
Mussawi added that the third phase of violation would begin in September if they failed to do so..
Last week, Tehran said it had exceeded a stock limit of 300 kilogrammes on its low-enriched uranium production..
On Sunday, it raised its uranium enrichment level beyond the 3.67-per-cent threshold agreed under the 2015 accord..
The third phase would involve reversing the reconfiguration of a heavy-water reactor so it is once again capable of producing plutonium..
President Donald Trump in 2018 pulled the US out of the accord and began imposing a maximum pressure campaign of strict sanctions on Tehran, over the objections of his European allies..
The remaining powers in the agreement, including Britain, France and Germany have sought to keep it alive by developing a money transaction system known as Instex that allows Iran to circumvent US sanctions and continue doing business with international partners..
According to Maeir, the only possible way to connect Ziklag to the Garfinkel site is if you want to say that biblical geography is imaginary… But if you want to say there is a realia, then there's no way Ziklag is three kilometers from Lachish in the heartland of Judah..
In an email to The Times of Israel, Tel Aviv University Prof. Israel Finkelstein also discounted the identification of Ziklag at the Khirbet a-Ra'i site.
Identification of places mentioned in historical texts, including the Bible, with a given archaeological site is done according to three criteria: the geographical context in which the place is mentioned in the text/s, chronological match between the period of the text or the period portrayed in the text and the finds at the site and, when possible, preservation of the ancient name in the modern (usually Arabic) one, wrote Finkelstein.
In the case of biblical Ziklag, the name is not preserved..
Likewise, in reading the biblical accounts, he said the Philistine site would have been located elsewhere..
Geographically, the story of David at Ziklag seems to require a site located in the territory of Gath, as close as possible to the desert fringe.
Khirbet a-Ra'i is located too far from the desert fringe, in the heartland of the Shephelah, wrote Finkelstein, referring to the lowlands stretching from the Judean Hills to the coastal plain..
Referring to the narrative style of the David story, Finkelstein wrote, Moreover, I Samuel 27:6 is typically Deuteronomistic in language [in accord with the theory that the biblical books of Deuteronomy, Joshua, Judges, Samuel, and Kings had all been one work], that is, from the late seventh century BCE — it seems to show that Ziklag was contested between Judah and the Philistine cities, which does not fit a place close to Lachish, the second most important city in Judah.
Most important, in Joshua 15:21, Ziklag is listed among the towns of the Negev, rather than of the Shephelah.
This too does not fit the location of Khirbet a-Ra'i..
Israeli archaeologist, Prof. Israel Finkelstein.
(Argonauter, CC-BY-SA, via Wikipedia).
For decades, Finkelstein has been on the forefront of an ongoing debate regarding biblical chronology.
In the case of Khirbet a-Ra'i as well, he wielded the particulars of dating Ziklag as a final strike against identification of the site as the biblical town..
Chronology: the list of towns of Judah in Joshua 15, in which Ziklag is mentioned, is dated to the days of King Josiah of Judah in the late seventh century BCE.
From the preliminary report, there seems to be evidence for some activity at Khirbet a-Ra'i at that time.
But the main phases of occupation at the site are centuries earlier, and the seventh century finds are no more than some sherds on the surface, wrote Finkelstein..
For these reasons the identification of Ziklag at Khirbet a-Ra'i can hardly be accepted.
Indeed, in the long history of geographical-historical research scholars sought Ziklag further south and/or west of this place, concluded Finkelstein..
Speaking to this reporter at the site itself on Monday, Garfinkel and his co-directors were prepared for blowback on their announced identification..
There are those who debate whether King David was a legend of a historical figure.
Was he a king of a kingdom, or a Bedouin king of Jerusalem, said Garfkinkel.
At Qeiyafa, I saw there was a kingdom, and this site is another Davidic settlement, he said..
Pottery assemblage from Khirbet a-Ra'i, which some archaeologists have identified as biblical Ziklag.
(Excavation expedition to Khirbet a-Ra'i).
Keimer said the pottery found in the earlier levels is typical of that found in some Aegean Sea settlements of a contemporary 12th century BCE excavation.
But later it shows a transition and absorption of local cultural elements, he said.
The basis is in Philistine forms which were taken on by the Canaanites, he said.
(As The Times of Israel observed the active dig site at the top of the hill on Monday, excavators discovered a hand-sized vessel, likely a perfume decanter, that is an example of such cultural transition.).
There are two destruction levels at the site, said Keimer, one in the early 10th century and one in the mid-11th century.
The team is still awaiting results from carbon-14 testing to firmly affix the specific date of the 10th-century destruction layer, which would more correspond to the biblical narrative.
There is a general sense that an earlier date would fit better with the narrative, Keimer said..
Keimer said an article is due to be published in a scientific journal by the end of the year.
Likewise, the dig, funded by Joey Silver of Jerusalem, Aron Levy of New Jersey, and the Roth Family and Isaac Wakil both of Sydney, is expected to continue for three more seasons at least..
Until the archaeologists unearth a sign clearly stating Here lies Ziklag, it is doubtful that any consensus will be reached on its identification.
Indeed, for some archaeology enthusiasts, the debate is academic at best..
Melbourne-native volunteer Viki Millard at the Khirbet a-Ra'i excavation, possibly the biblical Ziklag, on July 8, 2019.
How We Staged A Miraculous AFCON Comeback Against Cameron – Super Eagles.  have talked about how they staged a comeback against reigning AFCON champions, Cameron..
The trio William Troost-Ekong, Oghenekaro Etebo and Daniel Akpeyi have revealed how the Super  staged a historic comeback against the Indomitable Lions of Cameroon to win 3-2, .
In separate interviews after their match against Cameroon, the trio hinted that the half time pep-talk, fans backing, coupled with the tactical changes made by Gernot Rohr saw them outshine the defending champions..
Goals from StephaneBahoken and Clinton N'Jie late in the second half cancelled out Odion Ighalo's opener in the 19th minute..  overturned the first-half deficit with strikes from Ighalo and Alex Iwobi in the space of six minutes..
In the second half, the confidence that we had was higher than that of the first half, Troost-Ekong began..
We had to talk to ourselves in the dressing room to create some chances.
Later in the game, we showed the speed and pace.
We showed that we have what it takes..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
A combination of entities whose common aim is the fight against crime brought their energies together at a convention held at the South African National Museum of Military History..
Five JMPD officers arrested for alleged corruption – AUDIO.
The Cohesion of Synergy Against Crime was hosted by the Civilian Crime Intelligence Network (CCIN), a non-profit organisation in the sphere of crime and safety in South Africa..
The CCIN was established in 2014 with a primary vision and mission to support, augment, highlight and add value to the existing services and roles provided to society as well as communities, and to build bridges, share resources and break barriers in the overall fight against crime..
Attendees witnessed the ER24 team display a heist and extraction demonstration..
City of Johannesburg MMC for Public Safety Michael Sun said the network was a wonderful initiative on how the government can work closely with the private sector in crime-fighting, thus ensuring all of us are safer..
We have generally been getting crime stats once a year and by the time an expert comes in to decipher the information, it's old news.
So, under executive mayor Herman Mashaba, we have decided to give residents real-time information of what is happening by releasing JMPD monthly stats and progress performances, Sun said..
He also shared information that by October this year, there will be an additional 1 500 metro police officers to patrol the City..
After the MMC had spoken, the attendees made their way outside where the seven CCIN N12 Risk Mitigation and Trauma Support vehicles, courtesy of Shahim Ismail were launched as Sun cut the ribbon..
Details: Civilian Crime Intelligence Network .
For more news and interesting articles, like Joburg East Express on .
Top Turkish diplomat attends Balkans summit in Bosnia .
SARAJEVO- Anadolu Agency.
Turkish Foreign Minister  on July 8 attended the foreign ministers meeting of the Southeast European Cooperation Process (SEECP) in the Bosnian capital.     .
Delivering an opening speech in Sarajevo, Bosnia's Foreign Minister Igor Crnadak said that the meeting will address issues of common interest to the SEECP member countries and what has been done during the chairmanship of Bosnia and Herzegovina.     .
The meeting was closed to the press.     .
Meanwhile, any officials from Albania and Kosovo, which are members of the organization, did not attend the meeting.     .
Consolidating peace &stability in Balkans is 's priority.
As a founding Participant of #SEECP, will once again assume Chairmanship-in-Office for 2020-2021.
Will prioritize migration, intra-regional transport connectivity& preventing brain drain,  said on Twitter.     .
He also met with Bosnia and Herzegovina's High Representative Valentin Inzko after the meeting.     .
SEECP was established in 1996 with the aim of strengthening political and security cooperation among the countries of the region, promoting economic cooperation and expanding the dimensions of democratic institutions, justice, combating illegal activities and humanities.     .  is among the founder members of the SEECP together with Albania, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, North Macedonia, Romania, Serbia, and Greece are the members.     .
Ekiti State Governor, Dr. Kayode Fayemi has given automatic employment placement to the all the 50 medical doctors billed for graduation at the State University Medical College..
This decision followed the full accreditation of all the college courses by the Medical and Dental Council of Nigeria (MDCN) after 10 yrs of existence..
Fayemi had earlier in the year presented a coaster bus to the college and released funds for the upgrade of some facilities needed to get the final accreditation..
According to a statement signed by the Chief Press Secretary to the governor, Mr. Yinka Oyebode, the state government under the leadership of Dr. Kayode Fayemi places a high premium on education and academic excellence and is committed to encouraging exemplars both in the academic world and in the public service..
In line with the administration's culture of rewarding excellence, some first-class students have had the fortune of been sent abroad on scholarship.
This is in addition to giving all Law School students and graduate students in other fields scholarships..
Ekiti 'll turn brain drain to gain, says Fayemi.
The attention of Ekiti State government has been drawn to a trending report on the value of an award instituted by a private organisation in Ekiti State University, Ado – Ekiti..
It is important to state that endowment of prizes and awards is strictly between the donor and the university authorities..
Oyebode added that the government under the leadership of Dr Fayemi will not relent in its efforts at exploring various ways to encourage and reward excellence, not only in academics but across every sphere of human endeavor..
The Nation newspaper.
As you can imagine, more people are reading The Jerusalem Post than ever before.
Nevertheless, traditional business models are no longer sustainable and high-quality publications, like ours, are being forced to look for new ways to keep going.
Unlike many other news organizations, we have not put up a paywall.
We want to keep our journalism open and accessible and be able to keep providing you with news and analysis from the frontlines of Israel, the Middle East and the Jewish World. .
As one of our loyal readers, we ask you to be our partner..
For $5 a month you will receive access to the following:.
A user experience almost completely free of ads.
Access to our Premium Section.
Content from the award-winning Jerusalem Report and our monthly magazine to learn Hebrew - Ivrit.
A brand new ePaper featuring the daily newspaper as it appears in print in Israel.
Within a few weeks, the barn owlets who were recently rescued have regained their strength and are in fact thriving, said 'Bird Lady', Sylva Francis..
The four owlets were discovered by Nkosinathi Milanzi, on the floor of his workshop in Blaauwbosch on June 5..
Unfortunately one of the owlets had already died.
The surviving three feathery birds were surrendered to the SPCA for specialised care..
SPCA Inspector, Suveshin Naidoo explained the owlets were taken to the Ncandu Veterinary Clinic, where another one unfortunately had to be euthanised..
The surviving two owlets were placed in the care of Sylva Francis, who operates a local bird rehabilitation centre..
A visit to the birds last week at the centre, showed their growth and improved eating habits..
Francis added the owlets were around four to six weeks old and were being fed day-old chickens enriched with calcium and vitamins..
Barn owls are territorial; they stay in the same area.
They are monogamous, which means they choose one partner for life and continuously lay eggs.
In a family of owls, there would be siblings of various ages.
When the food runs out, the youngest one will die, said Francis..
EDGEFIELD, SOUTH CAROLINA - Attorney General William Barr said Monday that he sees a legal path to adding a citizenship question to the 2020 census, despite a Supreme Court ruling that blocked its inclusion, at least temporarily..
In an interview with The Associated Press, Barr said the Trump administration will take action in the coming days that he believes will allow the government to ask the controversial question.
Barr would not detail the administration's plans, though a senior official said President Donald Trump is expected to issue a presidential memorandum to the Commerce Department instructing it to include the question..
The Supreme Court's June ruling was a blow to Trump , who has been pressing for the government to ask about citizenship on next year's census.
The U.S. Census Bureau's experts have said a question asking about citizenship would discourage immigrants from participating in the survey and result in a less accurate census.
That in turn would redistribute money and political power away from Democratic-led cities where immigrants tend to cluster to whiter, rural areas where Republicans do well..
Barr said he has been in regular contact with Trump over the issue..
I agree with him that the Supreme Court decision was wrong, said Barr.
He said he believes there is an opportunity potentially to cure the lack of clarity that was the problem and we might as well take a shot at doing that..
The Trump administration has argued that the question was being added to aid in enforcing the Voting Rights Act, which protects minority voters' access to the ballot box.
But Chief Justice John Roberts joined the court's four more liberal members in last month's Supreme Court decision, saying the administration's justification for the question seems to have been contrived..
It's unclear what new rationale for asking the question the administration might include in a presidential memorandum..
As the administration grapples for a way around the Supreme Court's ruling, the Justice Department has shaken up its legal team handling the matter..
Since these cases began, the lawyers representing the United States in these cases have given countless hours to defending the Commerce Department and have consistently demonstrated the highest professionalism, integrity and skill inside and outside the courtroom, department spokeswoman Kerri Kupec said in a statement..
A department official told AP the new team would consist of both career and politically appointed attorneys.
James Burnham, a top lawyer in the department's civil division, would no longer be leading the litigation team, said the official, who spoke only on condition of anonymity to discuss the matter ahead of the court filing..
An administration official said the new legal team may find it easier to argue the administration's new position.
The official spoke on condition of anonymity because the official wasnot authorized to speak on the record..
Barr spoke to AP after touring a federal prison in Edgefield, South Carolina, where he met with inmates and staff members to discuss the criminal justice reform law that Congress approved and Trump signed into law last year..
LATEST WORLD STORIES.
U.K. bars Russia's RT, Sputnik from media freedom conference over 'disinformation'Britain said Monday it had barred Russia's RT and Sputnik news organizations from a global conference on media freedom in London because of their active role in spreading disinformation.
Some 6....
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Many parts of Germiston have been left in darkness once again..
Though prolonged power outages are nothing new to Germiston residents, the latest spat of outages, which have lasted for days, have left many residents angry and frustrated..
Residents' frustration has only grown as they allegedly receive no feedback from the metro on the causes of the outages or when power will be restored..
Germiston and the surrounding areas have been hit by persistent power outages following the failure of an Eskom 40 MVA transformer at the Kreupelhout Street substation in Wadeville, said Ward 39 Clr Alta de Beer..
This has had a domino effect as overloading of the already delicate grid triggered outages in neighbouring suburbs, such as Dinwiddie, Mimosa, Lambton, Parkhill Gardens, Delville and Elsburg..
The metro's resources are stretched to breaking point at the moment and this has resulted in poor communication and high levels of frustration for both the residents and ward councillors..
While the transformer is Eskom's responsibility, we are concerned that the repair could take up to six weeks due to the costs involved and the repair time needed..
I have since been in contact with MMC Dora Mlambo, who is responsible for service delivery in Germiston, said de Beer..
She agrees that the current situation is unacceptable and is open to discussing the way forward..
Germiston residents struggle through the darkness.
In a statement, the metro's spokesperson, Themba Gadebe, said the metro and Eskom have been able to reduce the time frame required to replace the Eskom transformer, which Eskom has not confirmed despite the GCN sending several queries..
As part of our immediate remedial actions, we have been able to drastically reduce the time frame required to replace the transformer, said Gadebe..
Work is now scheduled to be completed on July 13..
In addition, a new 11 000-volt cable has been temporarily installed to enable load to be distributed between two primary substations, and this will lead to more load being accommodated and hopefully, mean less trips on overloading of the system..
Any cable and equipment faults will receive immediate attention..
Gadebe said the metro's future plans will include medium- and long-term arrangements..
Medium-term arrangements include:.
• A new security tender will be in place by the end of July, which will make provision for special early-warning notifications to a control centre before cable theft takes place..
• Video cameras and pepper spray alarm systems and more equipment will be installed in sub-stations..
• All cameras and early-warning notifications will be monitored in three security control rooms and reaction teams dispatched as and when required..
• All meter-tampering will be followed up and necessary actions taken..
• Illegal electricity connections will be removed..
Update: Power should be restored to all affected areas – says councillor.
Long-term arrangements include:.
• The metro's Atom Road substation will be upgraded and have double capacity within the next two years..
• The metro's Russel Road substation will also be refurbished and upgraded..
• Frequently failing cables will be replaced and upgraded where necessary..
Moving forward, de Beer and the metro have urged all residents and businesses to use electricity sparingly and to keep the load balanced, especially during the two peak periods daily (7am to 9am and 4pm to 7pm) by implementing energy-saving measures..
Residents are also requested to assist by reporting any illegal connections and properties that are overcrowded..
For many residents these are just more empty promises and words from the metro..
The municipality needs to be brought to book on this, especially when you phone the metro's call centre and you either cannot get through or they cut you off or tell you they donot know what the problem is and how long it will take to resolve, said Hilary Mitchley..
While another resident commented: Give me one good reason why we should put up with this gross mismanagement and be deprived of a basic service like electricity for which we are paying an arm and a leg..
Contact the newsroom by emailing: Melissa Hart (Editor)or Leigh Hodgson (News Editor)or Kgotsofalang Mashilo (journalist) .
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
President Cyril Ramaphosa officially opened and the inaugural Digital Economy Summit held under the theme: Advancing the African Agenda on the Fourth Industrial Revolution through Digital Transformation..
The Fourth Industrial Revolution represents a fundamental change in the way we live, work and relate to one another.
It is a new chapter in human development, enabled by extraordinary technology advances commensurate with those of the first, second and third industrial revolutions.
These advances are merging the physical, digital and biological worlds in ways that create both huge promise and potential peril..
A live 3D hologram of President Cyril Ramaphosa was transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre (where the event was held) to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West..
A live 3D holographic image of President Cyril Ramaphosa transmitted from the Gallagher Convention Centre to the Rustenburg Civic Centre in the North West during the inaugural 4th Industrial Revolution SA – Digital Economy Summit.
#DigitalEconomySummitpic.twitter.com/HMRCDYJ2Z3. — Shadi B (@shadisofla) .
Earlier this year the Minister of Basic Education, Angie Motshekga, confirmed that thousands of teachers were currently being trained in coding.
Coding is set to be piloted at 1000 schools across five provinces starting in the 2020 school year..
Half of SA jobs to be replaced by automation.
Gauteng premier, David Makhura, also spoke at the launch of the country's first Digital Economy Summit and said that South Africa needs to be prepared for a technology revolution..
He said: The World Economic Forum estimates that 65% of children entering primary school will find themselves in occupations that today do not exist..
We in South Africa are also moving fast to a future in which 41% of current jobs in South Africa will be rendered obsolete by automation; when 35% of skills that are considered important in today's workforce will have changed beyond recognition and others would have disappeared completely, he continued..
Makhura reiterated that South Africa cannot be left behind during the Fourth Industrial Revolution but also added that the country has shown promising signs of a digital transition..
Share this on WhatsAppSenator Ahmed Ogembe who represented Kogi central senatorial district in the 8th senate has urged the people of Kogi central and Kogi state to keep hope alive in the face of laughable exhibition of ignorance and uncivilized ways of doing things by Governor Yahaya Bello of Kogi State..
He was reacting to allegation linking him to assassination of Mr Yusuf Adabenege (Masquerade Custodian) by some miscreants that were paraded in Okene by the governor himself on Sunday..
The Senator who made the statement in Abuja said he is aware of the absurdity being pulled together by the governor to cause confusion and misinform the public Saying when an opportunist is at the helm of affairs he thinks every other person is a fool..
An Ebira adage says- When a fool talks he thinks people listening are also fools..
My word of advice to Yahaya Bello is to devote more time to governance by uplifting the welfare of the people and prompt payment of salaries/pension than engaging in cheap blackmail and frivolous propaganda..
Nigerians are aware that Governor Yahaya Bello is known to weaponize blackmail to get at his perceived political opponents, He once roped Senator Dino Melaye in a gun running and murder case but the truth came out eventually..
The same was the fate of Mohamed Audu who was accused of armed robbery but the governor antics also failed.
It is therefore not surprising that I am next on their list of blackmail game, Ogembe said..
Ogembe who said Bello met Ebira land in peace as a governor and he is expected to leave in peace, but with the path he has decided to take, he may end up in shame..
He advised Bello to leave Ebira land as he met it, if he can not improve on what he met.
He added that he will not dignify the governor with further comments in the meantime. .
Senator Ogembe urged the people of the area to remain united in rejecting any act of divisiveness adding that truth will always prevail no matter how long it takes. .
Share this on WhatsApp.
L.G Workers Barricade Roads in Kogi Over Unpaid SalariesKogi Guber: I Will Embark on Massive Poverty Alleviation - Musa Wada.
Vice Admiral Jibrin Usman: Anointed Candidate, Pretender or Hypocrite?.
Personnel of the Ghana Police Service (GPS) should stand firm to deal with vigilantism issues in the country, Dr Ernest Ofori Sarpong, Chief Executive Officer of Special Group of Companies, has stated..
He said vigilantism impacted negatively on the country's economy and must be dealt with swiftly before it got out of hand. .
Dr Sarpong said this at the West African Security Service Association (WASSA) of the Airport Divisional Police Command in Accra last Friday. .
The occasion which was on the theme Consolidating Ideas Against vigilantism for National Safety,  brought together dignitaries from all walks of life.
They were entertained with soothing music by the Police Central Band..
Dr Sarpong commended the personnel of the Police Service for their contribution in ensuring peace and stability in the country even at the peril of their lives..
He urged stakeholders to help support the Police Administration in combating issues of vigilantism in the country..
The Head of Legal and Prosecutions at the Accra Regional Police Command, Assistant Commissioner of Police (ACP) Lydia Donkor,  in her remarks,  urged Ghanaians to be  law abiding and  avoid forming criminal groups whose actions infringed on human rights..
She said until Parliament passed  the law regulating activities of vigilantism and its associate activities, the police would continue to deal with the menace  with existing laws as contained in the Criminal Code..
We are going to deal drastically with vigilante groups who equally engage in activities of land guards and armed robbery, she added..
ACP Donkor commended the personnel of the Airport Command for reduction of crimes in the Division..
The Airport Divisional Commander, Chief Superintendent of Police (Chief Supt),  Bismark Agyapong,  assured residents of the Police's  commitment in ensuring peace and stability in the area and its  environs..
He said crime had become sophisticated, hence the collaboration of all citizenry was needed to reduce crimes..
The Divisional Commander urged personnel not to relent on their oars, but work harder to ensure continuous peace and stability in the country..
The Airport District Commander, Chief Supt Eric Asiedu, stressed the need for stakeholders to forge ahead and share ideas to end vigilantism.
He said vigilantism was a threat to country's democracy, adding that it behoves the citizenry to assist the police address the menace..
Rabat – The Moroccan Justice and Development Party (PJD) said in a statement, on Sunday, July 7, that the US peace plan, dubbed the , is biased towards the 'Zionist' entity's interests. .
The party added that the deal opposes the legal framework of the global community..
The party further expressed its concern over the recent developments on the Palestinian issue, addressing the attempts of multiple international actors to promote the so-called deal of the century..
The Party explained their rejection of the plan, saying, the deal constitutes a clear threat to the historical and legitimate rights of the Palestinian people and prejudices the legal status of Jerusalem..
The US Israeli-Palestine peace plan aimed at injecting $50 billion of investments in the form of grants and subsidized loans into Palestine, Jordan, Egypt, and Lebanon..
In June 2019, a delegation from the Moroccan Ministry of Finance participated in the US-sponsored Peace to Prosperity conference held in Bahrain, which discussed the economic aspects of the proposed Israel-Palestine peace plan. .
Despite Morocco's attendance at the Bahrain conference, the North African country's government has stated that it remains staunchly in support of the two-state solution and is a crucial ally of the Palestinian people..
Morocco has a strong record of solidarity with the Palestinian cause.
Following the US decision to move its embassy from Tel Aviv to Jerusalem in 2018, King Mohammed VI addressed a letter to US President Donald Trump..
Moroccans Protest Donald Trump's 'Deal of the Century' in Rabat.
The letter stated that the city of al Quds must remain a land of cohabitation and a symbol of coexistence and tolerance for all..
Thousands of Moroccans protested in Rabat in the weeks before the conference, calling on the government to boycott the event and expressing their support for the Palestinian people..
Those who support the US-sponsored 'Deal of the Century' claim that it could mean the end of the decades of turmoil caused by the complex Israel-Palestine question..
However, the plan has been widely criticized for forcing Palestine to agree to unfair land concessions to Israel, in return for utopic economic investments and development projects. .
Before the conference, Nabil Shaath, advisor to Palestinian State President Mahmoud Abbas, said, We will inform Bahrain that we will not take part in such a conference. said in May 2019 Nabil Shaath, an adviser to Palestinian State We will not sell our country based on an economic project, he added..
So far, the unveiling of the White House peace plan has served only to render the peacemaking process even more fragile and intensify turbulence in the already volatile region. .
The Moroccan Independence Party Al Istiqlal also issued a statement in June 2019, prior to the conference, to warn against the serious ramifications of the US peace plan. .
The Party's executive committee described the peace plan as another Sykes-Picot agreement, which would cause more division and strife across the Arab world..
Hundreds of mourners turned out Monday to bid a final farewell to Brazilian music legend Joao Gilberto at a public vigil in Rio de Janeiro..
Wreathes placed around the semi-open coffin in the city's majestic Municipal Theater paid tribute to the pioneer of bossa nova, who died on Saturday aged 88 following a long decline..
Ahead of a funeral ceremony in the afternoon, which has been reserved for Gilberto's loved ones, fans arrived to pay their respects to a man described as Brazil's greatest artist, some carrying their own musical instruments..
Joao Gilberto represented a new era of music, Paulo Afonso Sampaio, a 43-year-old businessman, told AFP..
He was an inspiration for many people..
For 81-year-old lawyer Mario Bastos, Gilberto was a musical icon… who could hear sounds that others could not..
He was a great master, said Adriana Calcagnotto, a singer and composer..
Gilberto, who is remembered for his haunting version of The Girl from Ipanema, spent the last decade of his life a recluse with mounting family, financial and health difficulties..
His last public concert was in 2008 in Salvador, the capital of the northeastern state of Bahia where he was born, as part of a tour celebrating the 50th anniversary of bossa nova..
On Tuesday, he made a final public appearance at a restaurant near Copacabana beach with his partner Maria do Ceu Harris and his lawyer, Gustavo Carvalho Miranda, who posted photos of the event..
On Friday, Tanzanian President John Magufuli gifted Kenyan President Uhuru Kenyatta with four beautiful peacocks as a gesture of their good friendship and relations..
President Magufuli said he had been deeply touched with Uhuru's visit and said the four peacocks would be delivered to Kenya soon..
He joked that from the minute Uhuru set his foot at his house, he had been admiring the peacocks which seemed to have also liked him..
Because of the good friendship I have with him and Kenya, I have been touched, I will give out four of these Peacocks which will be delivered to Nairobi..
President John Magufuli holding hands with President Uhuru Kenyatta .
THE opposition MDC says it is going to overthrow President Emmerson Mnangagwa before his term of office expires in 2023..
At a rally in Bikita, Masvingo province on Saturday as the main opposition extends its rural outreach and mobilisation ahead of what the party says will be the ultimate demonstration to.  bring Zimbabwe to a new dawn, vice-chairperson Job Sikhala (pictured) said the MDC was going to overthrow Mnangagwa..
We are a committed leadership that will give Zanu PF headaches and [Amos] Chibaya was not lying or joking about the war and fight we are going to take to the doorsteps of Emmerson.
WASHINGTON — Senator Elizabeth Warren of Massachusetts raised $19.1 million in the past three months, her campaign said on Monday, a total that places her firmly in the top echelon of the Democratic money race and ahead of her main rival for the party's progressive wing, Senator Bernie Sanders of Vermont..
The fund-raising haul represents a turnaround for Ms. Warren after she raised just $6 million in her campaign's first three months, before her strategy of eschewing wealthy donors and inundating voters with detailed policy proposals began to pay dividends..
Ms. Warren's campaign team said her fortunes had begun to turn the last week of March, about a month after her decision to forgo closed-door fund-raising events during the primary campaign..
Sign up for our politics newsletter and join the conversation around the 2020 presidential race.].
Ms. Warren's total for the second quarter, which ran from April through June, is likely to place her third in fund-raising among Democrats over that period..
Two candidates have reported topping $20 million in the second quarter: Mayor Pete Buttigieg of South Bend, Ind., raised $24.8 million, and former Vice President Joseph R. Biden Jr. collected $21.5 million, their campaigns said last week..
Mr. Sanders — who has also avoided high-dollar fund-raisers — brought in $18 million in the quarter, and Senator Kamala Harris of California raised , their campaigns said..
We raised more money than any other 100% grassroots-funded campaign, Roger Lau, the Warren campaign manager, wrote in an email to supporters Monday, taking an implicit shot at Mr. Buttigieg and Mr. Biden, who have raked in money on the traditional fund-raising circuit..
You sent a message that Elizabeth's vision for the future is worth fighting for, Mr. Lau wrote.
And you showed the rich and powerful that change is coming — sooner than they think..
Ms. Warren's fund-raising total is the latest evidence that her policy-driven strategy  with a growing segment of the Democratic base..
Ms. Warren has now bested Mr. Sanders in fund-raising just one quarter later, after months of building momentum.
Her growth has been driven by policy announcements that were well-received by progressives, a slew of candidate forumsearned positive reviews, and moments when she seized on the news of the day — like when she called for President Trump's impeachment after the release of the special counsel's report..
Ms. Warren's improvement in fund-raising has coincided with a bump in polling.
She has ascended within the crowded primary field to an average of about 13 percent in recent national surveys, gaining ground on Mr. Biden and Mr. Sanders..
Ms. Harris, meanwhile, has capitalized on her performance in the Democratic primary debate last month, joining Ms. Warren in the tier behind the race's two most well-known figures.
Ms. Warren's team, however, has repeatedly dismissed the significance of national polling in the early stages of the race and has said that Ms. Warren is pursuing a state-by-state strategy..
Which Democrats are leading the 2020 presidential race this week?.
Ms. Warren is expected to continue to try to use policy announcements to create news and drive donations, which will be necessary to sustain her large staff in early primary states.
At her campaign's events in recent months, her I have a plan mantra has become a vocal rallying cry among supporters, and proposals like student debt cancellation now elicit sustained applause.
Voters repeatedly say that, more than any individual proposal, Ms. Warren's overall policy focus has helped them believe she is prepared for the office..
But the third quarter is a traditionally difficult fund-raising period, and Ms. Warren must also overcome concerns that linger among Democrats over how she would fare against Mr. Trump in a general election.
In a Washington Post/ABC News poll published last week, just 7 percent of Democrats and Democratic-leaning independents said Ms. Warren had the best chance to beat Mr. Trump next year.
(Mr. Biden led on that question, with 45 percent saying he had the best shot.).
Ms. Warren collected money in the second quarter from more than 384,000 donors, whose donations averaged $28, her campaign said.
She finished the quarter with $19.7 million in cash on hand, less than $100,000 of which is earmarked for the general election, her campaign said..
[Who's in?
Who's out?
Keep up with the 2020 field with our candidate tracker.
Ms. Warren's decision to rely on small donations to power her campaign still carries risk, given that some of her rivals are raking in huge amounts of cash at fund-raising events with wealthy donors..
She has enjoyed a big financial cushion in the early stages of the race because she transferred $10.4 million to her presidential bid from her Senate campaign account in the first quarter..
But she will need to keep raising money to pay for the expensive campaign operation she has built.
Her campaign's spending in the first quarter of the year, more than $5 million, was the highest in the Democratic field.
She had by far the biggest staff in that quarter, according to Federal Election Commission records, with about 160 people on her payroll..
Her staff has grown to 300 since then, her aides said, with 60 percent of her employees stationed in Iowa, New Hampshire, Nevada and South Carolina, the first states to vote in next year's primary.
She has built a particularly large operation in Iowa, the first state with a nominating contest..
Instead of courting wealthy donors, Ms. Warren has made a habit of  to people who give her money online, interactions that have ended with joyful posts on social media.
At her campaign events, she sticks around to take pictures with anyone who wants to meet her..
Presidential candidates are required to file their campaign finance reports with the Federal Election Commission by July 15.
Those reports will provide further details on how the candidates are raising and spending money — including a more detailed picture of how Ms. Warren has expanded her campaign operation since the last quarter..
Outspoken controversial MDC Deputy National Spokesperson, Luke Tamborinyoka has revealed that Job Sikhala, the party national vice-chairperson has been summoned by the police over his threats on the government over the weekend..
Sikhala told party supporters during a rally in Bikita East over the weekend that the party was not joking about overthrowing the president Emmerson Mnangagwa led government before 2023..
His remarks attracted threats from the government which promised to unleash maximum force on the party.
The permanent secretary in the Ministry of Information, Nick Mangagwana described the purported plans to overthrow the government as unconstitutional..
Posting on Twitter Luke Tamborinyoka said:.
MDC national vice chairperson, Hon.
Job Sikhala, has been summoned by the Harare Police Law and Order section.
One officer called Chibaya told him it is in connection with statements he allegedly made at a weekend rally in Bikita..
Mr Idris Abudulrahman Idris, outgoing Editor-In-Chief of the News Agency of Nigeria (NAN) has urged the agency's members of staff to sustain their commitment to ensure NAN's survival and advancement..
Abdulrahman made the call at a send-off party organised for him by the senior editorial management of the agency..
He is expected to retire from the agency on Tuesday, having attained the mandatory retirement of age of 60..
Abdulrahman joined NAN as a reporter on July 8, 1984..
He described NAN as a big project that had come a long way..
It is not an individual project hence the commitment of every member of staff is required to sustain it..
All of us here we have the capacity to sustain NAN, even build on it..
We must build more on the achievements recorded so far; we must make up our mind that NAN must continue; we should not rock the boat, he said.
Abdulrahman, who is also the Acting Managing Director, appealed to those he might have offended while discharging his official duties to forgive him..
He said that most of the decisions he took both as Acting Managing Director and Editor-In-Chief were taken without prejudice but in the best interest of the agency..
I never meant to offend anyone; all I did was to move the agency forward,'' he said..
He was appointed acting managing director of the agency in May, following the expiration of the tenure of the former managing director, Mr Bayo Onanuga..
Most of the senior management staff, who spoke at the occasion thanked the outgoing E-I-C for his contributions and wished him success in his future endeavours.
Prayers were also offered to God for him..
BEVERLY HILLS, July 08, (THEWILL) – The Minority Caucus in the House of Representative has called on the Peoples Democratic Party (PDP) to rescind its decision on the suspension of Minority Principal Officers of the House..
At a news conference on Monday in Abuja, the caucus passed a vote of confidence on the suspended officers as well as Speaker Femi Gbajabiamila..
THEWILL recalls that the National Working Committee (NWC) of the PDP had on Thursday, July 4, suspended Rep.
Ndudi Elumelu (PDP-Delta), who is the Minority Leader of the house..
The party also suspended Rep.
Toby Okechukwu (PDP-Enugu), the Deputy Minority Leader; Rep.
Gideon Gwani (PDP-Kaduna), the Minority Whip, Rep.
Adesegu Adekoya (PDP-Ogun), the Deputy Minority and two ranking members, Rep.
Wole Oke (PDP-Ogun) and Rep.
Lynda Ikpeazu (PDP-Anambra)..
The PDP had earlier endorsed Rep.
Kingsley Chinda (PDP-Rivers) as the Minority Leader, Rep.
Chukwuka Onyema (PDP-Anambra), Deputy Minority Leader, Rep.
Yakubu Bade (PDP-Kaduna) as Minority Whip and Rep.
Muraina Ajibola (PDP-Oyo) as Deputy Minority Whip..
Speaking on behalf of the caucus, Rep.
Legor Idagbo (PDP-Cross River) said the selection of the officers was in conformity with the house rules and Order 7 Rule 8, which derives strength from section 60 of the 1999 Constitution as amended..
Quoting the rules, Idagbo said: members of the minority parties in the house shall nominate from among themselves, the Minority Leader, Minority Whip, Deputy Minority Leader and Deputy Minority Whip..
Idagbo said that members of the minority parties adhered to the provisions of the rules in selecting Rep.
Ndudi Elumelu, as Minority Leader..
He said that the rule was also applied in selecting Rep.
Toby Okechukwu as Deputy Minority Leader, Rep.
Gideon Gwani as Minority Whip and Rep.
Adesegun Adekoya as Deputy Minority Whip..
He said Speaker Femi Gbajabiamila (APC-Lagos) was communicated by majority members of minority parties on July 2 and the decision which was announced on July 3, 2019..
Idagbo said that the parliament since 1999 had remained an independent body as it has not been coerced into accepting any leadership imposed by external influence..
We would like to appeal to our party chairman and the NWC of our great party, who we know are seasoned and experienced politicians that understand this dynamics to rescind their earlier decision to suspend our leaders..
Through no fault of theirs were nominated and elected by majority of members of the minority parties; were an offense to had been committed in this process, the perpetrators would be all 111 of us not six members as were suspended by our great party..
We use this opportunity to sue for peace and to state that we are available for further discussions with the NWC of our great party on how to resolve these issues and move our party forward, he said..
The caucus called on well- meaning party leaders, particularly those with legislative experience to intervene in order to salvage the situation..
NAN reports that the lawmakers commended the National Chairman of the PDP, Uche Secondus for the great job of piloting the affairs of the party that had seen its fortune increased in the last few years..
The caucus said it remained resolute to work closely with the national chairman and the party in ensuring that it returns to power in 2023..
By Onyeananam Chidinma.
The chairman, Transition Committee of Ikeduru Local Government Area of Imo State, Dr Anselem Opara on Saturday undertook inspection of Ekemele Road in Akabo, a strategic route in the LGA which have been dubbed ' a death trap' by motorist..
Speaking with newsmen at the project site, the TC Chairman said his committee is doing its best to alleviate the sufferings of the masses in line with the policies of the Executive Governor of the State, Chief Emeka Ihedioha (Rt Hon), noting that the state of the road have direct impact on the people of the state and Ikeduru in particular..
